      "identifier" : [
         "8_06912_196"
      ],
      "title" : [
         "The Western home monthly. : Vol. XVII. No. 4. (April, 1916)"
      ],
      "type" : "document",
      "contributor" : "oocihm",
      "source" : [
         "Scanned from a microfilm held by Library and Archives Canada."
      ],
      "location" : "http://eco.canadiana.ca/view/oocihm.8_06912_196",
      "label" : "Vol. XVII. No. 4. (April, 1916)",
      "media" : [
         "text"
      ],
      "key" : "oocihm.8_06912_196",
      "pkey" : "oocihm.8_06912"
   },
   "version" : "0.4",
   "request" : "http://eco.canadiana.ca/view/oocihm.8_06912_196/1?r=0\u0026s=1\u0026fmt=json\u0026api_text=1"
}
{
   "doc" : {
      "type" : "document",
      "title" : [
         "The Western home monthly. : Christmas Number 1918"
      ],
      "text" : [
         "r, I Numbert 1 pfr oviA N_____ ___ ~2~'~~",
         "coc S part pres on1, tain I qua When you hear the Christmas P belis ring ing remember that the COCA-COLA Company wishI you a Joyous Christmas; and dc may the turn of the New Year bring you Happiness, Health and Prosperity C CIand Book Food DosrBooket ELJLLL Lete - Ater N~i4d L~ ~Riddle Iiice 5e N. WND Whe",
         "BAKER'S COCOA and more than one-haif of Bakcr's Chocolate is a pure, nutrifious, ind easily digested fat. Delicious and Wholeaome Walter Baker\u0026 Co.Limitecl Establiahed 1780 Montresi, Con. Dorchueste. Mas\". C..d. F.. .d -M UMM N.. 1-MO PoultroyButter Eggs Wanted Willjpay boust picsdellverd, WsV pet, eitgCAS\u0026 imd\u0026teYo receitof shiPmolt. W. need old bons, od roosters, turkOYl, ducks. sprint chickeml, duckliflgs, geseO. Butter, Eggs. Write for prces orsend \u0026long. We'Ul treat you sU right D. W. FRASER 357 William Ave.- Winniffl COMIC RECITATIONS ANI) READINGS 2w0 pages Cloth. 75c. p'tPgiý A new ~eii.\u003cf(,iI - bave neyer berore been wUt lished in book !orm. Ilsa cot m ~ 0gWStentg c rne mo! tii1 bNO lfiots uch wnrlW renowfled Itumorisis as Miari Twainl. Jcis BiliIMs, Artemuh Ward1-.. Et eit. r Hasrte.Billy.linKt GoTatetier, LewDicSiî cobRiley aUG 0 ot l!es I %-e)moat amu le, ecc ent c drilances sui[ able for reci tons chiu '15 ,awing-roOm rnentertlrlli and amiteui\u0026heatr caîs%%W ' for catalogue. »therdesifb bocok et 75e. \"Irlsh Wit and Humor.\" T1' Book or Card Tricks end Skeighto01S\"and Tricka it -In.\"\"The Gy ~,~Itch eai Book,- -'Motdem Qua*driIelle zk n C plete Dancing Mas\u0026ter. North'5 Book of Lov Lettcrs and How to Write Tem\" Toasts un After Dinner Speehes. l'Conufld*rums mun Riddlea'..,=opeeDebaters'M*nnuâl.\" Lt Folks' Speaker and EntertalflCf WINDSOR SUPPLY CO. - WINDSOR. ONI 'Vhen writing julvertisers, 1lea, n ieicitt T[he Western Home MJont1m1y THE WESTERN HOME MONTHLY By Rev. D.S. Hamiton, BA. - Korb *ob ont jeabentp jlattber, ilOu art Stbe bigb amdi bolp Ont, înbabitinq etern:t? anb atso binelinq in gincere anb contrite tjeart«. Ue cannot tultp unberstanb tbe greatne%,« anb S mpaterp aof tjp beinq but lue tame iu reberence n Sbumititp ta Inait upon ZbIet e. tbabin waine at tbe tfiouqbt af Zbrpainter anb tiibom anb bolineo, 0 Oob, anb ine reatîie bain trait anb foolib aub oiniuti11» aru in %bp pre«ence, but ine remember Iitb tbanlfut- Ç nes tjat Zbau art a campaosionate latter 1inobagga~ Sprabibeb otrtet raoutineaineoo, fi0ibom fer our toaigbne« anbteaueîng tar aur sineOrant unto_ Sulg, int begeetbltbee, pure tbaugbt«, balp 01upitatian%. beabentp battes~ anb teacb uo bain ta prap. Me neeb ~ bi 0in batb, e0lLarb, anb ine tbanit Zbee tar tbe gpeat lllbpoician Uba came ta minioter ta, afflîttcb bumanitp. jlatp tbe guffetring, tbe soarrainn anb tic ~ prptexeb eberpinbere bring tbeîr burbenii ta Ysm anb E# fimnb »iipramigeb test. Our «ration« jjatber, ine tbauim Zbte ft U E X E=: gabn«g ai tfe Cbriotmastibe, tor tbe rabiant bapeo E kimnbleb bp Uic oeao;on'o returu, tar Uit remembrance at tbe Oaob Zibin if Oreat Yap inbieb %baulb bet ta [1 ipeaplt. f0Iap men eberpinbere be imbuetitb tbt -Cbrtitmo pirit, tbe spirit oai ptace anb Ooob Udlt dge anb map Zbp tingbam came aub Zbp inili bc banc an eartb. atmigbtp *ob, ine bumblp aclmnaintcg bp aber-ruling painer anb gpateiuttp recognie tije btliber- ance %bon basi inraugbt bp tb1ain tgUbe tigno aof Stbe oppressar% anb cauoinq tinarta ceagt. Mo Uiau basten tebap inben men %bat tearu inar no more. Cop tbiig eub, 0 Oob, ba Zbou b1t«O tt einorlb anb turn it ___ta Zbpo;eti. Cause tbc nations tijat babe rebeilteb Sagainot Zbr tains anb ftt at befiance tbe principtt« ai Z1.p Xingbam ta repent ai Uiir iniquitp an b bumble tbetIo;lbto;before lEbtt. 3Lrb, int babe geen talte national ibeatm; crumbting anb baugbtp rultrs - aliqtiron t Ueir Uraneg aub ine tbani C bee Uat Cbou ba«t brausbt ta naugbt tbe bain ambtion% f aitctb Smen. Ut prap tbat tbiere map pet atiot aut ai tbee É_E rebelliaue% nation« regenerateb anb puriiieb peopite; ilo -\u0026 obait acknobtebge anb serbe tbe a.ing ai lking«. 0 1Larbaoit »ot«, orbib tbat tbe bittetou« natians sboulb be unminbiut ai Zbte anb ai Xbp gaabne in E E time ai triumnpb a r boaot tbat tbeir ainu banbo babe g~ otten tbemn tbe bictarF. %mib«t tUir re;alcinq map *\u003cE ttp abobe att rejoice in 19bp «albation anb lu tbe name f E a tbe ILorb mnap tbep %et up tieir banner«. _Pen. map I men anb nations geck ifir5t tbe lKingbom ai Oab aubE V~E ~i« ibttoegot. Rit inoulb tgpeciattp implore Zbee ta let Zb Ebleggifl test upon the great Vrace Couterence anb map Sttje reprtenettatiur« inba ttribie for a ;u«t solution of à Inarlb problems «eek birection tram tije eberlotln g ,~jfatb er anb tb e prince afiPeneaC. Ne berp graciaue ; ta tloge wbobaje gulfftrreb raugb tecalamitp aifinar -anb quibe anb belp tbaot intia plan for therir relief -la lOE e beb.outlp ttank tjet for t ecourage anb tuburauceE rE oaitIlZiba 5P5ebptb Ie cause ai tebont anb ine praiot ~ E ~beefor tue fruit oft beir gacticeo-libertp taet U EIS- aptiur« anb nein bope for tbe iorb. nb notn ie Setreat Tbettetaabunbantlp prosper t epeaceftl am îr - lnintp ce e f urther atlebiate tue sufferinge; of Uic 0 f - unfortutiate anb bigtre!gb aub inourt ta thent a rirbtr W ,,, E anb ftilr lifte Our labinq latber, be pltUteb ta rebata tt b ct\u003eîbren ai men Ijp purpase for tacti lite, tor tacti \u003e1 nation, for att bumanitp anbgrn ut ait tble spirt ai unsefifi erbice. J»car aur prcaptr. e Oob, targie aurdi pgt t Utligbt ai Zbp cauntenauce upan us. = = antb grant ta alZbp peace, anbt b jam e~oo T. an r aI t anb Oarp in tbe bigbtgt. amen. NÏ i 1Il1111111ltL IlP ;11M11ll1 i 1 OPEN' AGAIN, THE SUCCESS COLLE atRegina opened Xinday Nov. 18. The Regia Medical Healtli Officer assures us that it is quite saf e to bring ini pupils from out-of-town DOints. OPERATED BY The Success Business College Limitod Bhould beWorn Sby Ladies wollîcn are ,nu 0c h more deliçt.rly con- -t ructed tlîan mnen, and their bod ies being of a nuch finer tex- ture are more si iseep)- tile to weather (.1anges. Jaeger l'lire Wool Under- wear afTords coifl- 1'tete protection in W 1 wentlîer and at ail A fully illustrated rat alogue free on ap- Fortsale ia T.aeger qtoree a i t g\u003clniea, Shogot aada'..o JIE Toronto Moutzoai whIp.g Briih#\".founded 1883 \" E7fEbuy ail kinds of Farm Produce I Pay highest c a sh p r ictes. Prompt re- turns. John Enright »0. nt. Mary's Ave.,, Phono M. MIS?4 -ilCty Market Phono G. Us -a - i..i.#'-5.s.\"- .~- - e e * , . r, titi",
         "THE WESTERN HOME MONTHLY Wire or Phone for Ths Greaest Phonograph Off er'Ever Made to the People 0fWstern- Canada iom Only a limited number will be sold at this reduced price. This introductory offer good only for thirty days. A brand new latest style Colonial phonograph, fitted with ail modern Lmprovements - the equal of any $150 instrument ever mnade ---specia1ly priced for the first 200 purchasers$95( ORDER YOURS TO-DAY Tenus to Suit $950 sends this beautiful new Colonial phonograph to your home to-day -express prepaid. The balance you may pay off at the rate of $9 monthly,. or quarterly payments may be arranged, whichever suits you beat. Introductory 'Offer This ie a special introductory offer. We know this phono- graph to be one of the best values we, have ever been able to seil. We know that these phonographs will give satis- faction. We guarantee them to do so. When these 200 Machines are SoId the Regular Price wil l e restored. TO -MORRO W MAY BE TOO LATE Value - Exactly u $150»-00 Illustrated-Special $99,50 ý Introductory Price Exchange Privilege In addition to our guarantee we will permit you to exchange one of these instruments at any time within one year for a brand new Columbia, New Edison, Gerhard-Heiùtzman, Sherlock-Manning, Pbonola or Cecilian phonograph, a piano or player piano, crediting you with the full price you have paid. One Year Guarantee Should any trouble arise within twelve months due to either mechanical construction or faulty workmanship - you may return your machine to us aiid the same will be made good by us or your money refunded. p ý M.M.MM--Mmwm milnuiiiniiiimilailu ITI diff in diti upoi am will vill be a 91 end to the Bethlehem's irlad refrain Péace an, . i honor to G( above all thi for us to Po *M\"g In t, àWnt froff will never 1 bSn made 1918 should May it be a is wa Eu fre overthrow be expected without sc five or ten darkest evE placed in t] àbsorbed d these natio have to uni the long to-day. the unspea a kinder fa 10 Selecfions Free You pay nothing extra for the 10 Columbia Record selections that we will ship with each machine. Youmayevenpick them for yourself from our catalogue which we will for- ward on request. 'You ha-v e y our choice of either mahogany or quarter eut oak. The piano finish of these in- struments îs equal to that of the highest priced phono- graphs you can buy. ý A Chrishnas Gift This may be your opportunity to solve the big Christmas gift problem for your family. If so you may pay your deposit now and have your, machine déiivered, later if you wish. Don't Take Chances --- Get Your 0 rder in - To-day Wire or Phone at Our Expense. foi rel Pa sei à she con that has c the war. was a wide people bu- cz;u. elom disti tests of W( of this wi class disti whe have heroism a every land gogues an' are great 1 their cultu belong to thau this There k alrAost aut test what with self- trusted w Hay's dili there are i and Irish one th* It is anoti There i that is vi turning t( been on i who havq State mm and the women h livine wil outbid th Business lowest bi( allv this A family unmarriei justed? t o indivi( and traé contract. he does t viits righ, work.\" of indusi iri these If you ever hope to own a good your opportunity. Our name is satisfaction. phonograph this is your guarantee for 13'313 DIRECT FACTORY REPRESENTATIVES WMNWAY, GIELIMARD HKINTZMN. NOItDHILIMIM. CHICKERING, HAIMM, BlILL, BHERLOCK-MANNNG, DOHIERTY. CANADA ANC LESAGIE PIANOS. KDISOM. COLUUBRA. MJPHONOUAN AND PHONOLA PHONOGRAPHS te* SPECIAL DISCOUNT FOR CASH",
         "THE WESTERN HOME MONTHLY The Obxltumsof 1918 U ITING just a mentit hofore Christinas it ia difficuit te say what the world wil bave in store for us ou that day. It the con- ditions of peace will het bave been toramaly agedupon it la more than probable that actual vamr will have ceased. Lu the hearts et men there wlil h a great and abiding joy because thore la an end tethe war that wohopewllleud. Onceagamnon Bethlehem's his the lixe host may tako up the glad refrain etf\"Peace on=~at, good-wiIl te mon!\" Peace sud goodwill corne only to, those whe are wailng in thought sud deed te ascriho ail glery sud houer te God lu the Higitoat. This Christmnas should above ail things ho a holy season. t would ho sacrilege for ns te peisa our tuno mn frivolity when se msuy are absent from our gathoriuga, sud when se vory many wil nover return. in view et the sacrifice tat bas been made for us, it la mot that the Christmasset 1918 ahould ho a time et consecration sud ro-dodication. May it bh o ie very Canadian homo!. Egurope After the Woe pTis net easy te estimate the offet et the war upon thte nations et the world. As for Europe she will profit inmosasurably, since freedom wifl corne te, her people with thte overthrew et monarchial institutions. t must n et ho expected, howevor that the change wil ho effected without so;irow su hardship. Possibiy thte uext five or ton years rnay ho for the Central Powers the darkest ever known te humanity. Just as coal when placed luntte furuace gives back ail the heat which it ahsorbod during the centuries et its formation, se these nations lu re-establishing their citizenship may have te undergo ail thte suffering titey endured durmng the long years et their oppression. t lase lui Russa to-day. M[ay the otitor nations, notwithsasdiuig the unspeakable crimes eft tieir ruling classes, have a kinder fate. Britain Ater the War * for Britain our hope la that site may ho deubly refined b y the fires tbrough which she bas passed. S ho bas many problema te solve, serieus sud weighty.,, Site will selvo thein if abe contluues te exorcise the unseifisit devotion that bas characterized bier durlug the long years et the war. Lu the days efthtie Piantagenet ruielrs there was a wide gult hotwcen the baronage sud the commen people but titis was bridged by the great war et the CrIus\u0026e. Fighting side by ide, men forgt their cas distinctions. Bravery sud sacrifice were the tests ot Worth. Se may wo hope that the firt resut of titis war wil ho the deing away with artificial close distinctions. Al bail te the uobility - those Who have proved their lordahip by their deodalot beroism n sd service! Thora ta sucit a nobihty in every land. t la net imade up of secialists sud dents- gogues sud agitators, but eit royal seuls - thtese Who are great hocause of their deods, their aspirations sud their culture et mnind sud spirit. And inany et these hlong te tite old nobility. Nothiug la more chening titan this very tact. Thora la su rish problem. t, tee, will ho selved ahneSt automaticaily. t has heen tound eut by actuai test witat people lu the Emeraid Ilie can ho trusted with solf-g~overnment, sud what people caunot ho trusted wit any power. Those Who have read Iau Hay's \"Thte Opprossed lEnglisit,\" wiil know that thore are a goéod many titinga concernut Irisht treedom sud risht priviiege titat have yet te \u003ee said. t la eue th*ugte talk about oppression sud tyranny. It san suer titing te sufer oppression. Thora la for theo Motiterlaind a practical problein that la very difficut et solution. t ta that et re.., turning te titeir proper occupations the men Whto have heen on service, sud et releasm tte youug wemeu Who have taken their p aces. ~n titis matter the State must intervene, otherwise the returnod soldier and tite head et a tamily will sufer. For young womeu havingz once tastod the jey et ludependent living wiil w\"hitot continue at their work sud wiii outbld tite farnily man, sud oven the returnod seidior. Business mon, if loft t te tonselves, will accept the lowest hidder, providod the service ia equal. Eventu- allv this will moan tite disceuragemeni t fmarniae. A family in cannot enter inte conipetition wth unmarnied women. How ia the problem.%to ho ad- jiîsted? Evidently wago bargainîng cannot ho left t o individuals sud employers nr tb employer unions anid trade unions. Thora la s national ide toe vey contract. A in must ho paid net pnly for the work he does but fer the service hoe rendors the State. Tiqi cliît. right across the doctrine et \"Equai psy fer equal work.\" The war bas prepared us for national control of industries sud institutions. The eue institution ir, these tintes witich must ho teatered la tte family. Anything which directly or indirectly strikes at family lite la a national menace. t may ho exec that demobilization will take a long time. Durng this period manufacturing concerna wili have time te adjust tbemseives te new conditions. The balance of trade haviug hoon coin- pletely overthrowu hy the war, new entorpnisos will assert theinselves sud these will cali for mauy workers, se that tbe problein et finding situations for aIl workers may netbhoasa serieus as was at one time eypected. The Great War t was a eonfiet between brute FORCE, alert aud aggressivo, sud stern JUSTICE, gracieus but unbending. With FORCE were allied eunuing and dereit, worldly prido and inerdinato ambition. With JUSTICE were assoiated houer sud truth, kiudliness sud goodwill te mon. Confident ln ber careful preparatieii ef tweuty yesrs, FORCE seized an opportune moment, te assauit witbout warning the cita- dels et freedom. With impious beasting aud inhunian cruelties site outered upon ber work ofe spo liation sud dosolation. Thon JUSTICE drew ber ove» sword sud stayed the murderer's baud. With pions zeal she summoued te ber bannersalal thte sons et freedorn. From Northt sud South, tram East and W~est, trom ail the corners ot the earth tlhy hurried te ber aid-prepared te sacrifice, prepared te die. Four years the awf nI tide et battle rolld- four years et rapine laugitter sud unceasing hiate; tour years et noble toil, unerrng love and strong resolve. Thon came the end. The nigbt has passod, the day bas dawued and Justice sits upon ber throne. THE WORLD IS FREE. Now as we stand witb faces teward the rising sun, w. dedicate ourselves te the great work for wbich we are appoiuted. Lu tbe name ot our dead berces we shall carry on. Their un- finisbed labor it la ours te reatore. Their people shall ho our people sud their God shal hc our God. Se shall we as well as they, bc pertected tbrough sacrifice, and se shall the world b. made ste for ail the people. Lu war, in peace, the law of lite i9bis, that \"Each shaîl love bis neighbor as hinif.\" Cana\"aArter the War * Sfor Canada the post-war problems are net se senieus as lu the Motherlaud, but yet two or tbreet thein are heset with difficulty. The cost of articles grown ou tho tarin bas gone up by leapsansd bounds, sud with titis the cost of every- Iniu eohé..Naturally thora bas been an tucrease in the earniugs et working men, sometimes double, sometimea more than this. Afttr the war thora in hound te ho a reduction lu wages, sud with this a pretest greater than auy we bave bad. Lu this matter those in charge et national affaira must take strong grund. t la for ne employer nor gpou p ot employers, foro no workman nor for unions et workmeu te settie roblems y their owu action. Lu war the nation orcne al sud the individuai notblug. Bo muet it ho in post-war matters. But it la untortunate titat in somne tew cases thte action efthtie nationkl leaders bas net inspired the poople with confidence. Bo true la this that thora ta ut seme quartors dissatistaction, net se mucit witb meinhors et the goverument, as with the continuation lu office et a govermount that la founded on compromise. A grave problem for Canada ia to work out a form o! goernment that wiil be suitable in the yars to corne. Shail th ereh a roturh to the old time pary. system? If not, what shall take its p lace? T lislla mdeed a serlous question. Then there la the problem of gast and West, but thia la oui of passing importance. Eventualy the West Mil control the weathof Canada and wil dictate its peliclos. The West la not settlod by men who are narrow in their oulook and Parochial in thoir !sympathies. Thoy will work on national rathor' thau provmolal hunes. This much eau b. said to reliovo, thé »Muxets of those lu the Euat wio have been using the, West as a dumping ground for so many yoars and who are now begiunmzte foar reprisails. Throlabuudte ariase for solution thé problem ef the non-Engliah settiers. We have larnedOur lesson however, aud there is enly on.ecourse open te us. *bou any man entera the country or continues te live in it, it should hé on the. condition that ho is perfectly loyal te our institutions and that no national or religious bond interfors in the alightmt dogrue wlth bis loyalty. No ma n a wrorthy citizen of Canada who owes aDogiance te a power outaldo the great empire of which Canada ia a part. W. areneoBakati stte, snd neyer shal hé. àBute ail who corne te ns m .~o ath sd lu loyal attitude w.e au extend a glad had,'offeringthorruas mon asthe av roved ther incerity the proud tank ofc lienhp Terhid will hé our children. The wil atted the national acheols, spoak the national =àgug, learn the national customsansd catch the natinl spirit. Afl this and more if these newcomers are true. But if there la any duplicity, any waverig, any lnsinoerity any clas or racial agitation, there in ready a doom U exit, net only for them but for such Of Our o0n people as would use them for ignoble purPOmes Modem Educttan r tifyng f ail ou 1pepienuthogh oducation.ý In bath Csu ansd. the other- land the greteat neoe2ty in the remodeflU* of achools sud uiiorsities so as te, make them minister in the bighest degree te national weltare. Thora ilf se muen htat taditinal lu sohool-roern procedure, se much that savons of mediasyjildu in the ;stad course in our universitius, that suai a foreul wfrlter as Mr. Wella bas found it nouayte r a reform. Hia lateat work \"Peter sud loeneL~With thUsveY problem sud it la good resdilngfer Canadiens\u0026a kal as Ô1dCoutrymn In the samo spirt Mr. FinneYt su American writer, gays: \"Espocially et such a time as thla, ail iga idiate that we are on the ove ofep \u0026goWreconstructien. Borne of the most ignifleant sund Tundamental changes lu recerdod history are likely te coMur withiu a.6 n.ra- tion atter thé close ef thé great War.Tii. Wllihéa moot critical poriod for democac.if social justice issues promptly our new bora b.tWin tenf~U the world. But should thora co0u the econvuso of classatruçgle sud confliicina luteres, hoe.de- ferred may sicken thheart et Othé darkined world f or a thousaad years te corne. Tii. outOOme eOftti. criais deponds upon tesociologlalnsiget o ur leaders. And the oducaters are vryfer from dia- ceruing sasyet thoir own im=rtant s in uthi immeasurable responsiîty. ' inrelabut mes huit te what education may l~la e i.future o civiization in ttis critical period. thtMuntlati vision sud taitb of our educationl adra.Education mut adopt an ultimata alu commurte WUtii i ideala et democracy sud Chlist*a' .y . . w am0 te look for the meauing et litfe nthtio cndtions et the remote past but iu thé ideal world that stands et the summit et social evohitiOn a world seotarsud good that ne art cau adoqutofy promeut it te tthe imagination.\" À Pt\" atart r helis arerwgng sud the whistles blowing tho war bas ended. Lot us h the. report la weli founded sud lot ins hé Teutly thankfu.l *Let ns pray that this may bc the lust war et nations. But thore la a moe~ horrible war thantitat among nations. t in war withmn a nation. Againat the poeihility et sucb a war wo muet provide. Thte only safeguard la that we 0oestésii tti Prince of Peace, that wo folîow Hila gelden nile. A good turne te make a resolution la right nowas thé Crism seanon la upon us. Let uns ue abovo clase an4Aoreed sud race. Let us endeavor oach msute ,e bis neigihor sas himaelft. Thon shalh wo itar the helle of peace rnng net enly on the Christmas morn but evory day of the yer. M. uaY it hé. ~, *.",
         "THE WESTERN HOME MONTHLY y,- What keeps you from having its charm ..ender sins If your skin is v'ery tender there is a special Woodbury treatmcnt for the care of it. You will find it in the boklet wrapped around your cake of Woodbury' s Facial Soap HOW nany girls despair of ever rousing a sallow, sluggish skin! How hard it seemns not to bave the clear skin and radiant color that is every young girl's right. Have you ever thought that your skin can be changed ? Every day your skin changes of itse/f. Old skin dies, and new forms to take its place. It depends on you to keep this new skin clear and colorful. J ust so long as you neglect your skin, it will continue to be duli and colorless. If it is sallow, sluggish, inactive, jr needs stimulating every day. Free it every nighr of the tiny dead particles that develop daily. Cleaîise the pores rhoroughlv, bring the blood to the surface, stirnulate the tiny muscular fibers. You can do this every night by using the following treatment. How to rouse a sluggish skin Just before retiring, wash your face and neck wîth plenty of Woodbury's Facial Soap and hot water. If your skin has been badly neglected, rub a generous lather thoroughly ipto the pores, using an upward and outward motion, until the skin feels somewhat sensi- tive. After this, rinse well in warm, then in cold water. Then rub your skin for thirty seconds with a lump of ice, and dry carefully. The very~first time you use this treat- ment, your skin will feel fresher and invigorated. Woodbury's Facial Soap was made especially to meet the needs of the skin. Ih was formulated by John H. Woodbury after .years of experience in skin needs Within a week or ten days, you will notice an improvement in your skin. But do flot keep up the treatment for a time and then neglect it. Only the steady use of Woodbury's will give you the clear, radiant skin you long for. Perbaps your skin needs a stronger treatment than the one given here. Then write us for the iiew steam treatment for pale, sallow skins. You will find the other famous treatments in the bookiet wrapped around every cake of Woodbury's Facial Soap. You will find that the 25C cake of Woodbury's lasts for a month or six wveeks of any Woodbury treatment as welI as for gený,ral cleansing use for that tirne. Ir is for sale at drug stores and toiler goods couniters throughout the United States and Canada. Get your cake today, and begin at once the mtaiment your skia needs. Send for sample cake with bookiet of famnous treatmeflts and sample of Woodbur'v's Facial Powder Send 6c for a tria] ize cake (cnough for a week or cma day ofany Woodbury Facial treatmnent) together with the b5let of treatmcnts, \"A Skin You Love to Touch. _ Or for i c we will send you the treatînent booklet andI samplea of Woodbury's Facial Soap and Facial Powde\u0026. Address The Andrew Jergens Co.. Limited, 6212 Shtt- broke Street, Perth, Ontario. iriter was bank near Walking th adjacent t( as he slowl, strated th advanced( An old-tin years petiT period whE crooked tr Kildonan 1 pany ita Fo \"Beautil year,\" rein stepped to mas will s( wish you them yet. river have fashions y( way. We was the re forward t( was the gri Lt May days Man ony. In time resi\u003c prone to Oarry. 'eople between *ç continued wrinkled 1 out on relatives or Seikiri Andrew' s morning and - \"Bishor listener, \"There's r .did not re \"That's Andlerson. old stone morîfings. .Anders( whosè fial on the R hiero whc distant ) people th( ln resl Cliristma and hastî( reînarked inany ln( peg and bring it for a f ew happenin New Ye: latter ce f nt ire w~e The st the carli lhonored table, th an unknî speakiflg outogena i(lea 've folks L( fat lier wi ~ilosi of .Ji'-, lave the w\\rit( at i ih R i (Ilia' ti, ap",
         "THE WESTERN HOME McÔNTHLY À .4. The writerl'oes, however, recollect thàt at Christmas parties aiong the, Red River much enthusiasm was evoked when the time honored jig was commenced by the. violinist. \"Tbat's a car going to Winnipeg\" e- marked the. octogenarian, as the shril whistle sounded tbrough the, bush 'twixt the electric railway and the river bank. \"Things have altered the. last few years. Last Christmnas Ev. I went with on. of my sons to the, city, and he took me to tbe corner of Main street and Portage avenue. No I can't say what my thoughts were as I looked at the, crowds of people, the splendid store windows, and the auto-. mobiles. The, change is too wonderful for me to talk about. Did we ever fancy Fort Garry would b. more tban it was in the. eariy days, you ask? No, we neyer did; we made a wrong guese didn't we?\" A few minutes later the witer wisbed the. aged resident fareweil and expressed the. hope that several Christmnas daYs would yet be enjoyed by hlm. \"'Can't expect many more,\" he replied. 4\"r'.e Ment nearly ninety of thern in Mani- 5 ULETIE bas heen celebrated in Manitoba from the daysi wii.n Selkirk's settiets trekkedi into the \"colony\" from Scottish1 shores. A few days ago the Irriter was standing on the. Red River bank nean the Rapide of St. Andrews. Walking through a piece of popWa coppioe adjacent to the roadway was a man, who, as hie slowly ambled along, plainly demon- strated the fact that the bailmnnk of advanced old age was stamped upon hlm. An old-tiine resident of tih. locality, bis years permit hin to glance back into the period when the settier trekked along the crooked trailt tirough Middlechurch and Kildonan to the store of the. Great Comi- pany iua Fort Garry. \"lBeautîful morning for _Jhe tie o! year,\" remarked the. veneraMe man asne stepped toward the. writer. \"And Christ- mas wiil soon b. bere, too, won't it?\" \"Yes,\" responded the. witer, \"and I wisb you a mcrry Christmas and lots of themn yet. You old timers along the. river have spent the day ini various queer fashions ycars ago.\" \" 9NQ, W. gnealy speat it in one way. We'V alwaye observed Christmas,\" was the response. \"But we neyer Iooked forward ta iL as with New Year's. That was the great tune in the eolony.\" It may be w.il t. remark that in carlr days ,Manitoba was known as the. \"Col ony.\" Indeed, frequently when an old- time resident is in conversation be je pion. to refer to the. colony and Fort Gary \"People in the. coloay wcre few and f an bctween wiien I was a young man,\" he contiaued, a emile passing over bis niucii wrinkled face. \"Pniiapsvw. migiit stant out on Christmas a! ernoon to visit relatives or friends, may be at Hadingly or Selkirk. Most of the. folks ini St. Andrew's parisii went to ciiurchin iithei moraîng to hean the Ciinistma,% bymns and- \"Bisbop Anderson,\" remarked thie listener, momeatarily interruptiag. \"There's not an old-tâner on the river who .did not recognize hum as a friend.\" \"Yes,\" answered tbe octogenarian. \"That's quit. right what you say about Anderson. V'ye heard hum pr.acb in the old stone churcii oa several Christmas morîfiags.\" .Anderson. He the. intrepid path-fiadcr whosè nine is ever green at St. Andrew's on the Red river. l.e was likewise the hiero who peaetrated the f astnesses of distant Yukon, carrying Lo iLs Indian people the Gospels. la response to a query cofloertuifg Christmas and New Year's at Fort Garry and bastioned Lower Fort, the. old resident renarked that it wvas customary with nany Indians to corne f rom Lake Winni- peg and the vicifity. The Indian wozId bring witii hum a bundle of furs to'barter for a few extra supplies. It was a usual happening for the Indians to usher in the New Year with a feast and dance, the latter celebration frequently lasting an f nt ire week. The statement bas been made that in the early days of Manitoba th, time- hionored adjunet to the Christmas dinner tal)IP, the p)roverbial plum pudding wvýas ain înknown factor w th the settlers. In speaking of this subjeet, the St. Andrew's i ogenarian remarks: \"That's the silliest idea 'y. heard of in a long while. The folks Lord Selkirk brougbt liere-my fathler wvas on. o! themn-knew more than sotine people yet give them credit for. At Ilieit of the company's stores flour and rýti,ins were'alwavs in stock.\" -The lively stýains of the Red River -Jiu llave apparently va-nished.\"* remarked t1lîi \\rter. who last heard its merry mulsic at :t Christmas spent at M.\\apleton s'ears \"Perhaps old-tîmers alîing the ted I\\ r have forgotten the tuuie.\" he added. Sm)ietimes vou'Il hear it vet.- mwas tii I s.There are several men around t IHipids who can play the old tune vet, i IlVou Nwere here on Christmnas nighi j i îîuglit hear it.'' toba, and perhapp before another Christ- mas Day I may b. laid in Lb. ceuetcry at Kildonan, where -y father. mother and several o! our family are huried.\" A hearty shake bands, and the old mari started off for Lb. Locks. And once again the wrter heard Liie strains o!fLthe Red River Jig. Many Eaglisii girls believe that tbcy will not b. wdded iaside o! twelve months unless tbey bavenat least one kiss under tb. mistietoe..la maay countries a berry is plucked from Lb. mistletoe with each kiss, and when there are no bernies no kisses are allowed. M,%istletoe used to be considered a charm or amulet t. ward off Lb. banefuul influence o! witches. It was also corisiolered that iLs influence was irresistible, that no one could possibly pass beneath iL without yielding to iW power, and hence i)otb mat non and maid must 'ubmit to the salutation wbich bhas since become customai'y. Tii, bolly, with its traditions and eus- toms, comaes down to us fron the Lb.d Romans and Tleutonis, and ,I)iinging in the hollv' used to be a matten of some cenemonv. 'lle good folk of Rutland, Eîîgland. neyer .bing hollv into the bouse before Christ mas Ev'e. beipving that to do so would entail upon tbem a vear of ilI luck: and in I)erb vshire it is helieved that the r\u003c,ugiîness or .-n,îthiess o! the hollv that cones 11110 a hîîuîe at Chrnistm-as foreslîado~wlîetlïer husband or wife wili ule during the coming yean. The super- etition that the holly ie t. remind us O! Christ's sufferine is of later onigin than most of the Chrietmnas customs. A littie Cbristmas carol, in the Christmas nuniber of \"Harper's Magazine,\" 1898, prettilY embodies this idea: 'Tii. hoily berry's red as blond, And the hoily hears a tborn; And the manger-bcd le a Holy Rood, Wben Jesus Christ was born.' In the. Black Mountains at the present day the, custorn o! b.aring home the Yul. log je stiilefully obeerved in ail iLs ancient detail . Tii, bouse-father feUls the ciioeen tree, tben he utters a prayer and car.fufly lifts up bis log and beane it home on bis sboulder. His sons foilow hie ex- ample, eacb bearing a 1og for huiself.- The fatiier then leans bisoflog up against the house, being caneful that the freshly cut end ie uppermost, the. lesser loge or onde surround it. As the father places eacb log he says, \"«A merry log day.' Tiihe mtbus kindled is not aflowed t. go out until the following year, or great evil wiil befaîl tbe bousehold. Portions of the. preceding Yul. log lighted the. now .N'S DO OR DIFÉ [abel Crawford Aye backto back they ame fghtimg RICh ai, and fanmer's son, Tii. antist bas lef t bis canvas And wieldse m.sord[ and gui'. The. playwnigiit bas left bie draina Unfinished as yemn go by- They bave placed their ail on the sitar, Canadians do-or di.! al Dr With a thougbt for bome and lovd ones, And a prayer for the. passing @OUl, Tbey bave beld tiieir fimes uadauated, li They bave kept the Hua from bis goal.1 The~ have carved tbem a niche in story, Wi theb torch o! patriot flame, Tiiey bave blazed thbe patii to conquSt-I But never Lb. way o!fshmo re glad we gave tbem, p'neath an alien sky, ur race of here- die! logs, and tb. remains of cach year'e fine were carefuily stored away among the bousebold treasures for this pur pose. In the. Highlands o! Scotiand it Î8, to this day, considered a great misfortune if the. fine goes out, and iL is said, \"Ta. nae luck, ye've let oot the fire.\" T'h, Yul. Io of England is chosea for its knots ani rugged roots a cross-grained block o! dmn beiag usuaiiy ciiosen, as it will hurm loner. This mced Lo b. decorated with garland s o! greens and ibbons and drawa ta, its place with much merriînent. Formerly Lb. mem bers o! a family and the guests sat down in turn upon the Yuile log as Lb. throne o! the Master of Revels or Lb. Lord o! Misrule, sang Yul. songs, drank to the Merry Christ mas and Happy New Year, and as part o!fLui. fr\u003clic ate Yul. dough or Yul. cakes, drank furmenty, spired ale, and from the wassail bowl. Then Lhev played Yule games, and flaally kindled the Yul. log from brands kept. from Lbe prevîous yean. Herrick wites: \"KindIe the Chrismas brand, and then 'l'ill sunneset let iL îurae; Which quencht, then Iay it up agea, Till Chistma.9 next returne. \"Part must be kept, wherewitlî to tecnd The C'hristmas log next yeare; And where 'tis safely kept, thîe fiend e Can (Io n) iscliief tiiere\u003e.' A simailar custom was rtained on the. Continent called Souche de Noel. In Nor- ro1k and other counties, as lon gs any part of the Yule log remained burnin;g, lý the servants were regaled at their tàéals with the best of eider and aie. The early English and Irish Mople mlied Christms the \"Fst of Lighta\" ând used to burn the \"Christmas candi.\" which was 80 large as to buru several igbts beforo being coneuxned. It is one )f the moat interesting of the Christmas customs, for very early it wae made sym- bolical of the \"Light of the World,\" and ts burnine became a eré'oua obeervanFle. Whether iL wes, e clied, a pagan ite, offered to the s\"n for its returming w'armth at Yuletide, 18 not resu ykiiowu. Used as a Christian symbol, hiowover th Christmas candie grew larger anJ rgruntil it aasurnod such huge dimen- sions as to lust the whol. twelve nights of ho holidays. The candi. was of ton or- namented with a laznb, typfical of the Lamb of God. Theso cmndles are stili sold in varlous places at Christmas tlxno. In the buttery at St. John's Ceous Ox-\u003e ford may stian ma m au n st eoue ;ÎandIestick beariag a fig'A of the Lamnb. This mvahiok li.d to b. placed upon cra6 \"hig h table\" eaoh of the twolvê ni taof the Christmas festival, and in it 'umàthefamous candi. of St. Johi14s One of the Christmas games qoe4 si l'jumping the Mcadlçç1\" ,rw.1ve aindlés, reprs ing the*enths of the. year e plcdat intervals on the floor, and euoh person in turn wu e quired to lump over tbem. If ail were sucoessfully fpssed ver and stili burned brightly, .odfr tune would be the. jumper's durngthe coming year; but if any candie flamo wae put out it betokened ill-luck onung in the month iL represented. If al oro put out, the bachelor or niaid who coin- mitted the direful deed would not only not marry during. the coming yesr but might expeot adisappointment in'love. This cuatomin l now uned on Hallowma- night.1 A huiidred years ago the English chan- dlers ueed to pay tribut. to their patrons in the forin of huge mould candies, and the coopers presented their patrons with great loge, called Yul. doge or blocke, and direct descendants of the Yule 109. The poor littie Punitan children were not allowed to kecp Christmas, hecause to, do 80 savored of xp-,,ry ini their eiders' eyes. Governor Bradford on the second Christmas in the New Worid, 1621, wîehed people to work, but if they would not work th.y imust not pl%; if tbey kept Christmas at ail iL muet as a 'maLter of devotion.\" One tbing, however, the children did have in tb. early day. of New England wus tb. \"Christmas can- de Thin candi. was bome-made of tallow, large with the wick divides at the lower eni to forin thre l1s while at its hcart wus concealed a quill weII fiUled with gunpowder. On Christmas Ev. it was lighted, and tbe quaint littie Puritan folk sat around it, telling stories, until siiddenly the candie went off witb a bang, filling thé children witb glee and'giving them their only taste of holiâay fun. It is sai(l that Christmas trees were used, tapaegifts upon as early as 1632; tbey crilywere hy 1744, a Goethe in \"The .8orrows \u003cof Werther\" alludes to the cus- to)m. lFrance adopted the Chrixtmas tree about 1940, and l\u003erincc Albert introduced it into Etigland the fir8t,(iîristma.; after his marriage. The Qucoin keepe up this eustom, having a tree for bier own ifts, on. for lier children and grandchil- dren, and one for the bouebold. Since then the etustom has hecome world-wide. The \"'lree of! CanIesf,\" iii of more ancient date. There is an old French romance o! the thirteerîth century ini whieh thehemo ses a tree whose branches f rom top to hottom are covered with burning candies, while on the top is a figure of a cbild shining with a' stili greater radianoe. This tree symbolized humanity-the up- p er lights heing the souls of the good, tbose i elow, of t he wirked, while the child repre- sente(iChrist. From the Noise mvthology comeâ the suggestion (À the Churistmas tree CANADIA By h There's mmayheatinthe Northlsd That longs for an absent one- EThre's many a widowed moLlier Who mourne for an only son. Tii.y le! t the plow in the. funnow, MAnd the axe in Lb. balf-felled treS -Offering their lives for the. bonon O! tiie Motherlan\u003c1 o'er the. cea. IThey sprang int. ling at tbe bugle, And waved us a gay gond-bye, But their bearts as steel were weldedy For Canadians do-or di,! =And some o! thein feul at Ypres- Ia the, tbiik o! the, fist advanoe; EAnd some of tiien sleep unlisted Befces, Somewh.re in France! DearGCod! We a Tbough they slee We are proud o! Canadians do-o1 crn sng, leeds will But time e use clear, nger ren It for Sthe oket Ury's ce of r six SwelI ti me. tolt rnited oday, ,skia ior cm r with det and4 powdmr 2 Shet- 1, 11 il Il im 111 , il 11 IP 1 T Il: 11, P! 11 Vil Ill il -1 , 1111 , 1 111J 91111112UIIIIIIl 51",
         "THE WESTERN HOME MONTHLY astypicalof the n.w-born sun inithatitwas bedecked with lights, and was an embl.m of spring on account of ita rich green. Probably the Nerse mytiioleFywas the origin ef the. \"tree of candles' more than of the. present Christmas tree. On the introduction of Christianity the Christmas tree,. although net knewn then by that name, became the. type ef Christ. The folowing quotation from L. P. Lewis gives these embleme of the Christ- mas tree: \"The tree itaelf stately and tall, was syblcal of Hie Majety and grandeur; thegreen, of Hie Hiedln and immort- ality; the hights, of Hie giory and of the. Star in the East, and the angel on top (which was then neyer omitted), of the aneewho gave te the ehepherds the orsstîll spoken eaeh Chrietma Day, 'Peace on earth, good-will t en!.' WHEAT HAVE YTou DOUE? 1By Wyune May Whst hAve YOU don. for your country? What have YOU done for your flag? Hav\" jou answered the clarion oeil for Dees your patriotiom lag? Think of the.ad\" i the trenches, And the boys in blue on the mea; Gi\"i~ their ALL in Democracy's cause, Fightiug for YOU and for ME. Wbat have you don. te help them eout? Have yeu don. aueht but sing and shout? Siugiug and shouting are ail very weil, But its MEN and MONEY and GUNS that will tell On the. battiefield. When w, meet the. Hun, It'e man for man, and gun for gun. Rive you given the wealth of your ceffers? il4ve yeu worked for the cause that je Dees your heart turn cold at the TRUTHS that are told 0f the Prussians, greed and luet? Tbink of the. rp. of Belginin, Of the. womanhood that waB deffledl Picture YOUR girl in the ciutch of the. best,' Bearig a Boche'a ciild. Get lute the figit, the thick of it, The time bas gene b y for doing your bit, Tiiank God for the cane of gving your ALL To conquer the. Hun, te heip in his feU. For fail he muet, this mouster of sin; Se give your ALL, for WE'VE GOT TO WIN. SHIPS THAT PUS By Mary A. Park. Or one short heur, across the mystie sea, The. troubled ocean we eall iife-you came te me. Our ships sailed close until tiiey touched in that dream-golen heur, I listencd te your wondrous voie, sur- reud.red te your power. For just on. heur, and yet I know my lif. Ca changed for a ye. 1 wonder if yeu gucssed my love before you went your way. Our shipe sailed cose, se close, my dear, I cannot hclp but feel Your knowledge that my heart is yours, in woe or wcal. Like seme gay pirate ship of old you stole my heart from nie, Then calm, set sait and icft me there on lif's uncharted sca. My woman's pride was woundcd when you did net. cer te cure, 5% But the littie breezes whisper that you thiîîk of me sornewhcre. And I, îny beart crics eut for you, rny dayis are dark with pain, 1 prw'i whatever gods there bc, te aicnd you l)ack again. 11 ti iizzle\u003cî me to uîîdcrst and vhy 1 shouid yvarii for vou, No' tliiiglit (If wooiîig nie you bcd lor t1î,îli 'Il f 1s w~e kiiew. luijt siitIii, nyi iViiiiiiost soul stirred w1il 1 I ii tvouai*ghiiec, And thvre a hope 11si i iiers tui lic hefate ýN i b i fi ( i) il]- i ii' , o v : - Thzt. o'eî*thle 1t jol! 1 iel\\ It i St)iliiig i îiî.k t ' in. mISS Manners opened the outer door ef ber fourth-fioer suite witb ber niglît key and saw Giiroy's letter where' it lay at bersfeet. She caugbt the. gleam of the oblong white even before she had ewitched on the studio lights, and she knew thi e éer was Giroy's by the beatiing of ber heart. Beaides h. bad net written for ten days and, though she wasn: the. least bit in love witii the writer still when letters that have been coming twico a w.ek suddenly and un- aecountably stop coming- A young Airedale dog came bounding throegi the tudio door and leaped upn ber wih rapturous wet caresses and tbe bundie of sketches site bail been carrying fellt, e i fleor while ah. gave hum bis usual nightly welcome. Thon, bencath the rose-sbaded drop- light at ber desk she pulled ber gioves off hurriediy and took up the. letter again. Witb brcath that camne rapidiy Be turn.d it over and over realiing mn a dasaed way that it was \"different.\" Pr.- seetly ah. became aware of two aatound- ing facto. Tii. letter was light and tibm, and it waa postmarked \"Quebec.\" Gil- would have expetd-his recoveriflg 80 quickly and coping home. The letter just before this one had giveu ber ne hit of such a contingencyiu f act b. had then been cosily recuperating from a wound or two in an English hospital and but for the desire te meet ber as ho said, he was quit. content with bis surroundings. \"But of course my sin had te find me eut, Mr. Riiey,\" she murxnured as the dog gave a sharp littie bark of sym- pathy and then snuggied hie nose iu ber lap \"AdIm in for it nowl! Oh this onely sodier ciaptrap! Itsa my belief they're net hall se lonely as they claun te be.\" Oh why had she ever writteu him! Why had se sent Grace Deering's photo? For of course it wlas ber pretty face he bad failen in love with though h. said it w'as ber lettera. 5h. knew men! But it had aIl began se innocentiy and ail the girls were doiing it. How ie detested Graoe Deering! Who or what Grace De.ring was se badn't the faint.st idea. There were net many pretty girls ithe ncwspaper, office where Mise Manners bad ber desk Beside the inany thousands of prisoners that are captured or give themselves up te the Allies, there are many such dumb animais as the one seen in this British officiai photo that do likewise. This German messenger dog wandered inte the British lines. where he was cap- tured. A British officer is removing the message from the dog's collar. roy's othier letters werc aiîvays se fat and huiky tiet hldtliey been civilian- inailed lie would have hed te pay excesa postage each time, and hitlierto they lied borne a foreigun postmark. Quebec wvas dPicoucrtingly close. Her quick mind seîv it ail even before sie bad termiopen the envelope. He was in Canada and lie expccted te cail upon lier. 'SStemust prevcîît that. He mustn't ever discover hiow site lied cheeted bim. M71ben site hll read the few lines site steaidied liersieif agaiîist tii. table, lier mid ini a mlîirl. Tiien slowiy sie re- read the message, as tlieughi tr-iiig to tiîid a loopfluole tiiere. But it wcs amaz- iîîgly direct as si.tkiieuv the îîriter must bc, anid thte veiui of Iligb hIope in ~ iiit liiud been peîimed, ~the not -to-be-Iut-otî- aîiy-ltîuger foilie malle lier hecrt btaît raîîdtll w iti feair or scimetliiug akin to if.Ms tlîîîr rathler 1riled lier.seif oii the cse xv ith hivii Iisie coîjiticoîtrol dîiîîlt situiaîtion., aîîl diieuît e1. lire va tî- riglit ut lianid îliil w %,tiîl taîx ail lier iii,t2iiiiity. Mr. Eilv iiiinipatieit-a t lier si-id.e. lic'vaýiq'it rî-v iareîiîlo1'i at- fentiounuid t li. , lii- hiotir-tue tinie in n hici lie rv-ltiii Ili-ja tfiissed over. Site 1aî euli-.ls !a-u of ailioIe, ais omir tii lhî l- woi sm-a i' i I lit 'i I ~ ait zu ' Ih a-l ai- and when the Ceptain had askcd fer a photo of bis cherming correspondent she bad scrembied tbrougih the fyles and the cuts and bcd corne upon this ioveiy pic- ture. Without tic sligbitest hesitatien sic had possessed herself of it. Tlhe face ,%vas soiinsorne, se yvoung and fair end aitogetier pieesing thet she iedn't had tic leest doubt but thet any men voud fait in love at once with thc young Psyche. And it hîad succeeded only tee wieli, lier littie ruse. \"But oh hiow an I1te convince him fluet tîis pretty littie creature ihîît liiding in flic hackg.roiid (playing tricks te teae bini?\" inused 'Miss Maniiers desperateiy. \"I1e'hI -,%auit te biit me!\" She tried te persuîade herseif that sic -m-as naukiig a mîountain out of e miolehili. Vet iii lier beart sic kiew tiat Gilrov 's exi(tifbswould be keyed te fthe iilis pitchi aidi(l 1iat the disap- îîoiîînîtioi \u003cdl )1.a devastathiig oe for liini. It waîs snch a pitv! lier heart b-ait t1liickiv \\ lin -le tliuuîit.lit of lus letters,. fu li lie liaid siîil to lier- aiîd toi).thie tIi iiut- lie liai,1 ieft uiîiaîid. She iîou'hcNiiI o realiie tiait lic vas iotth fli - oioie hic foi- a leaithreak. amiiyait tillit iiitlie11vîaý1t luo nmoluis ,lie liaii-flt thle le.iiiut of ai \u003crt'ai huit aî '~I i lie luiadl î IclflicMeia. ~ ti a-- \"Lnîuî-î-- al nuirable sel-culi' a'1 II I, i-lprie to a sett t1ii V 1 '. Il i 'lie for I\\ 0. Il ,-!.I i it j i eiiîI APair of Alibis By Edith G. Bayn. ad evening off and Mise Manners' f riend nd co-worker Phyllia Ware usualîy dropped in at the tea hour on Saturday. There ivas a casserole disi prepared by Sonia and ail rcady to heat,1 and a salad, and as the pantry tonight reveaied aise a frcsh chocolate cake and a cold roast ,chicken Miss Manners congratulatcd lber- self that they would feast royally. She liîhted the gaslog and tiien placed the Japanese screen betwecn the utiiity por- tion of the studio and this cosy home- like corner. She brought out the best silver and carried the bowl of crimson carnations from the desk to the centre of the table. \"'Now if Phyllis will hurry! It's nearly seven and she's seldom so late.... Shall I tellllher the fix I'm in or flot? Iler advice would bie valuable and com- forting I've ne doubt if oniy I could ri4 inyscif of the fear that shc'd iaugh at mne.\"ý Ruminatiflg thus she fell once more into the perplexing train of thought that had Captain Gilroy for its beginning and its end, while Mr. Riley gnawed a liam boue with gusto on the rug. The emall dock, on her desk tinkied sCvCn. The wordlkof Captain Gilroy's short letter rushed tumiiltuously through lier mind again for he bad sa-id bie would be with her shortly aftcr seven to-morrow night. . . Wait! To-morrow? Ye gode! That meant to-nigbt! Miss Man- ners breatbed quickiy and a flush came and went on her cheek. She had been thinking she would have ail day te-inor- row te produce au alibi or think up a subterfuge! She rushed over te the table and seizcd upon his letter. \"0f what need to %vrite at any length w'hen 1 shall sc you se soon?\" h.e said. \",Soon, did I say? It scema an eternity tîli to-morrow night. Had 1 the wings of the wviîd. . . . But perhaps you'll iet me tell vou then hew 'to-morrow nighit, to-xnorrow night' has been beat- ing itscfif jp*,pMy brain with every re- volution of the train's wheels! Three monthes' leave-a gif t from the gods- f cil into my lap se suddenly it took away xny breath and I had ne time tu, cabie a word. I snatchcd the first boat and ber. 1 ar n the soul of Canada once again. Oh, my dear.. MNiss Manners did not finish the few lines remaining. It was.ail very absurd -and-and-wvell,ý she supposed she wouid have te sec the ghastly farce through. How w~as lier hair? She 'ruessedl it would do. . . .,Being rather levely hair it never lookcd anything else but attractive bier fricnds would have said. Had shc time te change into a nice f rock? It î\"as vcry siliy Of course but-but-whcn a man bas profbssed ndmiration for one in bi-weekiy letteT5 for a pcriod stretching over severRI month,. .. ..But it ivas Grace Deer- ing whom hce thoughlt lie was addressilg! Miss Manners wavered. Rer trim bine office dress wvas a trille severe. she did look more the Deering type ini that soft- old-biue ciinging gown with the cream lace at the neck.. . Per- Nins he wouid take the blow casier if- if 'the one %who was te deal the blow didn't look aitogefhier a frigit. Teu minutes later she was ready- Phyvllis liad net put in an appearance. .So Miss Manners telephioned and leariied that she lia\u003c bcd te remain at the office and se wouid not b. Up te tea tonight- Next 'Miss Manners calicd the depot and found that thc train from Quebec had just arrive(i. She could expect the Captain, then, any time noW. She lied not caten since one e*cloc,, Vet dile vst conscieUs of 11iunger. With a %vrv 4miie she glanced at the pretty tee-table, in ail it, attractive giisten and sheen. Grae Deeriig C011111 have invited lier visiter from ovfes~ te partake of the mcci witli lier. Mis\u0026 Manners. whien she had finished the un- cornfortaiile business ahead-welU. she -%oîilti ct lier supper alone as she did Sijx nitrýitts \u003cuit of seven. -Resttsl%-l she paccd about th ool lookin- froin tinie te timue at the ccick and liktening for the elevator-bt'Il. Per- L ba)s ie 1.1 waiiii- t di1(ý first. lie la d to ssedbis \u003e rai! V et suc knew lie %voulIdo1)noue . f tHic-c t]jing,. if lie were ini the city L 11e11iiiý s-bort'of an accident NVOUll kCeP hum awa2 the girl 1 Comedj it? She give way cal nattu flled iu ing those from the runiiing t already heart. heart! 1 -net forf able blis And ag know yo bridge ti that lie. your spil must Stil in Canad wonder- timea col Absurd on effrc dreamed 'Manners aside, pic a portie! yeur nat of ail gre are net s ail. VoI in the bi e yearu b strange r and I kn How 1 denying satiofyink Miss !lm letters t( Be.doue elevator throat. knocking long brea pis. an\u003c door. As she stood ti \"Miss Miss artist's * pieasîng H. was a thin br -eyes qualâty. without * smile. F entered, lier ivithi she indic W'hat she let]h laugi tI moment! \"Was- asked, p( 4trifi. bel the chai c tain Gilr \"'Only \"Th-'un wvav ani scbooibo. ence. \"Tlieri cicared i to take noted h tliat is s-tnd- She fi cert ing- taken ib vers- bandq a woîîld n d'ffdne -Of c agaïl], it ', S tlini-'' -1 an fIIiII, 1 ..oýt * is j",
         "THE WIESTERN HOME MONTHLY siers' f riend re usually LSaturday. repared by *Id a saiad, vealed aise cold roast ulated ber- yaliy. She placed the. utiity per- cOsy home- it the best Of crimson the centre It' s nearly at,. * ini or flot? e and com- 1 could ri4 'd laugh at once more iought that ginning and wed a barn esk tinkled roy's short bhrough her e wouid be Sto-morrow orow Ye Miss Man- flush came le bad been day to-inor- think up a ver te the tter. Sany length n?\" h. said. an eternity I tiie nings haps youl to-morrow been beat- Lii every re- els! Three the gods- t took away e tu, cabie a oat and ber. once again. L5h the few very absurd ppoe she liistY4 farce hair? She Being rather d anything ends would ,change into ily of course 1,8 profhssed eekly lette\"5 wer seVeI!5i Grace Deer- addreasing! vere. - - 1 ring type in gwl 'with ..Per- w casier if- a1 the blow was rcady. appearance. and Iearned at the office tea tonight. lie depet and Queblec had expeCt the. one ,'clock,9 Of litnger. ned at the L, attraCtive ),ering could n ovCeas te, 1, lier. Miss shed the un- d-we1i, she e as she did ut the rooo', the Cdock or-b\"'. Per- dinle first. n-l..se(l bis oli1 (Io) noue e ini the City t iVOUl'l keep The stranger cleared bis throat. \"I arn sorry te bave te tel ven that the Captain lis been ebiiged te rernain in Quebec on account of bis eyes. Fle-.\" \"Hlis eves!\" v«es on see they haveneyer quit. given hirn satisfaction since he ivas ai- most biinded, at tiie battle et--\" \"But-but lie neyer said a word te, me about bis eues!\" The stranger smiied. \"Naturaiiy lie-wouldn't waut te worry you. As 1 say, he basn't realiy recovered the tfu use efthtem yvet and though he rnanaged te get leave te cross te Canada it was upon landing that the. dotors decided te try te do something more for him betore be saw bis home people.\" \"Oh, I-I see. How terrible tiieugh! 1 bad ne ide-\"ý Miss Maîîners was now experiencing an odd sort et relief. Gratitude te tbis officer for sparing lier the ordeal ahe bad se dreaded overcame all se. She would aak him te bave supper with bier! \"It n'as good et yen te eaUl and tell me ail this\" ah. said with tbe first Omile ahe bad yet voucbsated hum. \"Ye- are?\"j \"A tbousand pardons! My name la Brtt-Lieutenant is my rauk.\" \"'Tien 1 tiiank yen kindiy iAeutenant Brett, snd, wile 1 am se sbocked about the. Captain-\"ý \"lIt la shoWkng, but they have bopes of saving tbc siglît et one and perbaps bappy te think 1 was'helping even If t ivere 80 s'aighItiy.\" The stranger seemed restles asnd iii at ease but before lie could speak ah. took up ber tale again, bier eyes on thie rug. \"Tii. letters tbe other girls get were full of-of blarney too and we thougbit it was ail riglit to-te put a littie warnth into ours-m eother words te ive as good as we got. Se many poor clîaps bave neither mother nor sister te -pet tbem. But unfortunstely ('apt.ain Giiroy after a tirne began te fancy hum- self in love mitli me. B- \"To fancy? He-he'd die for Yen!\" interjected tue visiter hotly. She looked up. startled at bis tone. \"Aait,\" she said, shsking ber head. \"Ile dees net even know îvhat I look like. I sent hum another girl's picture. Oh, I know h. said it was my personality sbining througb my letters, that it was mny humer, my littie tricks et expression and se on, but 1 knew that it was thie face otfttie girl hie tlîought 1 was. Men don't fal.l in love witb abstract qualities. They demand something tangible, cor- poreal.\" \"Thîis photo-h. kept reterring te it? Kept talking et the features and so on?\" Miss Manners pondered. \"1Well, no. Now that you mention t h. oniy spoke et it once sud that was te acknowledge its receipt.\" Tii. lieutenant bowed. \"«You'il wonder why I'm bering yeu witii ail these details.. But it's because 1 want yen te carry my confession te humn away from bier, that is to aay fr-om the girl he thougbt ah. was. Comedy? Or tragedy? Which was it? She wanted to laugh, to weep, toi give way to somte emetion of an hysteri-1 ral nature. But she id neither. She flled in the interval of waiting by pull- ing those three fat bundies of fat'letters from their bidiug-piace in the desk andi running tbrough several at random. She aircady knew parts of them ail byv beart. \"ýHow your iriendship gladdens my beart! I could not live I think were iti not for Saturday nigt-night of ineff-y abi. bliss-uight that bringa your letter.\"t And again: \"So well do I feei that It know you that my spirit can at wil bridge the. leagues of land and wateri that lie between us and commune with your sphIni. the. early dawn viien it must still be the dead of nigit with you1 in Canada 1 lie and think of you and wonder-wonder if your dreams some- timea contain a littie bit of me.\" Absurd? Why that almost borderedE on effrontery! And yet-sbe iiadi dreamed of hum more than once. Miss 'manners flushcd and toased the. letteri aside, picking Up another.E \"It is good to knew that yen tee bavea a portion of that divine diacontent In your nature whieh la the. motive power1 of ail great enterprisea. Men and womea are nt se fumdamentally dufferent after1 ail. Women crave a permanent Intereat1 in the. big thinga of lite tee. They tee * 'yearu bcyond the. akyline wiiere thie4 strange roads go dowi'! I have a sister sud 1 know.\" Hew h. understod! There was no denying It-his lettor had been eoul- satiafyiiig. Miss Manners ighed and returned the. Jettera te their drawer, and iiardly iiad ah. don. su viien the. sharp tinkle of the elevator bell sent hier iieart into ber tbroat. The next moment someone was knocking at ber outer door. l)rawing a long breath ah. summoned al ber wonted pis. and vent forward and opened the door. ÂAah. had expected, \u0026 mm luin haki atood there. \"Misa MannersV' h. que flrVely. Miss Manners noddod. Ber qulek artist's eye registcred a number of pleasing impressions. He vas an offier. He waa tal, ratiier lean ini build, with a thin brown face and deep-set dark oyes -eves with a curioua penetratixig qualty. And hie was regarding ber witheut the. vestige of an ingratiating rmile. She threw the. door wide and lbe entered, cap, in baud and tiien feilowed lier iithout a word into tii. studio viiere sh. indicated an armebair M'bat tack shouid ah. take? Or uiiould ah. let hum begin? 0f course she would iaugh the. whole affair off as eft ne moment! \"Was-was your train very latel' abe asked, peitely. \"No-yes-tiiat ia I beieve it vas a ~4trifle bebind,\" b.e said, watcbing lier tako the. chair opposite. \"eYou-rcceivcd Cap- tain Giroy's note?\" \"'Only a little while ago.\" \"Th-.n of course yen bave been expeet- ing-\" and lie breke off in a peculiar wvav and looked as embarrassed as a scboolboy caught in an set of disobedi- ence. \"There-there are some matters te lie cleared up,\" said Misa Manners, decidig te take the plunge at once when she noted bis difficulty in going on. \"- thlat is you-ef course yen under- s-tand-\"9 She too broke off. It was bis discon- certing steady gaze! lie had bardly takezi bis eyes off lier and but for the ver palpable trembiing ef bis big handq a% they twirled bis cap about sbe woîîld net have guessed at lis very real \"Of course ven understand\" abe began iigaîu, \"just lýpw it ail is, Captain Gilrov. It N\\as donc in' a spirit of fun rather -1arn not Captain Gilroy,\" hie -aide f11li11 ilis voice at last. ..Not Captain Gilrov! Then-then î\", la-t zshred of ariner fell away. -.u-.piciofl of a twinkle in bis evP more than a suspicion noîv. 5h. boflh eyes. ileat la vhat ho requires. No reading, neovriting-\"» \"X teed verguilty, yolb oy vas I te know? Be--yen knew tint ho bas written me twIce a week fer ever se long? - Re oniy missed wiile be vas crossing this time. R. ahould net have been allewed-\" \"LUt us nt werrY about lt,\" sanested tue stranger with a amile and Misa Man- nersalase smiled, but tremulousiy. \"Did yen ever go te tthe dentist in dread ever a toeth yen knew would have te cerne ont and have himn tell yen be couidn't talc. yen te-day sud would yen please cerne back next weok? Well, tbat's exact iy bow I feel at the. present moment.\" Hie ieoked puzzled, and was about te speak viien ah. went on: \"To change the. metapher, you've litted a milistone f rom my neek. I dreaded ae lîaving te face Captain Gilroy and tel lim about my-oh, it's tee sily! 1 don't knew how I'm going te make yen understand-\" \"I belie'.e I understand better than i-ou think.' \"'You sec, it wa5F sucli fun at tiret te get tlîo\"e letterg of lus,\" she rushed on. -I lia(] beeti ages since-well, sînce 1 bad liad imne for love letters. V'm a busy wonîaii. But .omne imoîtàs ag,()I1yielded to the entreaties of the girls and touk on some als 1 loilier corre-- I i .bit tiî. ia a iri rernained. 1I \u003ci 't kunil \u003eo i wrotv hiii tu-ice a rnonth for a Nhiie anîd thien once a weck. 1 feclt him, to bemy proxy, if youvilbe se good. Really, 1 can't go tbreugh vith the. absurd tbing a second tuie. Wil yen spare me the embarrasament aud break tue-ti. neye as gently as yen eau?\" 'l don't know abot that,\"Mid thO Lieutenant, grimly. \"Please.\"P Re appeared te consider. 91 realize I bave been foolieb, but vas he any le8s so?\" as pleaded. \"Ifyen couid bave read-\"ý «Oh, I know he's an Idiot-alwS.ye was,\" the. Leutenant remarked bsatily. \"Ne, ne! I won't have yen te ay a word againat hum,\" ah. saud quickly.. \"It waa mostiy al My own fault.\" He watched bier with smnoldering ad- miration in bis gieomy eyes and seemed hait envieus et Glroy. 11 may as 'wcii admit,\" she continued, witb an access ef celer, \"that I've been drawn into some sort ef thrail, too. Yon niustn't tell hlm this thougb. Tii. enue et utter impersomality that bis letter bad for me did net quit. take awsy the thriil with whicb I recceived esch one. 1 had te keep reminding myselt that they liad been written te Grace Deering, that it was bier face, lier personality that in- spired tlîem. 1 readl them as one readsaa beautiful story wbere someene else je siways the heroine.\" \"But vou place too mucb esephasis on that picture. 1-bave seen tuie pieture. It n'as pr'tty l\u003e't-not lr\u003catlîtaking. 1id b.e seiiul yvu bis in return «!\" \"No. H1e was always going te, viien they abhouid atrike a big town he saad. But 1sece now it was on account of his eyes poor chap. You will tell hum how sorry I arn?\" \"Yes. But first let me explan-\" \"Pýlease! We have discussed the euh- ject sufficiently dont you think 1\" \"But-\" \"Have you dined?\" \"Wlýhy no, I don't believe 1 have! I'd forgotten,\" he answered with a start. '«And I'M keeping you-\"» \"lThen de rernain and have a littie supper with me? Iv. been expecting a friend who bas disappointed me, no the table is laid for two. If you have any- thing further to say about-this matter you can say it afterwards. This je a bit conventional I suppose, but you wom't mnd V\" \"I slbouid aay not!l 1l b. delighted.\" \"'Youll have toecarve the. fovi. 1 al- ways malte Phyllis de it. \"Fowl? Um-m-m. Lead me to it.\" They both iaughed and with the. Iaugii ail diffidence vanished. Over the tea-table Lieutenant Brett lest the. remainder of bis gloom and be- came delightfuliy companmonable and entertainiug. Hie reiated a score of spri ghtly anecdotes pertainiig te trech and billet lufe, told tales of him eomnrades' bravery, but seidom dld ho speak of hlm- self and mot one etf ilro. Miss Ma- mce over the. teaming \"l suruand thes dainty sheil-like teacupe wvas qually at cse. A doe times ln the courue of the mea) she thanked her stars that t was this pleasant -young offleer ad bot the. other, love-strlcken, one vion thie goda bad sent te b. ber guest fe the evening. \"I wouid know you vers am artiat Juet by observing yen\" ii Istheenaai* r miarked, involuntarily, vhem tii.r lad risen. 'I su ppou. I do radiste a hcrrd pro- fessional atmoophere.\", \",Yoiidon' t! But ft'a the. way you do littie things. Thers la a» air of dis- inction la the. vay yen push back a chair or lit a cushion or arrange a puem of booksu. Différent from other p.OpLe' vays. Thon tuis gemi of a roos. Zola love it. Your oye. moten wheft they, Thousainds of under- nourished people have found thart -food - a scentific blend of nour. ishinig cereals ___helps vvor-der-fully inbuiIdir heal\u002bh brl happiress. Needs- no At. N. - On the defensive.",
         "THE WESTERN HOME MONTHLY elicounter bite ofglowîing color-like t hese carnations for instance. Yes, one would know yuu were the artist born.\" She was pleased, and brougbt out some t, atercolore for bis inspection. \"No less than five of Lake Ontario i a storm!l\"lho exclaimed. \"I'm a Marcb-boàrn cbild and tormy by temperamient,\" site explained. \"Besides, I was hem on thte shore of the lake.\" III love storms. They're inspiring, f îivifying. 1 toô iras born on the shore of Lake Ontario-in the village of Day- 8pringP \"Dayspring? Wby, se was Il Who iu th; world are yon? Wait. Are von a son of David Brett \" \"No, hoe was my uncle. My father was James Brett who moved west about tiirty years ago. Ro died and my mnot ber married again.\" 0f course, after titis, site feit io qualme irbatever about accepting hie invitation te the theater and the follow- ing day, which we.s Snnday, they went to Long Branch. A week passed, a weok full of pleasant meetings and littie trips, dinners and moter-rides and not once in ail titis time did either of them mention Gilroy'e name. t~ iiJ il, ~I4 if ~JL- Thon one aftemnoon, Whon Brett bad oalled te take bier out for dinner hoe re- marked that lite iad bad a telegram froni the Captain. \"Hae will be in the city to-mon-w:' hie said, in a casual tone. Miss Manners started. She had al- mo-t forgotten the Captain's existence. \"Hlie eyes Y\" \"Verv mucitbetter. Shaf-I bring h:m aronnd to eau \" \"Ne, no! It won't be necoseary will it? Couiat 3ou explain about-\"ý \"fle's really a very nice chap, Miss !.laîners.\" \"I kaow that.\" \"And every word in those letters hoe meant. I1ihave been îvondleriîig why 3you express su little interost inhim. Not once bave yen asked wbat lie looked like. Do yen not care-any loîtger?\" Miss Mannors cast liter eyes down. It ivas a searching question, one site had been afraid to ask berself. \"I itardly knoîv,\" site replied\u0026 \"I bave not given it mucli tbougbt.\" 'qWhy do you smile Y\" '«I ias titinking bow badly you pay the ole of Miles Standiqb's emissarv.\" Brett looked disconcerted. Mise Man- ters bÙsied berseif with bier gloves, and watebed Iimn frorn the mirror wltere sbe adjusted lier bat. \"Yu iditmd that Y\" site asked, penitetitly. \"I did, rather. Sornetbiflg I have never done and neyer will do is the Miles Stanidisît stunt. Let every man do luis own courtîng I say.\" \"Tiien uliy are you so concernied over tlie Captaîfs liîeart affairs? WVly are you soundiig me\"\" Brett moved restlessly f rom the win-. douî' and baek aurain. \"If I were to tell you why-\" ho bie- gan and broke off. -Go on It is only a little past five and wo have pleaty of time,\" sIte en- coiraged. Slie saw again that troubled, diffident look tîtat lie lad worn the flrst evenîng ,wien slie lhad confessed about tbe cor- respondence. Slie felt that hiv as in the Captain's confidence to a greater extent tlIan lho Nould admit. \"Fir-'t answer me a straiglit question,~\" hoe commenced, wkeeliiig about and fac- in- bier in grimi earnestfless. \"Thon 1 uili tell you-~eNerytlttflg. la your re- gard for 1dm serions?\" Site breatbed rapidly, ber eyes on his face. In titis humor site was almost afraid of 1dm. llow arnly hc bad stuck up for bis friend that first niglit! \"I care nothing for Captain Gilroy,\" site said nt length. \"ýHow shouid I1 vhen 1 have nover seen bu \" \"I arn glad of that,\" ho said frankly, after a pause. \"Yoit are-glad? Why T\" \"Because,\" said Brett with tense look and in a voice that vibrated. \"Because Gilroy is a married. man.\" Miss Manners bad superb self-control. She did not start or otherwise betray any emotion site may have felt. Rer companion came forw'ard a couple of steps and bient that keen glance of his on ber face and stili she did flot flinchi. Site stood titere, a dainty figure in oXI rose silk, the color accentuating ber clear pailor, the duli glow of the sbaded liglit on lier rich brown hair, a moeking glaxice in lier cool grey eyes. She had removed her bat the better to adjust the veil and now she smuled as ber fingera busied theniselves in the meshes of the fllmy fahric. \"Is it possible thet you-tbat this piece of news has no effeet upon you at al?\" tie dexnaW~ed. She looked up quickly and in that in- stant hie read soniething i ber eyes be- fore they feli again that made bis beart beat with smothering violence. A mno- ment he stood sulent and then with a boyish rush of ardor hie seized ber band -both banda. \"You know-you have gueesed that I love vou V\" be cried. She did not reply for a moment. Mien: 111 bave guessed-a number of tlîings,\" she said it a low voice, and drew back, forcing bim to release ber banda. «'Then-you know ?\" hie asked aftere, short tense silence. \"How did yon dis'- cover tîhe trutlit \" HIe wanted to asic if it made any differ- eîice in their comradeship but fear of lier answer withheld bim. Sbe wasnt amil- ing now. \"W'hy didn't you telnme tbat flrst nigt?\"'sbe demanded. \"And have spoiled our nicely budded frienidship Y\" \"You should bave told me. It --vas lîardly fair. 1 told you everytiîing.\" \"*Wlen I1hîad found you I laid just one deqire and tiiat was to be near you. Yon w% iii recollect tiîat 1 w-as oit the point of -confessiuîg xny identity but you insist- ed on closing the discussion. I really %vas going to be foolhardy enougit to let it ail out.\" Site sent 1dm a euddon bewildering \"Were you 9 Then I migbt possibiy find in it my heart to foirgive you,\"sIte niuriitired. \"'But your defeîtce is slim.\" \"And I arn smalfsouledý I like to pay folks back iin Iheir owa coin. I bave a kindly huart I hope, but I have also a very icalotis disposition. All week the tliougiîht of poo old Gilroy bias dxivea nie lhaifnad.\" \"But wlIiaît a poor dissembler yon are! Al week I bave known!\" \"Impossible!\" '\"We11, (ever since Monday. You re- member that deliglitf ut old Inn on the lakeshore wvhere tiîeyrnake you write vour order oni a pad*?\" \"Bv Jov e!\" \"Aiyout really do niake yotir capital hisiike o one else in the vorld!\" le rni1ed ritefuhiv. \"After all, the question ie amn 1 for* I suppose050 .\" \"You say tliat grudgingly. So 1 sUP- pose it is up to ne to do0 sorno frtier cçiiciîittiîîg. W cil, I1 rote evtîry letter voit receiel dblit oilytlhe first three %vCre \u003clotie for (Gilrov-. Tliat Nvas beeause Of lus eN-es Didi oit not ice 8a dicre)aitcy lu Wlii tuetiiir\u003cl an(l the fourth letters! .-Titat was dute to two thinigs: flie flict tliat I biad resolved to keep you -foir a corr-espondent. And tule fact i1iat jit-t tiien G ilrov iîad fit 11hýad .(,\\er ivar. il, love wjthi ai EnazlIisit girl. (TlIeN W\u003cr11,0 andt \"' (a1t ll l.\u003cron t lie ailte supw iiite. ,o0 i 1jlii k Iî l v o 't, c e 1 vI c lIi\u003cl jaike vJoli, on* as-. uc1 as se' en otiier voung v co ,ýrl,,.poiteflts lie lhad becît i\u0026 tOuch t with. ladY'e t\"An( dierI! Miss 3 \"O0h, ,werefl tlîem soldiei \"cAn that- vour Mis reaCiti on thi contii happe tic b moth, ber 1 done amat it. the c \"iq hope the1 \"éT in ti thini site Sion Nvhei Eliot. I",
         "THE WESTERN:HOME MONTHLY with. Gilroy, 1 f ear, is something of a ladY's man.\" \",And hie called himself la lonely sol- dier1! What of the other seven ?\" and Miss Maîners made ber tone cawual. -oh, they were well enougli but they 'wereu't like you. 1 just distributed themi around te some genumne lonely soldiers.'\" \"And the picture of Grace Deering? Is tbat--,,.as that the startin ', point of- vour interest ?\" \"In a way.\" Miss Manners stiffened perceptibly and. reached f or hier hat where it had f allen o n the arm of the chair beside lier. \"But not in tuie way you think,\" hie continued. \"You see, Grace Deering bappens to be My sister.\" \"Your sister! Are-are you joking\"' \"Not at ail. This sounds melodrama- tic but it's true. I told you that my mother had married again. Deering is lier name now. Grace had that photo doue when she was iu some kind of amateur theatricals and the papers rau it. 1 recognized it at once of course.\" qI oughlt to have looked the name up in the city diretory!\" \"iSo you should. But even so, let us hope you would have used it anyway- the photo, 1 mean.\" \"lThere Nvas only her name ou the card in the f yle. But I will apologize to hier xiow of course.\" \"She's a V.A.D. in France. I don't think I even know hler present addressi she inoves about s0. Thiere is no occa- sien for an apolog\"Y. llad I known jusI Nvhere she was then you may be sure1 shjould have asked hier if she had a f rien( 'II thought he Iiked me,\" said Brett, wonderingly. Miss Manners laughed. '*Keep your distance from me and he will. Ife and 1 are the most inseparable of oldI sweetbearts. Perhiaps in the course of the next six months lie May b\u0026orne used to your dropping iu-\" \"SI;ix menths! Dropping lan! Why the rascal thinks he's your major-domo I believe and would ask me if miv inten- tions Nyere serious I suppose, if lie had a tongue to speak. . . . Listen here old boy. We three are going to be mar- ried on Saturday. Get that Y\" \"Saturday!\" exelaimed Miss M,%anners, weakly. \"Saturday,\" repeated Bret t, firinly. And lookingr at lus determined jaw she knew better thai to contravelu'. 'rhis wvas the ifirst decisive action of lier if e that she had allowed someone else to control and it seemed quite natural arnd altogether agrreeable! As for Mr. Riley, deep dowu ia his canine lieart he liad always liankered for a master and \"a man about the bouse.\" So be barked bappily and snuggrled bis rough Dose into the Lieutenant's lap. Littie Bite o!funPI Mrs. Starr was prferviflg peaches ini rher blue-and-white kitchen, amid an array of glass jars, covers, paraffin, rubber tbands, and so forth. Mar\"art, aged four, watched the mysterlous process quietly, until the fruit ;t was in the jars andthe covers ready, thon I she cxclaiined ecstatically, \"'Oh, marmee, A please Jet me put the garters ou!\" A richlyburdened pyrainid. called Mqiss Manuers vbe vas fond of playing practical jokes! Not Of course tliat it would have done me any good. But I1 as deternlined to Pierce tbe piquant littie mystery if it took me !seven yeu'rr5'.\" \"I suppose you thougbt I was ashamn ,d. of My o,,%nuface. inm not. It's a good substantial sort of face, and-\" \"It's a beautiflil face.\" \"c-and I1 ouldn't change it for that of a Venus. t is a wonder the Captain didn't object te your using bis name.\" 'le did. StrenuouslY. But 1 pointed ont to bimi that if 1 begran to use My ownn vou would set mie down as a fresh guy ai bave nothing to do with me. Ifsa onie thing for a lady to offer to write a lonely soldier but quite anotlier thing for 1dim to tlrust himself fornard. I just coulda't take any chances! Sýo I secured bis grudging permission on the under- tanding that I wvould enligb11teii you as soon as wve had hecome friends. But needless to say 1 never read any more letters to bim. You were mine. And Saturday niglats -vere beavenlV ights'!\" When, ten minutes later, Mr. Riley camne %,alingr sedately into the room from bhis own particla;r corner here lho liad been luxuriatiflg in an aftthruoof siesta hoe found them sitting on the wicker chaise lounge in wvbat the poots eall \"sweet proximuitV\" and lie wasn't going te have it. So with a uroNvl of vanine displeasure lie thrust hi,- own ,wirvhiaired form bet-ween tliern ani re- fu.'\"'d tobc placated in any w ay *v the caresses and blandishments of tihe Lieu- tenrant Five out of Seven American Housewives now use what are_ known as combinatioti or double- acting baling po*ders. This style of baking powder has two actions. It acta first when cold water or niilk is added in the mixing bowl. Its second action requires the heat of the aven. Tiis strong, double leavening power is what is needed for the 1eavy war floansd wheat flour substitutes. EaGG-O is a pure, strong, doale-acting baking powder that Canadian housewives are fnding just right for war-time baking. It bakes light, easily-digest- ed, deliciously flavored bread, cakes. and tea biscuits. If you are having trouble wîth your baking, try Egg-O iinstead of the ordinary baking powderu. YouUilb. delighted with the resuits. Egg-O Bakig Powder Co. Ramilte1, Camails ROBINSON \u0026 CLEAVER'S% IRISH LINEN i Wrd Renowned for Quality \u0026 Value Ilt Probable Miatake, A man entered a restaurant and ordered chicken. The chicken was evidently togfor when the waitrcm nh behel the diner inï a great state of wrath. \"Waiter,\" he said, \"this chicken is very tough.\" \"'Very sorry, sir. That chickei wss always a pecliar bird. WVhy, when we came tg kill it we couldn't catch it, se at last we had to shoot it. t flew on the housetope, and-\" \"Ah! hat accounta for it; yoýu must bave aliot the weather-cock by mistake.\" Se Wanted Somne A boy was taken by his father into a restaurait for dixîner. As they were eating their dessert the father handed the waiter a five-pound note, wvhieh that worthy carried te the cashier's desk, returning prescntly with a little pile of change on a plate. The little lxo-v's eyes g0w bright. \"Oh, papa,\" he said, 'l Skea plate of that, too!\" A Smile By Gracc G. Bostwick 1A little thing and yet it turns the key 0 f many a \u003co\u003cr to let God's sunshiniln; It. lifts the sufferer from bis sense of pain ' And turns the tcmpted heart away from sin. 1It saves the day, when, brokcn itb the strain. L'The wear 'v one looks Up and seeos its hirth; . 'i s uch a little thing-the smile of man- Arl et it sweetens ail the trials of earth. the Irish Lineru lndustry-they have a fully cquipped factory for Damask and Linen Weaving at Banbridge, Co. Dowm ; extensive making-up factorles at Belfas ; Md for the finest work, hand-loom* am mamy cottae h.....The following are exampica : IRISH TABLE AN4D BED LUNZN. IRISH CAMBRIC HANDKERCHIIS Dain.t%k Table ClutbI. site àa à 3yards. -Ladies*Lanen Hentitcheii. lrom 8S8 U trom $192 each. aàz x6yards. f rom prdoo.Ladies' Embruèdefed Haid- $214 each; i46 xz 3yad.s. frm 0478 k rc lci. ro 3 la rdoen. Geailb- cahi Uamrask Table Nàpkins.to0nul..b. nîcîl s Linien HenîistiOe\u0026 hu SSII PM' #rom 82-84par dotea Linon Siieets. doten. Khaki HandhombChAo«M33te sire z yards. irom 01148 per pair. s'a PU dusem Pillo'WlCasei. slo ig Za30Io rcheOs. IRISH COLLAS AND SilIMS-JOu rom $1 a per pair F.mbroldered Linos celebrated Unmn-Iced Cash. Collai' te beipred. f roi 744 eah. Emhroid- eery sixie aid shape. 8-a per dom tred LiienPIiwSIaifltrimlS21cah. White Stirts for dress or day wea. f li Helistithed nec H\"kToweii. ro 51U .acb. Ofod or Zephyr Shirts. frm per dos- il IS ach. NlerceriseciTwili, f rom 50SM -h Ii M Medium Weîafht fashionable eddt.36 tuSWI4S.*48 por yar Kme Md (.tine :anch es Im s. 08M 1 JlluetratedaPrimt Land S 144 e lu sO re S gmy parS ef the worid. Spucial ore sud p«80on128 atteutiom d.voted ta GOIOmialà Foreiga Ordue. ROBINSON \u0026 CLEA VER sa8u Donegali Place, D BELFAST9 IRELAND. Wh.cs rritinq evrtertie, Apleeaer mtfron Thr WestrnIHome .fntly 4- .-,.\u003e* -- g - is on lis ialmost ho had niglt! Gilroy,\" 11 I when frankly, mse look \"Because F-control. e betray elt Rer ouljI of e of bis finchi. e in o'I ber clear ded Iighit g glance removed veil and he filmy bat this n you at that ini- eyes be- us beart . A mro- à with a her band d that I rit. Then: f things\", rew back, d after, you dis- ar of lier sn't smil- that first [y budded t -nas d just one yoii. YOU e point of ,ou insist- I realy ugh to let enldering t possibly yýou,\" slw P, is slim.\" ike to psy 1 have a ive also a. week the ia drven r you are! You re- nu on the you write our capital amn 1 for- e I sup- mee flurtlier VerV letter tlre ivere because Of di 4epany rtb letters? :we thingS: :e kep you îîi te fact gil irl. kil,( i nd ,COIUId 4take AIler vouig eel il, touch I apier molum §dents mer tralwsOP\u0026 By AprckAýt LL\" 1 zl 8 1 zS ýl,",
         "10 THE WESTERN HOME MONTHLY Use the left over meat. Even the smallest portions can be made into appetizing dishes when combined with a small quantity of BOVRIL It is but fittin.g that our gifts this year should be of a -permanent nature. Years hence there will be a sentiment and historit interest at- tached to them. These are historic days-the greatest that have ever been. In years to corne these are the gifts that will be remembered by succeeding generations.' This will be the greatest gift-gilving Christmas in the lives of amy of us. There's a long res- trained depth of feeling that can find expres- sion in gifts as ino other way. Let these be Iasting gifts. For instance: A Dhamon Ring, f rom ....... A Platinum and Diamond Brooch or Bar Pin, from .. A Platinum and Diamend Neck- lace or Lavalliref rom.. A Tea Set, Sterling or Fine Silme-Plate, from ........ A service of Flatwame fr0.... A few choice Pieces of Silver- ware, from............. A Toilet Set, Ebony, rw Ivory or Miler, f rom...... $25-00 UP $40.00 UP $75.00 UP $15.00 UP 814.00 UP 85.00 UP 89.50 UP These are but a kew of the many suggestions from our elaborately illustrated Catalogue- just off the press. Send as Your Name a nd Address for a FREE COPY TO fISURE ENGRAVING- Owing ta a universal shortage of eom- petent engravera, articles to b. engraved must b. ordered as soon as possible. Delays wil mean ultimate disappoint- ment. To enable us to give the usual Dingwall satisfacto1y service place your orders early-now, if possible. D. R.Dîngwall, Limited WINNIPEG STrade Marks PATENTS and Deslgns Write f or booklet andci orelarr, terme, etc FEATHERSTONIIAUGH \u0026 CO. Fred. B. Featicrstn,îhau2zh. 1 C. M.G. Gerald S. Itoxburglh, B.A. Se. 18 Canada Lite Building, Portage Avenue (Corner of Main) WINNIPEG! RUN IT YOURSEI l'ou can oiiily leaiî to ru steamn engillos by 6t uîly inff Yeunjg Englneer's Guida Save thcp'z,.mf hiring gne gin\"er. B-.kieî!. revi'-, te)254 Eî.iti-îr~o. i domd igiîî1 hîîîîllacturv and leaiiig i -ii -i'r mhere. Pi iii I, i ii 11.1 po.,tpaid 82.00. Wud»« Supply (Co. w:Ildsor. O munisuîChristm as Ni netee n Eighteen umîîmiim Greetings Frwm Bonnycastia Dale. To my Readers - NOTHER wonderful series of ~M~Nblesed days have fornfied a year smoe I1Ilut wrote ta you 'tthe glad Cbristmas time. I-do moet smncarely hope that the dear one who have fought for you and I on that fearful battle front in France will have happy thought.s of home this day. I ask you ta rejoice with me that Laddie Senior bas returned, arias wounded, but cheerful and convalescing. (Our good editor in hie kind message in the Auguet number referred ta him as Laddie Jr.) Mis long stay in hospital, with two operations for that shrapnel tomn right Jung, was bravely borne. Laddie Junior, aur young assistant photographer and nature student ie welI and happy, and bide me sand bis Christmas wishes ta the -aY readers that hear of bis exploite and, saw bis faoe often pictured on the pges off this real home monthly. if ail Ethe mgazines kept thair pages sa pure an twoleeome as the one you are reading this world would ha a better and a happier Place, as tha editor on his printed page is the aountrywide teachar of the young - While I am happy in the consolation of the Gunner at-home-once-more, and of the \"tep angle of the roaf, mercifully bringing up againet a chmmney, thence hie fear liriven way led down a fragile water pipe, it luckily did flot break until ha was haif way down and he crashed, scared but safe, through a dense filam inta a tulip bed. (\"I do hope I mashad those tulipe deep,\" ha told me afterwards).\" Then off ha fled, with bis littie whita shirt hlowing out hke a distress signal, down the dim streets and sbadowy lanes ini the outskirts of the big city rigbt inta the courthousa square he and sought safety fromn hie imaginary hoet of pursuers beside the staff that daily flaw the big Union Jack. OMlY a second later, so it seemed ta bin, ha was rudaly awakened hy a big policeman. \"Get u you ïoung tramp and get home out f ths-'\"Plfflsir, I ain't got no home',\" -hae tuttered, \"No home?\" \"No, ir, but 1 liva at the 'Lilace.\" Alas, too trua, ha had no home, and ha was weil trounced when the Lilacs was awakened at two of a summar mormàng. Ha aotualiy ata with Dash, the big red Irish setter, as ha naively tald me. \"Weil, you see, Dash don't make fun of a felier while he's catn' \" Now as puihment \"or running away what di\u003cI the-y do ta him? Only made lm drink muetard and water! The well-known treachery of the C.errnans is 'ninimized by the Canadians, who simply refuse to talce chances. Every prisoner brought back is subjected to a close scrutiny and thorough search by the Canadian officers. In this photo a Canadian officer is shown searching German prisoners captured during the battle of Cambrai. -the glorjous youth of the younger one; what a wonderful wellspring of bounding - osand hopas and casties-in-the-air a boyis, there is yet the sad undercurrent that hothyouand I have dear oneswbo w'llnotrcturnfrornbattle My heartgoes out ta you ail thie sacred day in deopest sympatby. Idowantto tell yourny carnest conviction that after peace is esta'\u003eI«.shed over with the (lermans heaten and penitent -thora mnuet be no more war. I think if we can thoroughly overcorne the jealousy wve bear towards our neighbor we can destroy the jealousv one nation bears another, for nations are composeed of -neighhors, too. I heard the head of our -groat university say, \"WVa must either stop making war or stop raising fam!ies.\" -Now to My stomy. Ful Heart and Empty Arms Some vears ago while on one of my -naturai history trips, I had the greati l)rivilege of heiping a wee bit waif. His story overflow-ed w vith sorrow., But a -= abe in 3ecars lha b:ui lc.1 averx-football ,ie for a crowd of \u003cîverfod fellow i)oarders,1 - beving their over 'v 'eek and aI al, wearing lheir ridiculou.slv tiio largo boots anid LF ilycut-down cuiflis. I lis iiiglits were in iiihts of dread .-aslie w as firced tii Sleep inthe great iia a~1d.t t leof the 1Hui ramhnlig str-uci îîrc :îîd the wiiiged douions en-andfaiiesofhis sliitnersti \"dAndfie f tîL. ~ src Ilim in angrv 'i.!:iî-atrll of '~tbcxn.,lîut lhoN- imid 111cr lt leN ium- rteli \u003clm- night. uni t lc:r the terrir nt. ozi. liewrhocrepi t Ur l nd sil id c\\i «'And if you don't keep it down l'Il give you more, was the thraat that accom- panied it. Ahl this done to a boy of ten yeare of age. One day among my mail 1 got a latter from a friand aeking if I would do a share in snatching a youngster frora this kind of deviltry. I always think the person who did the cruel things wns demanted, of course, I did what you would have done, took the share offered and gladly, too. I went with a lady friand ta mea \"'Nimmy.\" She just snatched him Up and kiseed him, and the poor ittle ampty arme clung to hior, and ia a great passion of woeping ho cried,' \"Oh,' do kies me again, 1 nover had one before.\" Strangor ns she was she w-as eobbing bitterly and my old oe'es were moist, too. That wee scarecrow, ho hiad shoes big enough'to make hlm knickers and knickers emal enough to make him ceuifs, and his shirt ias nondcscript, and bis coat did not seemi to heiong to him. Off she rushed us to a clothing store and tbey stripped 1 lia youtigster bebind the curtain ta spara yoîîr blusies-and clothed him aneîv froin head to foot, nover mind if the proprietor-Ill lbave you charitably to gules bis nationalitv--did cbeat us unmnercifully. You eûght to have seen Nimmny clutcbing a~nd feeling tho-se cdothles, and dipping bis bande down in numnerous and sundry pockets. and wbea ho founld a fanex- handkerchief aNva.V dom-n in one, to hear bis jovous *'Oh!\" wvas a treat. but the sad refrain muet conîe, he said, -Goshi, the'ie pants are good and thiî'k. I guesz-44hey can m-hack me now%ý xithout my ,-elling.\" 1'ha à sow what d rt on hish then feil ovar of 8 ali ceh] orgaql and t( way had gr, The sharne-f i ,nl these lit' î\"Must 1 g!vE whoOP of J03 Now into a c ralhomne wlI lad y just n . look the w-al lcissiflg and she PromnPtlb and emipty a Ail theis Now 1 arnk where the sN Bleep, and 0 letters, f rom lIfe in a gr fter the de in the groat rings ina my Of my life ha ýrance oa 1 be hie bod, guard him-i\" wonderf ul t N 's witb its trailîng gi its swifli mnightv %Vi Jules\\Vr, lus thenin i the greate 50011, pa road varui gas drill. (jerlîla l- of thei V lightl\\ gam met ltlw S is tI- bit. g il i l, k. ' 1 P er -manent Gîfts r ~for a Peace Christmas 10 1",
         "THE WESTERN HOME MONTHLY j'What! I ai't neverzo go hack agftin.'( ,NOw what do you think he did. sto-d t gton bis hands and then on lus lîend. then feîl over on his back ai(l ashwe of srnall change andt knives and nuilih organs and tops that ian5sonie iiraculoit.s ba ad gro,%Nfl Up in thiise porkeùs.i Trhe sharne-faced w'ay i w hch hie piclked SUl these littie trealstires Uip andt said, tiNust 1 give 'em Al back, then such't whoop Of joy when shie shook lier licad. Now into a car she ruslhed us and off to a reat homne,%here a seet 01(1 silver haircd lady just naturalty opened lier arms anîd took the wnif in. lie seenied to take tri kiçsig and cuddling sa nntural thzit she promptly christened lîin \"Ful heart, anid emiptY armS. AUl this happened irnan.y years agui. Now 1 arn several thousand miles froi where the sîveet old lady sleeps bier l:îst Bleep, and on my desk. lies a group of letters, from Nimmy. 11e tells me of bis Ife in a great Amnerican city, hitwv lie -rmtI enlisted.as earty as lie could ater the declartition of '%ar, of lus hfc in the great soldiers' camp, one sentence rings ina my ears, T\"eFlc routlcst moiieiit of mny life l .ias corne. l'în'selected to go to ÉFrace on the staff of the C.(). We'll be bis bodyguard, too, and wor't w'e guad hiîn.\" By now' lie lias made thait wonderful trip of the modemn Armada The snow girl. with its olutstafll(lill« 1am(1 lcating 91 trailng gmardslu, il s dam't iag destroyers its sw.ii I l,'laiiiiî'htll îl \u003eII. cisrits inightY wmg l ostalo, a tlîiîg event Jules \\u'rnc nex'cr (aled to prediet ini bisth('i jmîroable writiuigs . 1eraclicd the gr'ea tes.,t mîodrn port France has ex'er Beell, passedt hrougli a Nvonder of a rail- road vajîl. Iiad t love monthis bonlîmig, rifle, 1.(Inil ue plnuii iian d Ifire and gas drill. it IîîUst souli( fear somle 1tj lii' (ieriauti-'Tîe l'ire anîd (Lis Divistin of Ille 1.S * rniv. Xîîîîsec e rîay lught lygave ;l.itîlt '70tll\"imîîtroi R Thitii aa'k ýon thle staff i e mxvcnt za fîllY devulel 1''d 1te.-No, lie is a private still, and \\ r 'oîilof it. tao. 'i c'. lie ias met t1a' wet llla('k î 1'l 'u'l tir1\" aîîdi c' i:u'I x'o I al b t , t i(). J1 i' 't i'' hle ah :~~~a'sbinl, itea1(I )f gouiii. Ilo w is tl!u\" j'r Zaileveutith e lite of a m-ei' '(.O. plut Illi C omm(tl!luitîins a 1,; t ofa idi\"liW C mtli'd. Vu' lz' 1 9011 Lho i' it 'f (l i.o' ii ctivu'ý at'i t il ý-veriil On tia ' 'C;-rmaItn îs 11il le uî\"î''Il Ut 'ffie 1?ihi wi W' a :I dw a !a i W \"'f t',' îd\u003co 1lî)la~ of Il. '. I t' k a.1 ' t;'into a shieil hale wi1n ;;a SOIIIC \"lu i i uîl îo'ilh- niaslk camie uT~ soi 1 let it lam as 1I lad to catuh'Mipîl 0wu \\ l IEL7:uî' e. t totk the lau't hit 'of vui'. I liai l eeî iul lhiilg w heu t Lt C t ..aîue mac the hlnes. 1es Ire.ad Il îen thi Ii't il îes and carefulv aput t Lent an \\a 'v.No!l'Finot going totatell you W hat I1ti w ith thelit. WeIll. i g''t. on that huckimîg beast and wve did a muile oif craters at a galp. Say'! it could dart doe-'n a, crmoîîîbliag crater, plulnge in, smc 1in acro-s\" andI cliob the haîk just as it diii on pract \u003ce stîînts, and to see it gto ox'er low' w'jre xas the joy of rny life. I was i%' ahîead of our ast barrage, alîead of the lions' ditto and goilng like the w imud. l 1m Irail juta infantrv of mum', m\\ il h IL tir fac'es îî 'it ilg the saie mwav i g(a 1going. 'Flic (0. ,vas still furt.her on, suiddenlv our mca mielted off that ro.ad into a field of grain, like shadow's of thle clouds passing over, and down the road caine a eompany of ours at the fu g alp a wonderful siglit I tel! voti, everyt'hing clanking and flying, and' the horses t hi'ow'ng (lods like so man-% muachinies, Once past the hidden infant ry thicv too took to t'te grain, clearing t li fences like herds of deer, and just tien 1 saw' and hcard the'cause, and 1, too, w~ent after that grain like ain aîicous farmer. A beautiful squadron of eneniy planes wcre sw'ooing clowni and swt'epiflg along that ro:i( like so0 many great bawks ini l)lrsllit, înnch more so as the swa Iluiw's tUnt curve. Ianîd su'unit ahove the ro.l. \\lvlhorse feU i itiiit., plaee as ~'~- ~-'~- maturally as it would lie dom-n inits staîl. 'F\"iltev saiv us and scb a rattle. ()îîrs ittit blsy. too. ati jone lueky chap foiîndti a wcak Place and got lus into a tanlk- :înd a.1streak, of fire and a wobble ,tit a cravsh was ail there was to it and theire on thle (lust v road, sprawled out like a druntken matn lay the pilot, and 1, living nearestnmade im, first prisoner. e\".we saved the olà bus, too, shte kicked tp so muchei dust as site struck that it oîîly took a few 51a(efulS more to piut out t jie fire. She's à bit knocked out but stillinii the ring. 1 gave the poor eli:il a swig of my titi, lie %vas only stunned 1 think, an_ off1 set after that Col. 1 omid liiii just, this 81(10 of Russia mnd hiked nie bark for a, littie snack.\" So tfie dear boy sems to be yct \"Full li art anîd Emtpt v Armas'' ,rif uI1y thence fragile break nd he a dense hope I old me iith h is ke a ts anud the big are he igiary t daily eond rudely \"IGet ne out ot no d'No, A\"s, e was ; was )rnlg. \u003eig red \",Well, t feler iment o hinu? water! ~?HEN cloud-banks blot the sky duit grey or whistling winids make outd0oos disagreeabie- hovw cery Wand exhilara'ing are bright ights and sparkling tires! And ini thce soul-trving dav,,s, how welcome is the cheery brightness - the soothing carcss - the swxi- satisfying iiesage--of the musc you love. So this Christmnas you need music more than ever - gond music, that brings the spirit o! Odàm Itn i e.veryone. young and old. Such is the music of 2IeNEWEDISON4 -The Phono graph with a Soul\" -This wonderful instrument brings the beautiful world of rousk. into your hone--RrE-CRF-'ATIONS nt the art of the world'; grcatesýt arti,ýs.'l.Th N, dioJc' not mcrcly imitate-i culyR~RAE with such utter hidelity that the huma\"i car cax-aîot disting-uish bc-tween th i Iing artist andrhie New lSdison. The true sprt of Chostmas lie- in the soul of The New Edison. Let it sing its message of hopv and faith and love in your hume this year. May lm send you a complune\u003eliry copy o our musical niaga*ine\"Along Broadwvay72 THOMAS A. EDISON, INC.- ORANGE, N.J. For Catalogues and Easy Payment Terms Write: The Home of The NEW EDISON DIRECT FACTORY REPRESENTATIVES STINWAY. GERNARD HE-INTrZMAN. NORD4MEIMER, CmicICERSgfw. M.AIN». *ELL. SH4ERLC - MANNIP4*, DOMERT-Y. CANADA AND LESAGIE PIANOS. EDISON. COLUMoIA. EJPI4ONOLSAN AND Pi4ONOL.A PHONOGRAP*'\u003c Sté\u003e \u003cTHiE MSI BEAVTYiMUSIC wA EE NE*NýPD!\u003e\" IN TlI 11QM1ýTUAM IT IS mq A«, , i 1 simply ky and ýrching 1 give ccoiin- Df ten letter share. kind erson mted, done, too. sS n up mpty mon 8 me anger r and L wee ,h' to small shirt not ished ipped rspare anew r the [y to us seen those vn in when away ,oh!\" conie, i and ý nom, L:",
         "THE WESTERN HOME MONTHLY ««If Ye Break Faith With Us\" By Rev. John MgcKay, D.D., Principal Westminster Hall, Vancouver. .JOHN McRAEd,, onenof the noblest of Can ada's8sos, who himself aleeps in Flanders 19,words, the pathos, the tra- gsdy, the glory and the challenge of the Wur. Thousands of Canadian homes are for- ever inked by tics af sorrowful affection ta the little crosse that mark the laut resting places of their hero sono. For them there can b. no forgetting, for lave neyer dies. What truc Canadian can ever thuik unmoved of those long rows of sulent sentries over aur noble dead? And how can 1f. for any of us ever be the sarne Ca eevei f ail ta hear thernsay: break faith with us.\" Surely the My in sacrifice af aur bravent and best cannot be i vain. The homes frorn which they came have been glorifled by what they did. The simple lessons of duty, and honor, of courage and faith have I\u003erne rich fruitage in the hour of deadly stru.Ae with earths mhost brutal foe. Can any Canadian home in ail the future years forget these lessons and fail ta give the coming generations the things for which they died? Our achools and cofleges have had the seal of high approval placed upon their work, humble thougli it often was, by those who learncd in thcm the me4nings of history and the purposes of life. Can they ever again b. content with anything bclow the best for the bavs and girls whose privileges have beený bought for them at sueh a prioe? Our political institutions thougli they have pitifully failed in soumany ways, though they have suffered so much from human selfishness and fais. ambition, have yet risen ta splendid heights and have supported' aur bosat the front i ways of which w. may weilbproud. Can we ever again be con- tent with corruption and unwarthiness in the high places of the land? Can we who gave aur sons that the world might be safe for democracy ever again tolerate those practices which endanger the very faundations of democracy?zCan we break faith with those wha die, in the institu- tions which fashion and guard the vcry life of aur citizens and secure ta thern the blessings bought with aur best blcod. Soon, we hope, the blessed peace for which they fought wiil be realired and aur maimed and broken sons who have stood between us and warse than death, will return ta their homes. For thern there can neyer again be the full orbed life of perfect health. Have we risen ta our fulrspnsbility ini aur treatment of them? Can w ever respect ourselves if we fail ta make their lot as happy as lies within our power? And what of the widows and orphans of our noble dead? Shall we repeat the shameful story of Britain's treatment of her dependents frorn other wars? Or ohail we write a new chapter in the history of aur Empire by giving thern the best life halds, even at the cost of bitter hard- ship ta, ourselves? It is easy ta forget, it ia easy ta be self satisfied, but can we be so base as ta break faith with the helpiess dependents of those who die for us? Over and thraugh all the horror and bloadshéd, the world is beginning to reanze the hand of God in this dread disaster. Had those who naxned His name in the past, been sensitive as they should have been ta His presence and His purposes in life, would this dire cal- arnity have corne upon the earth? Who knows? But this we know and for this we thank Cod and take courage for the future-The lessons taught by.the church in the past have been lived in the lives of those who stood face ta, face with death in a thousand awful farms, have kept them patient in hardship and steadfast in the Article of Death. To the Church above ail else cornes the challenge of those silent crasses, for does she not live by the Cross, and in it find her glory? The first Christrnas, with its sang of \"7Peace on earth, good will to men,\" ONLY A FEW MEMBERSHIPS LEFT IN OUR Christmas Piano Club This is your last chance to avail yourself of ail the extra advantages allowed to those who purchase through this popurar co-operative method. In no other way can you secure such reduced rce -s-uch easy terms-and a dozen unusual advantages offered to club members. Anyone may Po\"n-there are no dues or assessments--Simply advise us that you are open to buy a piano. You are then enrolled and have until December 3 lst to select your instrument providcd the total num- ber of z#cmbç,rships are not taken Up before that time. We show here only three of the big bar- gains you may secure. \"Imperlail\" style Colonial $400W $335 .Bell Piano 88-Note Player Piano Now5 $650 Some Features of This Big Club Offer Your choice of any of thc above-mentioncd makes. Terms: One-fifth Cash and two or three years to pay off the balance, monthly, quartcrly, half-yearly, or annually, as you prefer; a special discount for cash or on extra instalments paid at the time of purchase; 30 days' free trial, or if unsatisfactory, money refunded on retu.rn of the piano. 10 yca:s' gua- rantee. Piano bcnch with miusic receptacle free. Freight prepaid to your nearest station. Every piano personally sel- ected by our president. DIRECT FACTORY REPRESENTATIVES UTEINWAY. GJERHARD MHEINTZMAN. NOROHEIMER. CHICKKRINO. HAINES. BELL, ISHERLOCK- MANNING@ IDOHERTY. CANADA ANL LESAGE PIANO\u0026. EISON. COLUMBIA. EupNtC.O4JAH AND PHONOI.A PHONOGRAPIIS Any Instrument in Our Store may be Purchased on this Plan This Club je run in co-operation with the best and oldest piano firms ini the world, such as; Chickering, Oerhard-Heintzman,Nordheixner, Ceclian, -Bell, aines, Sherlock-Manning, Doherty, CanaA-a Piano Co. and Winnipeg Pis.. Co. Regixiar Pianios are featured at Fpecial prices and on s~ea ternw, and you have 90 sityles of pianos arid player-piainos to choose frorn. W. wil accept your old piano as part paymnent in exchange for a new upright or player-piano. Other Special Club Values GERHA1ID HEINTZMTAN Club offer .... $455 NX ýRDHI3JMER Club oller ..... $455 D }IIIZRTY Club offerý.... $375 anld 11aîny othcîrs .9 for thase who eould se and understag was shado'ved b y a Cross.. And mnay act this Christ;mas have it.s richer sang andj its f uller promise of peaoe which yS shail neyer shatter? The answer rernains with the Churci of Christ. Those thousands af littie white crosses awe their very shape to thMa instrument of torture an which the Prizlo of Glory died. And those rows on rowB meet ini that cross which stands higher than ever before in the eyes of ail the world as the revealer of the heart of God, as the interpreter of life's tragedies and the Ccmforter of the hearts of MMn The message of these pathetie rows of crosses is the message of that other Cross \"If ye break faith with Me.\" Surely the Church will ot fail Hirn and thern in this great hour of the world's agony and the Church's opportunity. In Flênders fields the poppies grow Above the crosses, row an row, That mark our place and in the sky The larks still braveiy singing fly, Scarce heard above the guns below. We are the dead, short days ago We lived, saw dawn, feit sunsets glow, Loved and were loved, and now we lie In Flanders field. Take up aur quarrel with the foc, To you frorn failing hands we throw The torch, be yours to hold it high. If ye break faith with us who die W~e shaîl not sleep, though poppies blow In Flanders field. The Strain Immnortsi Written for The Western Home Manthly by D. S. Hamilton, B.A. Winnipeg We review the years of conffict And aur hearts are strangely stirred By the siglits aur eyes have wit- nessed And the tales aur ears have heard. Sorne have moved arnjdst the dangers 0f the reeking abat and sheil; Some have risked the dark pursuer Where the billows heave and swell; Same have faced the winged des- troyer Boldly in the uppier air; For destruction walked in darkne!zs And at noonday \"OVER THERE.\" We have lived within the shadow 0f the risks they bravely manne', And aur hearts have ached full (;: tel, As the lengthy lists we scanned. 0f the men whose dauntless courage Led thern on against the foe, Till sorne hate-directed missile Crossed their path and laid them low. Then the world seemed lost ta gladness, And ta joyous note, until Broke again the strain irmaOrtai \"Peace on earth, ta men good wihI.\" Ave the Christrnîatide is dawning To rekindie hope obscured, Tô inspire fait h unfailing, In the souls that long endured. Strain of sorrow, pain and anguish, Trust ing where they could not sec That a day of liberation Would arrive ta set thern free. 1Tiail w-e noW with joy unmeasured Viýion of the \"happy rnorn\" lleralthing the worlcl's redemptioti, Whien the Saviour King was born. W-ho should stand amidst the nations, Pointing a benignant sway- Eing of Kings in power and wisdoni, Author of the better day. lo! as token of His power We hehold the tyrants faîl, And new- favor for the peoples Be they great or be they snal., Let the anthem ring with gladness, All the worlH with jov to filîl Afler night of dark destruction, \"Peace on earth, to men good will.' eft enough o Il d horribln and rlenl outheri 't bas a9 spu tasaf th winter is alm\u003c It is a land( Inues minert notion that à deadly countý accaunts of 1 Northeast Si Most fanatic Kronstadt, It is likely upholding th, governiflents [grasp of Ocra theràSelves at strangeat Pa, populated 1 scantily by descendants ished for life, land where making lhfe lies a region r Grave,\" whe perpetually strafe ta mai toa, filled wil perished in through cold Ail Europ Iand yet th( IMiles ta Spa] I ike a rough Iis found at 1 forrned by t E ~. ~ .~J ~ Canada Player Piano",
         "d understag And mnay act her song and e which y i the Church of littie whjte ape to thMa ich the Pririe row's on rolm tands higher es of ahI the the heart of ife's tragedie earts of Imn ietic rowa of that othler ith Mle.\" Sfail Him and rthe world'a portunity. tes grow 0W, i the sky g fly, is below. B ago, mets glow, flow we lie he foe, Ke throw Sit high. ho die poppies blow rn Home ton, B.A. nfict ey stirred have wit- e heard. ndst the rk pursuer and swell; iged des- i darkne!zs HERE.\" shadow nannc.' I ful (;: tell ned. as courage laid them 1 lbat to until mortal od wihI.\" lawniig 1 anguish, not sec easurcd demption, was born. idt the d wisdoni, gladness, ood will.' WThere Lies Ou 1Written for The Western Hou o eANY aree strange lands intoi which the great war lias nowi penetrated. But noue of thema are at ail comparable with that where lies the allies lateat frn. Part of it is a terrible region, ,,fit enougli for the punishment of those Who look upon war and aIl its miserieg snd horribleness as a trade bringing profit \u0026ad renown. Southern Siberia is a pleasant place. It bas a spring, summer and autumn as confortable as these of the north mid dtates of the Uinited States, thougli winter la almost as severe as Manitoba' . It la a land of corn, vast herds and im- Inense minerai wealth. Probably the notion that aIl SiLeria la a frozen and deadly country lias arisen la part f rom accounts of Russians formerly exiled. to Northeast Siberia, wherg now are the Most fanatic of the Bolsheviks outside Kronstadt It la likely then that the Allies troops upholing the resolution of the Entente governmnents to liberate Siberia from the [grasp of Germany and miarule may find thernselves at one period or another in the strangeat part of the iahabited globe. Populated before the revolution but seantily by Russian settlers, and the descendants of Cossacks and exiles ban- ished for life, and by native tribes, it is a land where the absence of everything making life decent is supreme. Here lies a region rightly described as \"N ature' s Grave \" where ali l silence and solitude, perpetualy frozen soil, and incessant strife to maintain life. A vast graveyard, too, filled with bones of animais that have 1perished in comparatively recent times Ithrough cold. Al Europe could be dumped into it, Iand yet there would be thousands of Imiles to spare. Ia shape it is something I ike a rougli triangle, the point of which isl found at Behring Straits. The base is formed by the Lena river, flowing north N ( THE WESTERN HOME MONTHLY .r Latest Letter of the StnviRne h h adh siolrsgraduhey drwat artdesretie leSI me Monthly by N. Tourneur enCa marshes, t lesh, h huge forests andtil amidst w'e estie, a into the Aretie Ocean, the south side innumerable lakes. By-and-bY they cesse w~ is shaped by the curve of the lofty Stanovol altogether, and bogs, 8W51flps, 5tofylY Mountains, running many hundreds of wastes and morasses stretch away for S miles, and shutting off Southern Siberia many hundreds of miles toward the di and Manchuria; and the north side is Arctic Ocean. g formed by the Arctic Ocean and the These are the dread \"tundras,\" eéther gi remarkable islands of ice and earth, that mossy or stony anid barren, according to i in age are the oldest known parts of the their part of the territory, with ow t( earth. Since the Glacial Period, tens of sweUling hills rising out of them here and a hundreds of thousands of years ago, they there covered with bushwood and masses 0 have undergone no change according to of brilliant flowers in sulumer timne. It is t geological research of Russian scientists. then and during the autuinn their solitudem Here, too, is the coldest place on the a.nd lonelines is unparalleled, for none,u globe, Verkoyansk, on the Yana river. not even the hardy natives, dare traverse a Even from May to September at Ver-. them on account of the dense, deep f koyansk, n6 matter whence the wind may clouda of gnats hovering over the stagnan-ta blow it ia always close on freezmng. In wastes. It is only possible to crossl winter the thermometer often fa la to ethese wildernesses in 'winter when they are l ninety degrees below zero Fahrenheitt frozen hard and covered with snow. f It is almost impossible to realize tffe Reindeer sledges are used in their southern awful cold here in midwinter. parts; further north only dogs can be1 The town itscif is a collection of log found to draw the sledges. q Through1 houses standing on the higli banks of a Northeast Siberia the only livrig thinga lifelesa icy stream, and backed by a dark that cari boldly faoe the awful cold are thef pine forest stretching on aIl sides save Siberian dog and the bear, the raven and toward the Arctic for many hundreda of the snow-owl, and man. miles. So intense sometimes is the So great is the intensity of frost that winter cold that the inhabitatnts breath through tens of thousands of square maites1 with difficulty ini the open air. The rein- the ground is pcrpetually frozen, and ideer seek the depths of the foreat, and are toward the Arctic Ocean solid ice appeara often found frozen dea4 ia herds. The under the Boit, and riscs higher and 7îgher trunks of the trees split'open with sharp a h e aapoce.i aua h report like gun fire owing to the in- capital of the territory, where the Boise- tenaity of the f rost. Your host in these viks have comritted horrible exces\"e, regions of Northeast Siberia has to lif t where, too, the troops of freedom may y ou out of your sledge, and help you to have to force their way, no wells cari be dach your frozen beard fromY your dug, for the sout beneath the City neyer f urs and mufflers when you arrive at his thaws. Towards the Arutie the snow house. But everything in the \"strangest does not melt tilt the miiddle of Julie, land\" is remote, unlikely, curious-and and many of herier ;ae overted wit i terrible. ice again by the beginningofete er Behind the tanovoi Mountains Yet throughout this desolate region the stretches Southern Siberia. It is watered Yakoutas, the Tchoutkchas and tho f by rivera that do the work of railroads, Chukehees roain with theWr doga and their has richly wooded mountaîns and valleys, reindeer, their tenta and 1'uts, and in tle iwith lvast green plains, cultivated fields aquthern parts with We à of horses. In 3asf t meadows, cheerful towns, with al the forest parts, alorg, the banks of the ithe usual vegetables in abundance, and an sulent flowing rivera many Russiati settîcrs, Belguim Needs Your 1 MORE THAN EVER!l ,onviets and others, have made their mes. So from the Anubra to Behing traits, f rom the icy shores of the Arctic ýo Mount Aldana in the Stanovoi Ran ge, nd one of the sovereigI mountaine of the world, from the farthest town hi the Id m-orld, N iji-Kolinisk, on the Frozen Sea, 'where ia a day of fifty-two of our Iay and anight that lv#tathirty-eight, goods are brought to Yakutsk for the Ireat annual fair there. They. consit [nostly of furs and fish, seal skins and teeth and mamlmotà i vory. AU these are sold to the traders who give la return corn and flour, tea, sugar and trong obacco, Chinese sill and cottcna and wadding for winter enioncFe utensils, glass, gunsp nd ried and aIl variety o0atilees, including dri fruit and vegetbles for the far-ofi settlers ad the flk of Niji-Kom And this moat strange land doca not lie so ver y far aa.It ila eparated from the North Amrcan continent by not one hunIred miles of sea acros Behring Straits. So, if, and when the American and Canadian troope may find theinselvea there, they are not go far from their home country after ail. A Boston street car has the front sigri reading \"Dorchester,\" and the aide aignu, \"'Ashinont and Milton.\" \"Does th is car go to Dorchester?\" \"'Yes, lady;, get rigbt on.\" \"Are you sure it does?\" \"'Yes, lady; get right on\" \"But it says 'Aohmont atnd Milton' on the ide.\" \"lWe ain't going sideways, lady. Get right on.\" EyeaWe, Mt a\" ý lu à1p Ta... b Help As Homes are Freed from'Gras p of Germ ans New Horrors Revealed. Belguim ! Belguimn! Belguim ! the papers are full of -heart-rendering news-itemns fromn Belguimn. Delirious with joy at being rescued fromn the hellish tyranny of the Germnans, yet the poor Belgians are in large measure in the last stages of want. Every cent you can send to themn NOW will help ta feed a famnished patroit or clothe one whose meagre rags will neyer keep. Éb out this winter's çold. Raise Your Fund and Send Lt In! Perhaps you cannot spare as much as you would wish, but go around amnong your friends, plead Belguimn's cause. collect al you can in every possible way, and turn it in QUICKLY to your local Commiùttee or to Headquarters. 1 Picture these hungry and strieken people, of whomn the Master said, \"Inasmuch as ye have done it unto the least of these.. . This is an imperative cal1 for HELP! lYake cheques payable and send contributions to 5e14ain Relief Frund a Wýe(Rej*stered under the War Charities Act) A. GAUZER and R. T. RILET Joint Treasurers, 293 Gar7 St., Wirinipeg I O q~ ~iê I Il",
         "THE WESTERN HOME MONTHLY BLUEDIBBN TEA Rkch! Strong! Delicious It stimulates a man for his work. in the morning and helps him to forget his troub- les at night. Ask for ite 30 IERMDo ÀMMMLMOTTLE!ký rete rme -THE THRIFT GIFT- Annually pays dividcnds te the recip- ient of im.iny tintes the cost to you Save* food, saves fuel, saves 1c, caves doirsg the arne thing twice Kecps contents hot from fthc mornng Meal throughout the day and night. Keeps liquids or solid foods cooked at iireakfas-t tite to serve hot or cold at lunch or dinner. Inuis'pensabhle fôr flic honte, farrn, nursery, or sick room. Ideal for the automtobilist and litntr-the food container of a hundred uses. Thermios luinchi kits give tlie worker in office or factory, food or drink hot as it should Uit or cold as it t in lie. Caution : The nane \"Thermos\" is stamped on aIl genine Thermos Products THERMOS BOTTLE COMPANY,, LIMITED 14 Sheppard Street# Toronto, Canada In United States-Norwich, Conn., end New York. N. Y. Wash Day Made Easy for $2.00 D I t Il'mt Iliituela .it oij l t o ltl î' îti sîtt1,fu i t'iuug t ,I .......iî ( i1 t't I l îit'.s isr ng s lld Ilo i 't tu itti il tttitt. %\\A %till Nati 1\u003e11' t. t'i, l'itti iii .ltti i 'l2ti titi i \u003e iti or il. C tetIbvt. Dont luy i ,a îîî i îii' ît;i tt i tuaranttued or wttIIvîý t 'îîîtd wo't t' itit' l tîîtî tu tI tt i .t V iîî litt, O'' \\il t 'tii. ttit, ii i to-daiy. Iti itii' Ag'eitis wanteu t o ell these wtahers antid' m 'rhîi7h clans atrtic'les. GRANT\u0026 McMILLAN Co., Dept. H10, 3871, Clinton %.t.,- Toronto, Ont. mu iîll t i mll s (ihoice tî lm By G. P. De Saul'les RE nyobususband\" [ ~a N ' so usy. A Can't you put mdownta paper a n'listen t e fra mu while?\" ,ci be listenin'.\" \"Vyes, 1 expect you to be-w'ith one car. I want both cars. Ain't he exasperatin', sister?\", \"I1 don't know. Most men are that way., \"Oh, you're on his side! You aiways are. If I can't talk to my husband at night, I'd like to know when I'm to taik to hlm. 11e ain't in the house in the day, 'cept to git bis meals. Nights are the only time I've got to talk, an' then it's rend, rcad, read the whole endurin' time. Look at hilm now! 11e ain't heerd one word 've said!\" 4Yes, I have. You said you ain't got no time to talk to mc.\" ciDid ou ever! Ain't got no time to talk to him! Ain't got no husband to last week I was kind o' lookin' through hisI pockets, jes' to see if there wvas any botesI you know, an' 1 found a white rose!I Now, there ain't a bush o' that color ini town, 'cept to M\\asons'. It growsintheir side yard at the end o' the piazza. 1 sort o' talked 'bout roses that iaight, an' at last I said, 'Jim,' says 1, 'Y wish you'd stop to M.\\asons' sometimes whien you're down, an' ask 'cm to give me a rut i.' their white rose.' H1e got so red I felt sorrv for him. 11e didn't say 'yes or no' so I've made up my mnd it's one o' the \u003cMason girls.\" \"A rose don t mean anything. I ve given roses myself, an' l'n single yet.\" 4\"It ail depends, Sister. If you give roses afore you're twenty, they mean a lot. But afterwards-wcll, I have heerd o' elcrly me\u0026 takin' home roses an' plantin' 'cm for a cuttn'. It ai't only the wvhite roses tîmat ina es me think Jim's goin' to get married, though. There's The armistice between Turkey and the Entente powers hiad bchind it ail Gieneral Townshend of the Itritisli fortcs, wlio ias a prisoner iii a 'liis prison camp. hIv as lie who con- (Ilicted theii egotiations for Great Britain. S;oute t in ago Getîcrat Townsheud, mith an ariny of tun tiîousand imen, ivas surrournded, antd tlîîougli ivant of supptlies forced to surrender at Kut-ebunmara. A few daN s ago lie was relea.,ed tronm the 'lut kisl priso camp and the released captive became the peace negotlator. 'llie gencral itili al i a)_s railk as olle of the lieroes of the itar. talk, to, you atean. 1îmght as wél Uc a wido-%'ed orplîai. Sistcr's a sav-nothin, aýn' grandîlia s thle'thole tinte. When 11'tmarrieti I expert FlI go to a deef il' (Itittilt ittitttt an' lîn to talk on rny fîtges. 'IheitI wo'ft ocke no ise Wan titi utilise.e ''u Yii ou\\il. istu''No, Iudotn'-( 5tippo s Vi lit W itlii. lii it' sarrt ic t( ihue. Nu1 , ifil il :it tlik( liîvît*t uI t alot, ttitiiî 1,1 - i 10 *: c t r, i lo I l toet' If it h r :t , ; I l \\i:ti't ISIi Ii'\" t l , il \" j''\" 11111du l Iu ' i litl' ~îii ll-t -IIoI : ~i- m ,t' -mlt' - ()Il I-o n, Il) git 1t:1t l 11 ,' lý t :11,itt l . 0V U N '; 1 lt l't t t'rlit lt-ut i i. t : .~ 1' iii I O uit Ilîi., bu e au riv ers. an' I found a Stîap11 o' pink alictu. aithei next time wCutt li ii lic stree,(t Isa\\%- àa esso iitttlý viità.rh.'Itcat s sure sigli. They ai11avs clivritit a nul ton or such. is- billtii lisvt' o cti CIIiil, aribbono' mine, 1)iltî tlt Itijiit t iblono' mine? Yoi revîlu'tt One o' then big Mlue bows 1l be. I ilno.'' i j Ivolti er! 1I secu hun ihave it tt\\**i.It \\ix 15 a whbile \u003c'uip hunniit With i in 1);t)\\\\ ti \". \\-Iîx', ~c.\\-on Made i Ittit I, ti' 'tîîî'stl ! .'t litt bite satin ~i i pu-ci r e t1'k.sil, tue centre. -\\l' oi ',-il uî 'tlotl. an* 'I cars after. tt t i \\vi n i ti' Il ii' tiinIeï ci eu Wil III1' .), t'î tr î p j t t1i iig s t ii . A n O I t'ii il A i ic a n ' a sam uile 0' Pi,* \"fhe'd snotherth Wu 90 fr early à fou gostent gir, untilil oUt ofthe husbafl' into Masoî \"Oh, adE toset uP That's rig There'8 kA no steadyl scademy a dress 80n to Bee a scared she the ae yoiu hear down?\"p the truste as Annie S din'aym thatura. bread tha doin't day therehave dn't ,beli Se'd rul even Ilui father do didn't lo( \"«You i \"iP'rap got such or twict, me, 1 kn ho turr'b \"91 wol Iwas ret 111 shai others. 1? Bessie's an' tormi they run one anot from kni, coat thal it. Tha Anythini can do, r ttin ' she'11 for state of Wif e foi angel 'in b'lieve B wouldn'1 You're s she's goi \"If it Bella. others.\" \"F'rai the besi she maI she weï There's hiangin' lier toF olie ivi got * b( s 'etup E for a d footin' most fc (int yv ail that i ï)hav( -!((ld(r il,'dl r; i quiet lie.:1Hi' \"Wh",
         "THE WESTERN HýOME MONTHLY .o;:a .ewinl*. An', through bi s any botesI wite rose!I at color in~ ows in their mza. I sort igt, an' at wisb you'd vlen you're ne a rut W' )red I felt i iyes or no' s one o' the tbmng. I ve 1gbe yet.\", Jf you give ey mean a ave beerd roses an' h. There's ai Townshefld ;lie who con- iiend, with an d t surrender amp and the as one of the was cleanin 1 found a next tie w a dress o' t i, 'Masons' in. They îicb. ilus- bon o' mine, )01o mine? big M)ue bows i ave il p hunn1jit with ci. von Made ' bine satin, ithe centre.' v ear after. 1 found - i pc o' Pink ulico are diffrent tbings. 1 expect Jimn picked it up somewberes.\" \"Iif le'd picked it up would hie have rodditn tissue-paperi No, she wears ~ ikcalico frock. An' F'i tell you another thing, Sister. Last Sunday he wu jso fretful. I coldn't get drnner early enoug for him, an' hie was the gretest wbie dress1i' prinilin' like a girl, until it was four o'clock wben hie went out of the gate. I chai up the attic with husband'5 spie glasses, an' I seen him go into Masons', door! There, now!\"y \"4Msns' got a fine family o' girls.\" \"Oh, arêyou awake, Gran'ma? Goin' 10 set up an' be sociable, ain't you? That's right. Yes, they are nice girls. Tbere's Amanda. Sbe's the oldest. An' no steady! She taught five winters Wo the academy an' saved every oent. She don't dress so mucb as the others, but I do like to see a girl sensible, do't you? I'm scared she's a littie nid for Jim, tbough. Twet n-Husband, wbat ye~r was it the aadey burned down? Husband, do you hear me?\" \"What year was it the academy burned downm?\" \"How sbould I know?\" \"Weil, of ail tbings! An' hm one ' the trustees! 1 know sbe's the samie age as Annie Stringer. An'-emmesee---5be thirty-five. ,Tbat's too bad. I don't think a man s wif e ougbt tW be ten years older, do you?\" \"«I've knowed some pleasant marriages tbat way. There was a lady in our own onct that was twenty years older than bier busband, 'an lie nevcr knowed it to bus dyin1' day. They were happy togetr.\" \"P'raps so, Gran'ma, but it ain'l natural. Not wbat I'd be real pleased if Jim would take Wo Amanda. Wel, there's Katherine. She cornes next. If Amanda's tbirty-flve KatberÎne's twenty- nine, because tbey iost two cbildren in between. Katherine makes every bit o' bread that's eat inithat bouse. An' Imust say aliliher cookin' is fine. Stil-wellt don't you tbink, Sister, sbe's got a kmnd o' overbearin' way witb bier? I allers wanted ter have jirn's wife to live witb me. don't b'lieve I could, if it was Katherine. She'd run tbis bouse. She'd rmn us al even Ilusband. 1 seenlber nid gran'- fatber dodge onct wben hie passed bier. It didn't look nies.\" \"You wouldn't sece me dodgrn' for bier.\" \"9P'rars not, Gran'ma, but then you've got such a sperit. I can stand out onct or twict, but day in an' day out-laws: me, I know I'd knuckle down. It woiild be turr'ble.\" \"I1 wouldn't borror trouble 'bout it ti]l I was real surs, Phemie.\" \"I sban't, Sister. Mebbeit s one o'tb others. Bessie cornes next. if Amanda'ý a good scbolar, an' Katberine a e;o0d cook, Bessie's the most romiantic girl I ever seed. Sbe's allers readin' 'bout knigbtç an' torments-You know, that game Uerc tbey mun round witb a stick an' poke fi one another. An' she don't do a thing froni knittin' a sbawl Wo patchin' bier tti coat that ain't got sone roman tic id lin it. Tbat's ail I've got agin' Bessie Anything that cornes out ' a book shE can do, but real ordinary duties, such of gettin' supper or maki' apple-sauce sbe'11 forget. If Jim was took witb small pox I expet sbe'd nurse hirn through it but I sbouldn't be real satisfied 'bout ti( state of bis socks. She'd be a splendi( wife for war-times, a real mnsei angel 'mongst the wounded, but I don\" b'leve sbe'd keep the cellar dlean. Yci wouldn't like that, Gran'ma, m-ould yoî You're s0 parti'lar 'bout the cellar. Oh she's gone Wo sleep agin!\"y ,,if it's anybody, Phemie, I tbink it' Bella. Sbe's mors Jim's age than th, others.\" ( \"P'raps you'rs rght, Sister. Bellai the best lookin'. She's fine lookin' an she makes every one o' them prettY froc] sh ers h' so sought after, toc hiangin' round the door. This one want lier to go ridin' in bis automobile. Thp one invites hier W a social\u003ele. An'a tbird got * box o' candy under bis arm. She set up a whole nigbt to make a new dre, for a dlance, an' the next. night wil foot in' it along in a Portland Fancv t inost folks are tuckered out. But ihe (l\u003c)ft vou tbink Jim would kind o' tire ail th t, after the weddin'? A man lik i have bis fling onct, but after hie';ses !(( down, so much gaiety is weari il('d rather have a pleasant home, i quiet place to read his paper. W'ouldr liHiisand? Wouldn'tbe\" \"What?\" \"Don't a man likze a quiet place to read bis paper? You ougbter kaow.\" 1I neyer had it yet.\" \"That's polite, I must say! I neyer get a word out o' ynu. Sometimes --ou do say 'yes' or 'no,' but itfs only when you're bungry. Wait till you have a styhsh young daughter-in-law, then! you'Il have to set up. I expect she'll cost Jim a sigbt in clothes. I don't think she is one to make over much, or provident, or f ar- scein'. She had bats from Boston onct or twict, as if Wown milinery wasn't good enough, an' proba' ly Mr. Mason would sonner ses ber married than any one o' the others.\" \"Ain't thers another girl?\" \"Yes, Sister, there's little Doma. I don't tbink sh'd take Jim's fancy. She bad the scarlet fever an' lost al ber bair. She wears cape most o' the time made out o' pink calicot Lawsy me! Could it ha' been a sample from tbem caps? Sbe's a good-hcarted cbild, an' pleasant man- nersd. I ougtn't to say a word ag'in ber, but I should like my daugbter-in-law Wo have hair! She's as bald as an egg, an' in winter she wears wigs made out ' lamb's wool. My oh, myt S'e the chikiren sbould tae after ber! Huband, bow would you like that? Husband!\" \"Do for goodness sakes, let me be, Mla.\" \"Weil, answer me this one question. How would you lilce to have a bald-beaded daugbter-in-law? An' bald-headed gran- children\" \"I woldn't care.\" \"No, 1 don't s'pose you would. You wouldn't care wbat bappened, soy ou could read your paper in peae.YOU needn't tell me there's ail that news ini it. You jes' read things over twist, so y ou won't have Wo talk Wo me. An' mdiat kind of a pa be you, not Wo care what bo- cornes o' your son? Poor boy' if it wasn't for me who takes an interest in bim, tbere'a no knowin' wbat would happen. His grn'motber goes Wo sleep, an' bis pa read theper, an' ail the tume thé poor cbild's off-somewbere makin' bisseif mis- erable for if e. For I know no man cauld live contented witb a woman in prnk caps. P raps he's, sekin' her right now, an' 1 can't do a thing. Lawsy me! LawsY me!\" \"I wouldn't get s0 excited over it, Phemie.\" It's easy for you to talk, Sister. You won't bave to live with her 'f it bappens. You won't have to see the little-bald- headed tots runnin' about san' callin you gran'ma. We've always been a go lookin' family, an' had our hair. W-hyi ran,?ma there used to set on bers an Jim'sgot an' awful thick erop. Weil, I've heerd folks say, 'Love laugbs at locks.' 1 neyer knowed what it meant alore. We'll be the luhi'stockofte ol town, that's what we'ilb. Gran'ma, wake' up! Wake upl It' rafldie- tressin' to bear you snore that way.\" \"What? Yes. I'rn rt old, an' changes corne bard to oldfols \"I wa'n't taikin' 'bout changes. I was talkin' 'bout snorin'. Not but what thero is a change com\"' that you take bard.. Ain't that Jim's step? 1 thought so. Nobody slanis the door like Jim. DComm on Sense Economy Will Win You to .a \"Sunshine \"'Brand for Ail The Family - - - --, 4",
         "THE WESTERN I\"OME MONTHLY Plan Ahoad ...fHave Your flouse Warmer Next Wintor As Fou ait around the. stove thia winter, getting bot on the mua aide and cold on the. aide away from the fire, let your tkoughta linger on the coîfort FOU could bave if every part of the room were kept et 70 degrees. You could ait by the wlndow or thie table or by the evening lamplight and r.ad your favorite paper or mag-azine in perfect comfort %wtbout feeling a draft or chili, if Fou bad your houae heated with the Bealth and comfort both l.mand that the temperature bc CONSTANT, and ony hot water hcsaing w.11 give constant temperature. The King Hot Water Bolier and Iznperial Radiators are easy to mustai in any bouse of any aise in any iocality, city or country. If you want to know wbat aise Boiler and what qusntity of Radi- ation your bouse aceda, Write us and give tbe dimensions of eacb room to be beated, together witb a pencilisketch of tbe plan of your bouse. and the name of your local eteamfitter, and our engineer will supply you with full particulars, free of any obligation. Our ilew Booklet-\"COMFORTABLE HOMES'--sent FREE on requeat. Thoi. H. Ashdown Hardware Co, Ltd. Winnipeg Saskatoon CalgarY ti 0F CANADA Loans for Livestock To good farmers living in the vicinity of its rural branches, the UNION BANK is prepared to make loans on reasonable terms for the purpose of purchasing Cattle for feeding or breeding purposes. Consuit the Local Manager for par- ticulars. Pald-Up Capital Total AssetsExceed - $140,000,000 THE PIONEER BANK 0F WESTERN CANADA One of the busy scenes just preceding the victorious attack by the Canadians upon Cambrai is depicted in this Canadian officiai photo. In the centre can be seen captured German soîdiers carrying in one of their wounded comrades. The quintette were a part of the out. posta before the German lines which crumbled in the face of the Canadian attack. \"lHello, folks! I guess Vrn a littie late.\" \"lWell, 1 expect we're ail ready for bed. Gran' ma's snorin' an' your pa's read his paper clean tbrough twîct. Any news?\" \"John Holes broke lis leg.\" ' J)ear me, I hope it wiil be setvright. Was you down to the store?\" dives, I was down to the store, but not for long. I've been visitin' to Mason'a.\" \"dAn' what's the news there?\" \"Their old Plymouth Rock hen came off to-day with fourteen chicks. She had a settin' o' fourteen eggs, an' hatched them al!\"' \"Do tell! Didn't you have nothin' better to talk about thau hens?\" \"They killed a lamb yesterday, an' Mason says ýyou can have a fore-quarter if you want. It's prime meat.\" \"Look here, sonny. Don't you try to f ool your ma. Do ou expect me to b'lieve that you've ben settin' up to, eleven o'clock-yes, five minutes to eleven to talik 'boutMsn'a hens an' bis lambsÏ When 1 ask what news, I mean, have 1 got a daughter-mn-law?\" \"lWell, ma, I guess youu. got her al right. There seemed to be a young per- son answerin' to that description whn 1 corne away.\" \"A young person? Then it ain't Arn- anda?\" ::No, ma, it ain't Amanda.\" \"Is it Katherine?\" \"Lt ain't Katherine. I'm not rugged enough for that life, Aunt.\" \"Then it's Bessie. I'm real glad.\" i\"Sorry to disappoint you, Gran'ma, but iain't Bessie.\" \"I might have knowed no man could get by Bella's good looks.\" \"One did; but you're getting warm, \"You poor boy! You poor, deluded boy!\" 'No, ma. t ain't Dora. If that's what you mean b y that groan. Don't be s0 low spcited. Try again, Ma. You're warmer than ever.\" \"But there ain't no more.\" \"What about their littie cousin *frorn Portland? The girl that they brought in to see you yesterday. Pa knowed howt the land lay. He knowed that I meani to ask her to-night, if I could get a chance, didn't you, Pa?\" \"Do you mean to say that your pa has set there durin' this entire evenin' an' read his paper, whule I've been wearin' myseîf to a frazzle 'bout nothin'? Do you mean to say that he had set there knowin' aIl 'bout it an' 1 nothin' to grieve 'bout? It's the rneanest thing, jes' the meanest 1 ever heerd tell of! But l'Il get even. Soînebody wilI want buttons scwed on. Soinebody m-ili be commn' ver' ineek to bave his haîr parted. I shan' .3 part. it. ' lie an go crookcd al l is ife for al of nie. 1 don't care -%hethier he -las got a cdean shirt for Siindcay. 1He can A mant that treats his wife so ain't got no cail to be a deneon. It's a livin' shainc any ways vou Iqok at it.'' hy. \\Ma, I wiat listenin' to wvhat yol salidl!' '.'No, you wt'nt't listenin . l'Il say thal for ?rou, Illusband; vou never do listen Well , Jm.I w %vsh VNl tijo 'y. 111l bc rea pleased whien 1 get over ait hein' niad a vour pa. FuninY 1 never guessed thei little cousin, wlcn I szaw lier only yester day. Slhe', a piirty an' stYlish an' pleasant appearin' lit tie girl. 1 w:, turr'ble talvi with lier. Say, .lini, doe j ite ever wcear piink calico'? 1 know ivher !he patiatowhîte ross? Oh, go 'long l Lawsy me. to thinik it's ail corne out right after ali! Now l'Il have somebody to talk to.\" 45 Cents for a 2 Cent Stamp Mrs. Lydia W. Ladd, of Windsor, Ont., offers to send a package of the Orange Lily Treatment absolutely free to every sick and ailing woman who will write for it, per her ad, in this issue on another page. As this package is worth 45 cents, it indicates a confidence in the inerits of the remedy, that is certain ta prove attractive. Good Either Way 111 can't stand dining with music in those hotels,\" said Jones. \"Doesn't it get yoU?\" \"No ,\" answered Smith. '«I like it as a matter of precaution--somfetUfles the music helps me to forget the food and at other times the food helps me to forget the music.\" Saves uflme, Worryand and aloi of dis- comfor*Es when \u002b4 .morning cup 's INSTANT POSTUM e ~rather -Ehan ýt ,teai or coffee y Postum is - t free from caf-, le feineus made in ,na momenrt ,is de- » lIcious, and kkhe le acme ofka6Ie bey-4 eraàe economy at LtINSTANT a POISTUM as to a. f Mrs at a\u0026B f or se f reque the 0 butte] or pri ironin ingsE the fi had c of ah trim way. dari had 1 a chi] to th littie ber p She i ever In boarý My 1 girl 1 Yet, cepti, playi encoi mne i quiet %vazt and gesse how endei and wvent of 'w the f rom chick and ing ~Ah! that man old i wheî gent was spel] ish no b ber too Did 1 of stra me, haVE bas Do I rigb day 1 noni kae in t but aboi tell as nevi of 1 it ' mu] hou out H.aud OfIRce. Winnipeg Total Aomse over 8140,000,000 D«e Oover 31.0.0 For maxmpum of service conaign your grain to The Old Reliable Grain Commidssion Merchants JAMES RICHARDSON \u0026 SONS LIMITED ESTABLISHED 1867 ÇCre fui checking of grades, liberai advancea, prompt adjustments WESTERN OFFCES: Grain Ëxchange, Winnipeg, Man. Grain Exchange, Calgary, Alta. Canada Building, Saskatoon, Sask. q.",
         "THE WESTERN HOME MONTHLY a a Thesuwiiswsnns R.ag Dol ,lIIiiIIlullitiIIa Written for The Western Home Monthly by Mrs. Nestor Noei IMERHLAPS I ought ta have kown better than to intrude *mysef on Mrs. Everett on tlhrashing day. But I wag nw ta the country, and I have ml hxners, su I may, perhaps, be ex- cused. 1 have learnt wisdom now, as thie years have gone by,* and neyer,' neyer sbould I dreani of paying a stray visit to a farm At thrashing time. Mrs. Everett was a very busy woman at ail times. I have known her now for seven years, and I have visited her frequently, yet neyer once have 1 found her ile. In the mornings, wben I called, she was cither domng the laundry, milking the cawa, straining the milk, making butter, feedmng the. piga or the chiekens, or preparing the noonday meal. In the afternoons, she was generally ironing or making bread. In the even- ings ahe Bat beaide a huge basket doing t h family mending. When 1 first knew Mrs. Everett she had only one child-a lovcly, loving girl of about six ycars of age. The littie girl-ber name was Elsie-was always trixn and tidy, neyer intruding or ini the way. I wondered how it was that I neyer saw the mother busy, fussing round ber darling. 1 know 1 sbouid have been, had I been lucky enougb ta possess such a child! But nol Mrs. Everett seemed ta think that as long as abe kept her littie girl in cdean pinafoçes and gave ber plenty te eat, there ber duty ended. Sh. was, of ail the people whom I have ever knowvn, the most undemoustrative. In those days I was a teacher, and boarded net very far from ber farm. My pupil, Elsie, wgs really the brightest girl for ber age whom I h ve ever met. Yet, old-fashioned as sh. was and ex- ceptionally ciever, 's he vas sot aboya playing many baby games. Iu these 1 encourageA ber; for it seems a pity te me when the littie oses grow up too quickly. But lier mother tbought it .vate of maney ta speud it on toys, and su the only thing wbich Elsie pos- sessed of ber own was a rag doîl. And how she id worship that doîl! How she ended it, made clothes for it, dresaed and undressed it. Why, that doîl, Rose, went tbrough evry childish complaini of wbich ita little mother, ElBie, knew the narne. It suffered from teething, fruni colds and froin cougbs. It had the chicken-pox, the measîca and the mumps; and tbrough them ail, Elsie, with ustir- j ing zeal, nursed it as oniy a mother can, Ah! there was mare of motberbood in that littie six-year-old than there le in man a woman who bas borne chidren! I used ta watch Elsie as she sat by hei aid rag doli and \"pretended\" ta feel iE pulse and ta take its temperature! And when she spoke toi me in a subdued gentie voice, I knew that rag dolli( was passing through anc of her ba speils. I neyer laughed at Elsie's cbild ish gaines of \"pretence.\" *Poor littli mite! What else could she do? She ha( nu brothers nor sistera, no companions oi ber own age; and ber mother was alway, too busy ta pay any attentioas ta ber DiA 1Mrs. Evertt really love ber chilis 1 of tes asked myseif ? if so, aILe hadà strange way of showing it. \"'Misa Rhodes,\" said Elsie ose day t me, when I bad been unusualiy busy \"Can't you corne and sec us soon ? Yoi haven't been. for a month. .. and Ros, bas a new dresa. I made it ail mysell Do corne.\", I kissed the cager little face. \"Ai right, dearie,\" I answercd. 1111 caîl or day next week.\" 1 was from the city, and totally ig, norant of country ways. 0f course, knew, f rom reading, that grain is sow' in the spring, and reaped in the autumil but I did net knowv anytbing inuch mor about it than that. 1 could scarcel tel1 a iver frorn a plow, 8r, as for that funnY 1looking, shiî ing tbing they called a dise, 1 ha neyer seen one before in xny lufe! M1ýan of My littie pupils coulA bave given n1 excellent lessons in farmingi Ands it wvas that, ail unconscious of the F muit of work reigning iu Mrs. Everett' house, I tidied inyseif up a bit and s( ~~ut te pay UIy Promiscd visit to in pupil, Elsie. I chose a Saturday for my visit, as 1 had sot ta teacb that day. It was a fine moruing. The sun was sbmning brigbtly in the sky. and a gentie breeze was blowing over the fields, and I esjoyed my walk. As I approached the farmn, there seemed ta be sometbing unusual taking place there. What it was I could sot imagine. There. were wagons going backwards and forwards, f rom some part of the field ta the souse. As I came nearer, I saw a great abject belch- ing smoke from a chimney, and some- tbing near it seemed ta b. pouring out a stream of dust on ta what looked, ta, my inexperienced eye, like a haystack. Tu me it was passing strange, and the noise it made was horrible! It reminded me of factories 1 bad seen froni train windows. Once, I paused anA tbought of retreating from this chaos of machinery anA mes; but Elsie bad espied me and there was no escape. \"We've got the thrashers,\" she told me; but the words con veyed notbing ta my minA. I, entend the kitchen, aMd there I \"0O a%,tihamks, Mm. Everett\" 1 et pauaed again in wondçr. Long beuiches elaimed. \"rd rather stay boe.. 1 Uhed the walle, in place of the. wooden se. you're busy, l'Il make nliy visit a chaire I bad expectcd; the. tables were short one.\" laid * out as if for sa wedding; there I should have liked to have ieft at were steaming, hot biscuits, dainty pies once; but 1 thought it more polite te and chocolate cakes; there were berrnes remain at leaut haîf an hour, as I hâd of varions kinda and rich, dairy butter corne. But Mrs. Everett waé sot i tiny plates stood about the table in thinking of palitenees. 8he, wopi1d have abundance. preferred that 1 leave *t once, I did '0 excuse me talking to yoi» Miss not know that. I coulA not gus\" how Rhiodes,\" said Mrs Everett. \"I'm busy very mueh I was in the way. to-day.\"3 Elsie vamne to my aide sllently and No need ta tell me that. There was placed the rag doll In my arma. 8h. coffee bailing on the atoye, there were ad dressed it herseif in soine old pieces nearly haif a dozen other ketties, and of blue serge, and I admired ber basAi- Mrs. Everett, lifting first one Iid aud work, just as much as ah.expeted I then another, stirred and stirred, and should. And go the minutes by atirred. and wo twu talked on in whltpors. , \"Can I do anything?\" 1 asked in that After aIl, was it not the child 1 bad heipless way which 50 soon answersjta corne ta sec more than the ipothert But own question. the aight of us; two sittin there, doip She was busy at the aven now; but ab\"outely nothing, scemed to wosk -oe abe paused for a moment ta look me up Mrs. Everett's serves. 8he colA ,ilqe and down. Was it a look of scorn she imagine. how anyone coulA ait, with folA- cast on Diy immnaculate waîst and my--ed bauds at any tirne, least of ail 50w. tailor-made suit, especially donned ta There waa anger in her voice as aho pay ber this visit? turned ta Elsie: \"You'd better belp me \"I dan't think you eau do anytbing now,\" abe ordered. ta help me,\" she anawered in her iciest I took the bint and rose ta go, wos- tones. 'EIsic, take Iiss Rhodes to tho dering what usc such a child could b.. Sitting-room.\" Mrs. Everett was again stirring ove the oeFS,- i \\à were coveTed during 1917 with mi BRITISH COLUMBIA' RED CEDAR SHINGLE The farnous Shingles from the Pacific Coast are today - mores ouart ever. Over Two Billion Red Cedar Shingles were demandeddung1lv an advance of 15 per cent. over the previous year. THE 100 PER CENT. ROOF INI APPEARANCE IN SERVICE PERFECT PROTECTION guaranteed by the 3-ply solid covering of a natural non-conductor. DURABILITY assured by the decay resisting oils with which nature bau saturated the wood. ECONOMY-Costs only 25 oenits per 100 square feet on a 1f. of 25 y.ars (a low .4ipm mate for a B.,C. Red Cedar Shingle roo. ail about B. C. Red Cedar Shlngle*ý.-WbT they are superor-how ta, Iay theml-g05a- eral facts about roofing--a handbook everY man ownlng buildings or plaming te bulld ehould bave. NT REE POSTPAID. ON RZQUEST STANDARO BANK BUILPINOe VANCOUVER.O.C. y s, ''r r Cambrai German he out- ck. An' is At right ody to ir, Ont., Orange ree to ho will 8sue on s Worth in the rtain to usie in Mn't e it as a es the 1 and at o forget in~ le- 'ev-4 1' SE FIR IN SATISFACTIO19",
         "TrHE WESTERN_-HOME MONTHLY CET YOUR HORSES SOUND 'Remove blemishes and stop lie lameness so that you can get the top price at the sale, or have sound, strong horses for next sea- son's work. The time to do this is NOW and the best iniment we know of for the purpose is Absorbine is uéed by successful breeders year after year. To the owner of bigb-grade stock, the firet requisite for a liniment 18 that it shall bc ab- solutely saie, and no matter how careleseiy used cannot injure the animal. Absorbine is purely herbaI, and can do no harm. It does not blister or remove the hair, and horse can be ueed. Then they must have results. the liniment must allay pain and take ouà inflammation and sorenese quickly, reduce the swelliiig and thickened tissue. It must be bealing, cooling, eooth- ing and strengthening. Absorbine does ail these thinge quickly and effectively. In addition, Absorbine is a positive antiseptic and germnicide, and when applied to ail irritated surfaces, boot-cliafes, sores, galle, cuts and lacera- tiens, it kille any germe that may be prescnt; makes the part aseptically dlean and causes a healthy healing. to reduce Bursal Enlargements. flog Spav- U ase A b a o r bU 1l R e n, Thoroughîpîns, Puffe, Shoe Bouls, Capped Hocks, Swollen Glands, Infiltrated Parts, Tlîickened Tissues, Rlietînatie Deposite, Enlarged Veine, Painful Swellings snd Affections, Straîns or Lamenese:, to repair Strained, Ruptured Tendons, Ligaments or Muscles; to strengthen any part that needs it. slc You can buy ABSORBIN\\E at regular dealers, price $2.50 pet bottie, or Bend postpaid with f ill instructions. Write us about any specinj case on which you would like advice. W. F. YOUNG9 P.D.F., 138 Lymans BIdE. MONTREAL. CAN. *pend Chrlstmas Back Homel r.. 1$ Corn Othe IPERIALLIMITED Eastern, Canada . TorontoA [o Montreal jUl kbe t or t 5 DailyDaI ý7I.75 Itain . Trai. $59.50 1ae ofral rvlo ru\"langpare tosthe Woorald' reaeHlhon. em Eaterfl Pointa h ol' raet13ha Compartmeflt Observation Cars, Standard and Tourist Sbeepers. Excellent Dining Car Service. Mekts sdi dedng Ocobmihr regou for 6G iys. Extensons wNIIle granted by aI pymtof $JOforacb uta ftUmdays. . FOR FUZTHER INORMATION AHI\u003e RE8RVATIONS: Deot Tickt 6feeoumain trot Cty Ticket Office Phono Main o Phone main $260 Phonos Main 370-71 lIhcu iwritiflg alct s\u003e, hoel \u003eiefl oThe t VVAci-n Hm 1tI, bot stove. Her eleeves were rolled up to the elbows and ber arms iooked nearly as ted as ber face. A loud, ebrili whistle rang out on the air. \"It's the men coming to dinuer,\" she said, , and then, epying the reg dcli 'which Elsie was just preparing to, put se carefully away, Mrs. Everett's rage seexned to reacb its heiglt; for ehe seized the unoffending object and pitched it out of the kitchen. For an instant Elsie gave ber mother one long, searching glance; then, baetily puebîng me aside,she rushied out in search of ber treasure. One of the wagons wyse returning quickiy from the field, and, before I could realize what bad bappened, there Nvas a cry of alarm and fear, and Elsie's little, brown curîs werê mingled with the dust. Tenderly, 1 picked her up and laid ber on the sofa in the sitting-room, then Mrs. Everett turned on me like a savage tigrese and said :-\"You'd better go out and telephone for a doctor. You've done enough misehief for oue day!\" 1 had done the miecbief! Well, of al iu my band, and, on opening it, I found a prettily dreesed French doil. \"Here'. the new medicine,\" he eaid. \"That littie mite is pining for her lost doIL You give ber this, and let me know tbe re- suit.IUcalli in lua few boure.\"1 Mrs. Everett 1ooke jealously at me as I approachcd the bed; but jealous as she wvas of my ministering to her cbild, he had to niake the beet of it, or he -%vouid soon find herseif childiess. But the doctor's gift did not have the desired effeet. Elsie touched and hà'nd- led the new dol a. moment, and looked at me in questioniingl wonder-a hurt ex- pression on the pale, littie face. Then she pusbed the doli from her, and two, big Itears coursed slowly down lier cheeks. I did al 1 eould to console ber; but to no purpose. \"You've only made inatters worse, with your meddling,» said Mrs. Everett, snappishly. One would have thougbt she was pay- ing me for my timie, whereas 1 had offered my services gratuitousiy, inerely for love of the littie sufferer, whom I was trying to qnatcb from the jaws of deatb. But I excused ber in my Santa Claus instructing bis 'reddy Bcar. thiîîg,.! But I beat a basty retreat and ran as I bsd neyer run in my life. The next day, to lier great disguist, Mrs. Everett 'vas forced to ssk mie te take the place of nurse, and so I Nvent over to lier farm,. for a few days and puit off uny tcaehitng. kino-wing I could take back the tinme lost at the end of the tel-n. E l-ie woul scacly a llow lier unother iiear lier-tue sjîght Of lier seenmed to re- eall onietbliniîg witli lijoror. and the doc- tor said te meecrue day: - \"I don't know liow it is. Miss Rhodes; but if that cilid's life is to be savcd, von and 1 will liave to save it. She rectils fronu ie]ii-niotiier.andl often serea nîs ut lier aiî'ah The kick, Elsie received froin î t h io-e e(kld searcely inake bier as ill as Alie is. Do yoîî kuow an i iv ra SO1 fo r t i i, nîattirai att it ude of ftlic gil1 oliTijtierl 1 to1M Ille (1000l'thî Storv Of Ithat 111-1iira- and diyl u1a liit -.eneîieto awnon Ili. -1*1 briîn'-a Il(,\\ia edivine to-nmur- row.'' lie -aid. Vihe nc 1wa pujt tan oblong lbox and doubtless, by this time, 'vas fuil of rernorse for hier former barehuess- I think that, then, she'd willingly have hcld Elsie in lber arms and bugged ber to hier breast, and have eovered bier with kisses; ouly the cbild wouid net permit lier. WVhen 1 saw the doctor eeoming, 1 rau to meet him, and I told hirn of bis fail- tire. \"Elsie's temperature, bas gne up bib\"I said to bînui. Ue siglied, thien îvalked (jiickiy to the boiiae. As for mie, soînelioîv, I could not go back just then. I knewv Elsie %vas alîvays quîeted by the doctor's %-iits, and, as long as lie stayed, I 'vas not se înuch needed. 1 would ivait tili lie liad seen bier and iben lears îvbat Hlope was ieft-if anv! A- I1 wandered around the now ne- ý.i lee-ted yard. 1 eould not but compare it îvith -iliat it hiad been.. EVerett, of course. did bis u-ual I W but hils N\\ifcs Nwa- lai-div touclhed. Thie very ugIliat aprioaeiied nie scemed te sense I lie clianige. H e rubbed against, my skirt and -~Poo. a frai littie He urge( rlouni from thoui lHe %, hie m look( 1Iw Stop] the i him right mis s0 1 wfrl TI enite the told by 1 turfl isii img Moon less 'y, She a il swil ber i tot wve mad frosi bun lutd fit 1 mal in d T han, lugé he\",c 'vil le try thn fori hef\u003c spit id You 1 wv * ha'N to f oi pro hea bool ing ouit lasi lbh iies hoi bIe to hef Yo fiel anh cal for \"-il shE he\u0026 kn, ro lia, lia jl:ii GRAIN We continue te act as agents for Grain Growers in'1lie looking ai fer snd secling of car-lots cf WVleat, Oas, Barley, Rye and Flax, on com- mission olyv. The members of our liina give personal expert service in checking the grading cf cars, and have beca frequently suceesefuil in getting grades raiscd. Liberal advauces made at sevcn per cent intereet on grain consigned te us for sale. Write te us for market information anîd slîîpping instructions. THOMPSON, SONS \u0026 CO* Grain Commission Merchants Winnipeg 700-703 Grain 'Exchange il m m m m",
         "THE WESTERN HOME MONTHLY and lookedl up miserably into my eyes. -Poor oid Reflo,\" 1 murmured. -l'i'm afraid I've done al I cari te sas-c your littie mistress; but 1 seeni to b( of no lise.\" He wbinied strangeiy, anîd soiiethiîig îîrged me to foilow hit as lie Nvaiked round the yard. looking baek at.nie, from time to timte. \"~He seenis to waîît sonîcetliinig,\" I thought. I1 odee what it eoild be. H-e as at bis kennel îîow. and btîrvin- bis no-se in the snow, hie tneartbed what looked te, me to bc part of ant old skirt. 1 went nearè~r and then îniy heart ainiost stopped beating. for Rollo dragged out tIlhe mg doli! 1 took, it carefîiily frorn ilim and exaiîîied it. Yes, il was al riglit. Not eveCit.ii arm lTtr a leg were nîissing. But it îvas îîretty eold, and se I1 carried it to the kitelten stove and warmed it. Then, opening the otbcr door softly, 1 entered the sitting-roouii. One glane at tbe flushed, fevered face of the patient toid me that things were pretty bad by this tiine. The doetor did jiot even turn bis head as 1 cntered. Hie lield â~sie's hand in his, as if hie ere feel- ing the pulse. At a. far corner of the room Mrs. Everett iteîv sat ini speech- tess agony. Crossing over to bier quick- iy, 1 laid the old rag doil iin lier lap. She looked up at me sttspicioitsly; then a. light seemed te dawn on hier, and, siftly crossing the room, she steod by ber littie one's bcd and tenderly, oh so t enderly, tshe plaeed the old rag doll in Elsie's arrns. 1 had flot tbought her capable of sncbl tenderness! Breatbless- Iv, 1 atrhed. as the cîîrly lhead turned (;il the Ipillow% and t he little wasted liands feit thle doil. At tirst, a vatcant, lialf-frigbitenied look ,pread over the eh ildish cointenance: t heii. graduallv, thie old e«pression caine lîaek-the wrapt mnothii--look I had se i g)often on that bldv faree.and then thie liti le voice ,poke gent ly, and 1 luid t o held low tb catch the wor-ds :-\"R.t- dolly ! Nl own rag clolly !, e The dlcor reîniiaiîîed aiiothevr lialf-liour and thven, as lie ivas leaving lie tîirncd to nie atndtisaid. -The crisis i.. over. VoIt caille ju..t nt il%(. Iight îmomnit. \\tuî lhave 'cd Eisie's life.- ..I liait nothiug ito d1o with it,- 1 as- suîred imi. *'Ilt1-.al th.îikS t 11011.' île \u003ciii notsvoli lu u lerstanid. nie. Iliîdeed, 1 think lie îvasc'%ot listeiingli; for lie liait already taken his bag andi-%vas, ont liis w;îVt.. li iext Pat ient. 1 re-entered the sick rooin softly, and -%vas niot ,low to perceive that niy ser- vices were no longer required; for there, it Mrs. Everett's amis, lay lier littie daughter, lier bead piilowed on ber mother's breast. and lier breatb coîning ev'eniy as she slept. Onîe cbildish band hieid ber mother's- tightly, whilst the otlier hugge9ber long lest treasure-her 1)1(1 ag doîl! I! For XkI1or r MU Written for The Western Home Monthly býy Harry %V. Laughiy [~1HER'S ne use talking, May, wve just can't make this farm- ing ptoposition pay.- Here [ j we have devoted two solid years of slavery and hardsbip te thi cursed homestead and what have îve gelte show for il? We could have made il go had il net been for last night'a fredt, but now just look at that field- humdred acres of first class wheat abso- lutely ruined, net wortb a dollar, net even fit for feed,\" and the speaker, a young maxi of about twenty-five, turned away in disgust. The girl whe stood beside bun laid bier baud upon his arm wibb a gesture that suggested a world of synmpatby and drew berself closer te bis sîde as she replied: \"I know %ve are bard lit, Billy, but it wil take more than an early frost le put my Billy Boy eut cf tbe ruînîng. Tbere's iuck ini odd numbers, you know, so e'\"l try onoe more and surely wve can't bave three crop failures in succession.\" Thie man's arms went aboutlber slender forni and he held bier close for a moment before hoe said, in a voice that broke in spite of bum. \"Yen know that 1 don't mind the' dis- appoitments and tbc set hacks, dear. You know that 1 could stick it eut tbougb 1 wore my fingers te the bone; but bere 1 bave entieed yen away from a good home to corne 10 Ibis God accursed land cf f rosts and gophers wberc I've kepI. yout in poverty for tbe lasI. Iwo ycars, aîways promxsîng that tbe silver lining lay at the beart of each succeeding cloud, and nowv look at the consequence. There,\" point- ing te tbe field cf blastcd wbeat that lay oîtstretched beneatb thei, \"I bet the, last resource we bad on eartb and the labor of tw-o long years. Now look at il.\" \"Neyer mind, Laddi,\" tbc girl replicd, iiestling close against bim, \"If Ibis cid bomestead and evervbing 'on it was bov.n to kingdonî corne and noîbirig lef t to us but your enipby bands and bard odi head wve would g'-l. along, somncway. You just stop worrying about that old feld cf îvbeat and wciil go te the sback and bave a good, big cat. Then we'Il catch up thc bronks anad drive to town for bbc mail anti forget A about it,\" and with tbe ready gitîle cf a tender woniani she drew birn away v.ithli er, tbough bier beart ivas the hcavicr cf bbc two, for sbe knew that Ibir prospects m-cre ruined. Over a well cookcd dinner, and the roping and barmcsing cf bbc bonks she iadgered hini mbt a senîblance'of bis iîstial ebeerful good nature aad when at iast tbcv boock tbebriudge atrîss te ib- s1one 'on the' bigb sbopelic r'itîcd ini tbc hlaf wild tcam witb a wboop and a rimngî Lotigit. A twelu'c mile drive tîvcr the rttllimtg Pranre tril broug t tlmer to the illae they called \"town\"-a cluster of tumbie down sbacks encircling a tank and an eevator-and bere 11ey proeeeded te oelebrate. They bougbt- a balf dozen magazines a sack of bananas and one of chocolates at a Chinamian's restaurant. A pair of silk stockings, a bottie of gherkins, a can of boney and the biggest bottle of olives lhey could find ini the grocery store and wbite tbe general trading was gomng fonard Ibis new-made farm woman samdiched in a couple of boxes of sbot gun sheils le he- used on chicken and wild duîek- and a pickercil rowl witb a generous supply of lin. The Iast cf Ibeir business mas to gel Iheir mail, for tbe pemuisai cf Ibeir letters was always lefIte the pvay of the long drive homne. To-day they liad a miscellaneous col- lection, a latcb of. papers a couple cf weeks old, a circular from a farmn machine company, one from an insurance agent an Ia big fat one from Bill's broîher bacl keast. The letter fromtborne was Ieft te the last, that il migbt hold its place in memerv, btut was rend at lengtb witb minglcd comments of wondcr. W'ar bad been dcclared somne lime before but had created very litîle excitement on the big ranges of te west. Nowî, bovever, gEngland bad Ibrown down flice gage in support cf martyred Belgiitîtami blic easlern prov- inecs ere rtîîgiîîg îitlî cnlbusiasm. l'le boysa aI. imîe iere r:îllvîig te the colorai, so the letter ran, everyone wvas going nnd cf course ilfmas laken for granted Ibat Biliy v otld be going tbe. Àfler lte reaitîg of flic Itter blîcîr tongues ran like wiîd ire antd the' situation ,was caavasscd front everypîshi angle. Though MLay cuit sec t ut Billy was ont tenter hooks tbgo. 'yel he nmade tic sign, conlenting binasel if thl revaliing the days îvbcn lic andtihIe olliers, rode with blic Iliwgars aI honte, specîuiat ing as to wheîler the reginienat would lw ealled and which cf thte boys wotlîîlic clicoseti. Mav îvatched hua fîîrl îvel 'v . irat ie tr own concîtisions andti IaI itighît as lbcy sat Ih.side thme ire re:îting thietaîr news front their hatth \u003cif oliil:itv e :urs she starter! îith a litle twiuige cf pa:in eavilfitie b' isworc ls'neatl is bilrrath, rt-:tîing cfrIiv .sueepiag drive t hrottgli lelgiurni andI(-f t flcitirttroits lesctrît ion uvougb lty thte (?,rinan soîdiers. NexItidaY i' sleat bis work îvîi le N i av st ciiilit n -if fot i- -a site knew tîtîst virt. btli'it \u003cbrore-a uu tri ltonc- andi te ktiiîplit i tle-living rmstui lîfirf- lie spokt- wain 'f lhe wa:r. TIn ii laidi bis hawut tpîn lic- as ht' ýaitI elir and \"akei:hîii.MNay. do voti think Foir a lon rnttt Aw S-,t -! i tu Wliat Could Be More Practical for An Old Time Christmias Gift Than Fairweatheèr'sFurs Second only to the initial Christmas season this year stands out alone. It, will be a Peace Chrietmas. The giving of gifts will be lavishly indulged in. Al the scif-denial of the past four years wilI be recalled, and gifts worth while,ý permianent and lasting, will mark for v'ears to corne this historie Christmas. If it's a gift of Furs it will becflot only the more welcome, but the fiore lasting if itis purchasâdat FAIRWEATER'S LADIES' FUR COATS DABE CANADIA3 M \u0026T COAT- 50 inîcies long. Sites: 36 te 46. Made heom exta havy ful-frre skas;fuil, luise back and large storma collar. Lineri RO witb beat qUality Skinner's satin .................. MINE MARMOT COATS- Made f romn choire ovely matehod. pliabo kinsa. 5 nie long. and ail ases, wbith large storia coliar, ined witii very strong Venctian. TAUPE LARMOT CÔATS- 45 i;îcbs long. withiloose box bark; bau large storini mUai and cuiTs of slecteri Hudson Seal; il slash porkets, and linrd wltii bet quality f brown Skiniier's satin. Price .... RATUBAI' SILVER RCCOON là '0 CA- 4i ic hes àl ong, wi th f ,b'm ripple skirt; large shawl roll colar and deop enfla. Linod with hbro w $250 m. Skinner's satin. Prie@s.........i........... Drw $20 0 pLAIN HUDSON BRAI' COAT-With ocaO ripple bac.d large skirow«p. Made f roma sected , el-furred, strong petry; bas Iml storin collari and fancy in ut'Lineri with fancy silk broca.o. ce ................ .. rua-LIME» COATS- Made fromn nuane 1îported Engrlisb twediixtures of doube. fared blanket c1oth- lined te waist wit¶ selected Canadiansad ag collar and cuila of cioice Alaikasable. Ail 50 incites long. Pries.........16 .0 FUR SETS aE= FOX 8S1TS- Made fromn prime, seiectod. fuil-furred skina. Stole i animal ahapu and finished with bomi. tail. and ha. paw fasteninga, Round an\"ma muff. e trimned and lineritto match. Pst Set.....wel- $45»ad ic BLACK WOLPSETS- Marie f reinstrong. elf, ;ýrà»iiFskln. 6 u nia shape, with hesd.tla nd paws. Fastona close up te the necit. Plain 1on sa i Tto match. Fer cst ............ s4S0 NA; WOLY SETS- From beautiful go hd\u0026ful-'fùrredakin8. Ma\"e M new ehouider cape. which can be worn close up \u0026round the face with a gracful t ils fnisbed witi boari, and bas fasteninga on pawa. New Canteen muSf to match. d à Pser Set .........jj.. -;ýâj..........'*iù i TASIMIA OPOSSUM. SES-h e fbown, and Osoa f itemciur-2 inexpensive fils. Made in largo shoulder cape coliar, and fastens with lie atringa. i 1ar ' 'lIfmlon shaped muff te match. POt Set .................... i ,.rIic 15u. OPOSSUM- Ricit, delicate looking fur. Yet very durable »adidrs. A very attractive and becoming futr f Iounf ladies. Made lu smort style, animal eRot, beautifully lineri and trimrnnd w ot a ad paws. Large, plain, barraI.. sha e u ematch. PserSUt..... .................... .... ...m e NATURA' RCCOON SETS- Marie f ront selected. full-furred Canadian bine skias. Vey choira, anid wearing qualities unexcellett. Large curvei neck aearf1 niade la animal shaame.l abowing n4ttural heari, tail and four liaws. Lined with good quaity sfi .1k.m n L atriped, lSil, barrel-shaped muff te match. Par Set........Y.7...a., à is FOX ÎBTS-- Maie f rom choire, extra iteavy, 1oghre aaes o kn.u ofteselecteit, durable. strong fr ion ii ean adie In very large »jma 1 tf bas bet quality, very sot silk linling. Large animal round muff. trimmed ad Iiiie\u003c o tematch. FP s t .... . .. . .. . .. . .. . . .. . .. . . . ..i NAUKL IHAMDSOME DADOMER ETB- Mareinae d niaitined 1th44 gri y mil, and trimmeri with bend, tail antd paws. Large Canteen, plain Initi te$ 7 0 match. Po t ...t..................................................$3 0 MEN'S OATS HEAvy ELACE DEAvI1CLOTN....Ch~amnois ned tlimnug\u003cout. Overocata wth gond quality Otter shawl collar, and strong Venetian linig. Ai I m§$4 0 Frics..... $50 FINE LA BEAÉ vERC'LOTE O[ ''VEMCOA T - i*ned** witlih- eavy Saet;n~sv~ strong and warm, witit large Porsian Lambh collar andi ispela. Ail aise.. .ÔOA-4ied trnuoutwith MLak Marmot, CANAIAN USER? LIE»- iarkBcavrrloh Ovrcoaa.Tts la Oneo Our mp- cïaly resY ona. nriba lagenatrelCaadin \u003ettr aaw coia . Alimso. .$.75.0( fureti sot. liale kin. Mde eryeas inthebety fr cmfo t e .tremely warm. fias large mistorin ceollar, and fin( i t h eavy quitei anît ra4 satin. AUl.4 . Sites. ?ri ce . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . . J FINE WOMBAT COATBS Madie f rom selecteti, natural skiais. woli urred a.d**** flau.hed.,wih iethe-rt ys at alil boopa, atnd vnt ai opning taback. 1Strongly lict it uilted Farnier's satin.Al i5.Pue. EI.ACE DO0 COATS- Ilave g'or aprwaranco, for t4\u003ewn or countîry wear anr a splendid driincoat. The mkias are large, w'il tetineti anti vî.rytoft land pliable. e extra large sitswl oroler, and we,lii- witit quiited Farîncr'a msatin. Alaimes, . H@EIABLEc NATrUPAL RACCOON4 COAT\u0026- Marie frenm selècteui, Wel iatc j!1l furred Canadian Cona. Drap stori etllar, la shswi style, anîd lineri wiîh hf-avy satin. AllizleFric,.............. ............... .........$1 .00p 0COON COATS oh ipewrior quality, f romeaviiy furred,.w,.ii-nuiateh,4tCanadian china. ïxtra sof tand pliable. Fuli. roomY sirt,aniv.-rY eonftortat.in for walking or driving. Ha. larus ,.înrm ihawi collar, andi lined i wth heavy superior qtîiity sitin. Ail li*s Frics ... ...........1................. i .f w NATURAI' HAIE BEAVER COATS- Wk-auttfil, dark, perfertiy matcher isn. Tita co,it are minde v'rv lart\" in the skirt. andl gënerous fitting througabout. Largeo storin ollar andi lapels, and lined weuh hut quaiity hrnwn Skinn.-r'ts satin. $50 FAIRWEATHER FURS are sold with a money- hackgtiaranteof satiisfaction. XVe pay expresti charges. Write for our beâutifully illustrated f rec, catalogue. Fairweather \u0026 Co., Limited 297-299 Portage Avenue -Winnipeg ~l *'~-\" - *1 t-. ither, bave [1 er with nt 1 raxi tfail- up o the could Elsie îtor's 1 was it tilt vbat sense",
         "~2O THE WE!TERN HOME MONTHLY - - {V-e i bmiat t gRave u atXmastimethetimeof fmil W reunin, ad te stenghenigdg Wat ab iet Xrnogift o ife r-nand tedren t ife ofy ter tdhoe ie ha one? i Terat questin o lies po- netei a fuit ttractivme Wha bete Xms infrmtonwill agidly be fuish e nreqest.ed Thie Greatet ife t tespo vie nurac n o.tatv Dept. « «Q' HEAD OFFICE-- WINNIPEG jpace witliout sTpeaking then a tear drop el upon the Çhand that covered hers. 'hat was ail, lie understood, and quietlY bis arma were slipped about lier. CHAPTER il The days that followed were busy ones upon the little liomestead. May tlirew herseif into the effort to get affairs i shape to let lier boy away to join the roops at liome-now mustering rapidly in every New Brunswick village-and a few days saw their stock all rounded up, lie implements got together and every- bi gi order fif the public sale tey lad ldd upon. ?By the tie ail this liad been accomplished Billy found that lie nust go at once, i order to secure a place in the borne battalion, so it was decided that May should romain behind, close up thie business of the sale and thon go eaut to lier id liome poding Billy's return, whciMey thouglit would not be long delayed, as military criticW the world over wre, at that time prophesying a tirce montli's war. May drove lier big soldier to the dopot in the old buckboard, clung to bim a This set May to thinking and she finally decided to take the girl's advice and the near future showed the wisdom of lier choice, for, when a short time later she offered a bunch of cattle for sale she found to her, surprise that, thougli the cattie were in the pink of condition no one seemed to be in the market tu buy. The same with the borses which she offered later. Just wheh the demand should have been the best nobody seemed to need an .- Su with the piga and with alk the stocz and ail this in the face of the fact that tliey had bouglit nothing but the best when they came to the prairie a couple of years before. At first she could scarcely believe lier senses but as the younger girl persisted in drawmng her attention to petty details that she migbt otherwise have overlooked she was forced to the conclusion that the \"Cotton Tops\" as Kate usually called the other settlers were trying to freeze her out. Now in May's delicate body there flowed the blood of one of New Bruns- wick's old lumber kings, a man who always claixned that lie couldn't controi a crew if there was a man in the buncli whom he couldn't, lick\" and wlien she was forced Whm ,vting advcerts\u003cars, picase mmt ion The Il'cstcrn Home Montfily Knit Socks and Dollars witli the Auto Knitter Profitable employment at homne in wai\u003c or peace time Sock-more socks-tlie Soldiers' eal! The bosiery industry is boomning and the demand far exceedu the supply. Help us filit but get away frorn slow hand knitting. Use the fast, reliable, modern Auto Knitter. We gladly take ail tbe socks you wish to send us and pay you highly profitable prices. Thie Auto Knitter in simple and eamily leart- and gecuresa abig income for full or spare time work right in your own horne and no previous experience i. essentieL. Write toda fr flli particulae enclosing Sc stainp. See what good Auto Kaitter Hosiewy (Cao.) Co., Limited, Dept.sS3 607 College St., Toronto. The B The% lest Magazine Value Available- Vestern Home Monthly at $1.00 a Year moment at partmng then kissed bim good- bye with a smilo upon bier lips and watched the train pull out with eyes grown dirn with tears. Wbcen the train liad dispered she turncd lier snortîng tcam toar the prairie and started on bier wiay back borne but about hall way there she turned aside from the main trail and drove to an outlying homestead wliere, as previously arranged she picked Up and took bomene with hier a big, laugbing, rosy cheeked girl of about twienty. Wheni she drove into the barnyard that night it seemcd to lier as thoughli er poor acbing beart must burst of loneliness-for .,hi w~as only a girl at the best, and a delicate, fragile girl at thiat-but, winking, back the tears that persistcd in welling to ber eyes she lbclped the girl unhitchi the teai and turn tbemn loose, tien led tbe way over to the cabin. Ilere, over an imlprovisC(l supper t hev talked the p)ropo~sition over as it appeale(1 to them and the vounger girl, -whio lad a wise old heaid ipofliber Ahapely' shotllers, advised that NMas go slow- with hcir sale. for, as she said, \"if these 'nesters around bore se vou stanipeding to selI. wlbv, they'll jest natvlhelly l:îy for voit, that's l, 'and vou %von't get habll what v'our stuif is Worth.\" to the conclusion that the gang waS camped upon her trail ber small jaw shot out pugnaciously and she used a word that lier fighting forefather had olten used to enliven the jam hreakers along the Mýooselîimn Right-otT, vhile lier hlood was up she callcd the other girl. and said, \"Kate, thîs outfit is not for sale. 1 arn going ta stick right here and wvork it.\" \"Good for you,\" carne the an»vcr. \"That's the kmnd of talk 1 like to hear. If 1 had an outfit as good as yours these Cotton Tops eouldn't freeze me out in a thousand years.\" May looked at the young amazon with admiration and thcn a thought struek her, for, in deciding to stick to the borne- stead she had jurnpcd to a \u003concliksiofl, wvoman like, without stopping to reason i out.. o ; it stid cly occurrd to er that, with IÇate's assistance slw might he able to actitalir' operate the fari and hold lier stock togetîser. so she said to ber: \"M'hat dIo voui sav if vou and 1 take a turn at farning? lif 'or Dad would let vou star wihîh u riglit along I bclicve %vC coul(l make it g. \"Make it go, well 1 should say we could Yotn just go over in the rnorning and ta1w a. whirl out of Dad and if voit ean work hira over wve1l show thesc (;Idrnoss backs In the good old summer time",
         "THE WESTERN HOME MONTHLY wlio put tlie winkles in tlie bull's bmr,\" axid for the flrst time since Billy wente awyMay indulged in a good hearty ýI CHAIPER Ili When tliey drove over and \"«took ai wlilout of Dad,\" the feliowing morning tlie old man laughingly waslied bis bauds of the wliele matter, tellixig them tliey miglit do as tliey pleased. Thus left to themseîves they quickly gathere4 up )ate's belongingsanaxd on the way back home, in liigli geod humor with them- selves, tliey planned the eutset of tlieir campa gl. Kate was a product of the range, w4iple- some and free as air, witli a thorougli kxiowledge of stock raising and ail that gees with it, and as seen as they arived at home she tbrew a saddle on to ene of tlie bronks, rode eut and rxi in the cattie. They çut eut the steers that were fit for beef, mun theni back inte the fenced field and turned the old cows and young cattle eut on te the open range te rustie until snow came. Next tliey turned their attention te, the herses, sorting them. as they liad done the cattle, corraliing those that were fit for work and running eut the mares and colts. When they came te the pig pasture Kate stoed a long tine gazixig over tlie woven fence at the herd of porkers-nibbling the tender grain with which the field was sowed-and wlien May flnally asked lier what she was mooning about she answered absently: \"It's miglty funny that nobody ever made s buncli of fool pigs psy, for I believe it cari be donc.\" \"IAIl right,\" May laughed. \"There are the fool pigs. Go te it and make theni pay,\"' and they went on down the field, jokig, until they came te, the mucli talked of field of wheat. \"Don't it seeni tee bad te, have te turn ail that grain uxider?\" Mlay asked sadiy. Kate made lier way eut into the waist higli grain before she answered, pulliug off head after liead, exammling theni carefuliy. Then she burst eut. \"'Turu yeur grandxnother's duckliehuse under. That stuf will mnake the very bcst of feed. \" \"'No?\" May cried, excitedlv,\"r o sure?\"P \"Arn I sure? I froze my fingers manyc a day liauling poorer fced than that to a1 band of doWges.\"t \"'Then if that is so wc mav be able to1 makesomething out of it yet.\"'i \"lHow much hay did Billy get put Up1 dovn on the bottoms?\" Kate asked. 1 \"About a hundred and fifty tons.\" t \"«Well, just xnultiply that by five dollars1 a ton ini the stack and you'Il know what' that field is worth to us, for we'll eut the1 wheat for our owni feed and sel the hay to the feed barn maxi in town.\" \"But will he buy it, and pay us for it?\" May wanted to know, rememberixig her experienoe with the stock. \"Well, if he won't huy it from us this fali he will next spring, and he'1l pay usà ten dollars for it then instead of fi'e,\"1 and time told that the girl was right.1 That very afternoon they hitcbed the9 horses to the binder anid started ini t put the grain ishock. Kate rigged up the team and made the flrst couple of rounds, instructing May ini the operation of the big machine anid sooni she turned it over to ber altogethel, anid ,tarted in herseif to do the shocking. Which of thec girls worked the liardest neither ever knew. Mqay's amis ached within an hour, from the weigbt of the heavy Uines. Kýate's back soon stiffened from hlandling the bulky bundles, anid long before quitting time botli were aching witli fatigue. But they stuck to it, day after daY, anid, just when tbey were comxnencmng te become hardened to their work, relief camne. Kate's Dad secured a wandering lialf-wit to help them with the shocking. After that things went swunmingly. May rau the binder-the lightest of the work. Billy, the half-wit followed the machine while Kate hitched up the bronks and started hauling i the bundies, piling tliem in a taxigled heap around the corrali, making no pretense at stacking, for, as she said, \"it neyer rains in Aberta i the fali, anYNway.\" So the days passed sud the work went on apaoe. The crop ,wýa8 harvested and the big field plowed. The hay was sold to the barn maxitlie steers te the fat beef' buyer andwlien flialy the liogs were1 culled out and sold May found licrself i possinof ample funds to carry lierj trghaotlier year, anid one .of lier flrst1 provisions was te ace tliat Kate lied an1 opportuxity te make those \"ifool piga\", pay, for, after tlie systeni was explarnedi to lier slie came te tlie conclusion that1 they could mise a berd of liogs witli veryi little outlay of èither time or money.1 They spent theleust few days beforei freeze-up getting the posts set for a larger Pasture for the spring and bought a dozen brood som-s te add te the fine one theyi had kept. Then,,wlien the cold niglits came and the 1lr of an Alberta autumn was upon theinithey roamed the prairie on their saddle liorses, aliooting ducks and prairie chickens, making excursions to points of interest on the prairie and flshing in the innumerable lakes anid reoeks. CHAPTER IV During the long, cold days of winter, to quote Kate, tliey just atuck around anid got fat. I tlie mornm tliey would tumble eut of lied at dayl*glit, scramble inte tlieir outdoor clotlies and make a dali for the corrails. A hlafliour of forking bundles to the cattle and grain te tlie liogs would start the young blood te racing througli their veins and by the turne they would get back to the shack their appetitea would be in shape for a real man's ize breakfast-bacon and Ze anaxd flapjacks. Tlien their day was dvided somethixig like this. Two liours liousework te get everything in shape, tlien magazies until noon. A few big yawns, then back into tlie mackinaws anid axiother turn at feeding and a run te the creek te open the water lioles. Then dinner and magazines agin, or, if tlie sfternoen were fine, s run on s, orm the saddle, or a couple of hours with the tlong toboggan on the ateep aide hill above the ahack. Se tlie days wore on te apring, and the anow disappeared from the prairies. Then ail was bustie about the homestead. The girls were up with the early dawn and etheir songs rang eut with the lark's. Their seed wss fanxied, their hanes ever- hauled, the machiery gressed anid every- thing gone over for the twentieth tine, anid new tbey but waited the day to start thiebig drills foraeediflg. It seemed to May afterwards that those busy spring days were the lies et i ail lier life, for she felt that now, or the first time ini al lier years she was really living, anid doing eomnethig and, as she atood upon the foDt- board of her drill, sweeping up and down the field behind lier prancin'g four-up, @lie go iedi the possibdlities that lay befere lier. flnesa or fatigue she neyer felt now. Her alender muscles were as bard as whipcord. The days were neyer long enougli for the things she had te do, and, when at niglit, dog-tired and self cern- placent over work well donc she would I'turùin,\" lier head would scsrcely toucli the piliow tii alie would be asleep.. As soon as the days became warm they aowed the seed upon their pig's pasture- oas and wheat anid rye-and snoom a swarming brood of littie pige surrounded each grunting mother as ahe rustled emon the tender grain. Thoe was indee a time of loy te the two girl farmners; littie calves were jumping and blatting eveiywhere, eaeh isodmr guarded an inquisitive colt and it seemed as thougli the sa'it of life was rampant in everytliing a LIut. The year urne out good for crops, gentie raisna flhng ail aummer long and as the fail drew near and the liay was put in staclc the girls fait asaured that\u003c\u003ebarng an early froot, their 'Fowards thl st at te swore every night when the wind went down and May would whisper a prayer of thankfulnese eacli morning when she arose and found that dew had f allen instead of froet. Every day they would visit the field of wliest and at lut there could be no furtlier doubt, the .wu- ripe andi ready to bccut-a leldofWflvig Od. To provide agalin t the liarvest May lied Secured a aturdy fanm hand whose duty it would be te foleow the binder ahock up the grain and relieve the girls ;I althe beavier work, foir, now that a crop waa asaured, the e«Pense of harvesting lied become a mere detail. Let the New Year Bri g You Lighter Days1 It's just great, the way you can get your baking and cooking done with this new style range. There will be no more stooping to watch the'oven. You will find the everyclay meals so mnuch lighter work and so much quieker that the really big job of everyday will become one of the lesser ones. If you like a beautiful stove- - -one that makes your kitchen a cheerier place to work in, consider f-re i- _.,Ble -amlPoi-... Nckl, lan ohhh às The New fLTER DAY HIGRANGE COAL or WOODR IG Built to standing- height, easy to swecp under. high--up oven-wvateh fobd cooking without stooping. labor saving features. Cuts Fuel Costs Extra long fuel box, handy for ,\\ood. C Oven placed high to be in direct path of flanes. Oven heats mnuch quicker than old styl-e ranges. The saving in fuel is very noticcable. Glass door on Has mnari'y new No More Blacklead This range is vcry casy to kccp bright and clean. A damp cloth is ait that is ever nceded to kecp the Lightcr Day in the samne sparkling condition as the day yoU got it. ' tr ttlsývnui Claire Biros. Western Limited Makers of Hecla Furnaces. WiMrnpeg, Man. ICLARE BROS. WESTERN LIMITED Winnipeg, Mani. I Please seuîd ie your illuitratcd st\u003ery or Thie New 'Lighter DaN\"' Rantre. A u ld re ss . .. .. .. .. .. - .. .. u i ,,~ * Y\u003e - To-night is the best te to send in the couno)n an flet th -C t.-I ,l.n,le.Irfil range tol-1 by actual photographs -frc. vas shot word oftn along blood said, e.cr. hear. these ini a i with ;ruk hoe- usion, reason to her zht he d hold take a ad let coulîl. d take i wOrk b aks i%ý a Three finisbes, Blue Enamel, Polished Nickel, Plain Pornhed Steel 1 1",
         "THE WESTERN HOME MONTHLY In due tinte tue orop wua cut, and etacked, threshed snd hauled to the eie- vatot and at the advanced priee of whe.at reculting from the war, May wus sur- Prepad to find that one'crop alon\u003c hIid moitan repaid thern for ai tieir lesses. Ibis year their crop of steers was largtér and aold at a better price, and, wonder of wonderu Kate had made thc pen of \"bool p\"Pypsy. Frnt a field of roots sowod aleaisidethe posture fonce she had kept tut supplied with food aftor their grain begmto toughen, and when it came to fàmbe, tints, a cul of woeks at the »V fd«mfiBe wih baleyturned'ont lispigu in condition that caused the early bu\" to py even beyond the fancy price tàitwu bingpaid for finished pork and thé amount of the check she received when the lot haiI been delivercd almost took May's breath away. Now after the girls had finished thoir fWi work and were taking their vacation, ahooting sund finhing as they had donc the fall before they made a practice of iookirg up the hormes and cattle and drifting t.lîor toward the home ranch, and on one of thms trips, after a etiroful scrrutiny of the cuve piaing round their mothers, Kate suayi oay, ttotghtfiily: \"You htaveofoten heard of a i\u003eaek hon Some of thie Hi ppodrome cats who camne to theoparty in theïr «\"niake uPi\" andtihelîtedto en- teriainth te 2.000 kiiidic.s mlo. as iîîvited guesis of the Eiks ini their elui)-u-IOse oit West 43rd Street, New York, reveiveti generous portions of candîy and play' toy S, December 27. $5OOO in' Victory Bonds iý....:.. F R E E POSITIVELY GREATEST PRIZE O lIER i Ever Made in Canada hPIEN to every bonafide customer purchasing ~gods from us by mail. Merchants, Insti- tutions and Christie Grant employees barred '~'from participatmng. MOENTRANCE FEN-no age limîit-no restric- NOtions as to religion, politîcs, nationahity or color Every mail order customer has a chance * for a prize. l Our Big Victory Bond PrizeOffer To the 50 il Order CUIStomêrr rÔm w110M WO reeei.v0 tfu.110~ ' titi11 ii iilitti(of ilii ius'y u111)nta l i icludiîug MiN'l l it.v , 1919.* W.-. Ni l givoSA.00.Mi orltlu (ii Vi-i mu'yonds, dividqî'tinut o i50 Prizîts. Ymui totalauîiiiti in alfal your ot'dvuti îi luth yoU itt'iiIls us tinit titti tnadi -to-lace value of Victory Bonds, tItil 1it'îiiuiu Mill gel liaiinterCt ut J N ii i-i diiOte I it i It.i1919. HOW TO ENTER CONTESt Send aet once for a cop of cuir Cataiog, ifiloni litivo fot. onnl tirv\u003c'it1%. Bor(oi r o ur iiiglibutr s booiik iiiil ytti s 5yti- rt 'i Don't lote a moment of tinte, lsi's iîi îtryuitu bs'git,î tuî-ittlii srders flietsIst tr y \u003c\u003ctr îelmîî- iwe t NiL ihj.gg\u003c 'r tiI ti. trtlng wth tuie loth of Decomber, 1'ttiutîîuuî 1,11i11ti' til tittli 4ftif o r Iires' i'Nlli lisent.- -ititi i'î-î'i' t dr. itt i' \u003ct it tis DONTI LOSE SIGHT 0F THIS FACT While you not only have a good chance to wmn a big prise., '\u003cit coirret, Misuoii:iilt'' vt, for.ii1i''tl tt ii tt' u r~ itt ti .REMEMBER No coupons wit be ssued by us after May 3lst, antd. itidv istI lrize ....................... ...... $1, O(0.00ii 'tou \\ N.t1utu t ,itutt \\i î5 it i u t i iri ti'r z . . . . . . . î u ,. . . . . . . 7 r u VICTORV BONDS ARE DEPOSITED) IN DOMINION BANK $5,.00Oini Vctory' Bonds tiovt'Itil t'tî-itt ii ttt' )Mtitiituni Ituîiik, N ililtli tti i ttt'1v t. w Il bh i' tii rim tui t l t tt l i Ni t tui if you wsh to cash your Bonds ýN.ii vai lt -t a t 'i-,tt . wtiii gii t' \u003cti i tee vialue ' r u it i tu JUDGES 0F CONTEST Mrî. ..........îiijuiii . . . . . . . I- lltîu -tîuuî' 'tt Itt ANNOUNCI NG WINNERS The wtnnel'5 of the prizes îî1wtt iti i.r titl ttti uii / t 'ut t i h itt i iIl t b :p t- l 1 WHY WE DO THIS We want to increase the numnber of our nmail order custonters. n a i r îtl!Ior c ltiont . Svnd ilt1 11t i I ide-l [t t t,,,liît,g 1. . ý. 'N t'I:tit1 uit ' .tîqi i t orttnî t ilduîî ti t..îîy. Do fot delay your requests i t i \\tsaletîî''t aêmi oui. iiuig C(' t t 1 - .*. t Christie ýGrant Limited WINNIPEG DEPT. P CANADA Isying a white egg, but did you ever hiear of a white lhon laymng a black one?\" \"No. Did youf?\" May .askedl in- nocently. \"No, nor I neyer heard of a Shorthorn cow dropping a Hlolstein calf cither. Iook\" and she pointcd to wherc a black, and white caif was sucking a big red mother. Welel, that is quer,\" May exclained, and ivas further nîystified when a little furtlier search located two other duIiîîligq among their exclusive brood of cbickis. Kate was noncommi Ital, b)ut the next morning, withogt ever hiesitating, shie led the way to a bunch of catle that was feeding ten or twelve miles away where they discovered the same irregularity in the bord that had occurred in tîteir own bunchi, only in this case three big Short- horn calves, beauties, werc mothered iy low-bred, knot hcead cows. its soon as they were certain of their facts 1Rate said: \"Now we'll ridle ovcr and lave a tailk with 'Dca-I Bye, and yoti jttst leave Ille talkir.g ail, Iot me.\" \"But Raute,'' Mlay protesfed, \"Il. isli't safe. If hie stole cour calves hie's lîad enoughi to do anyýthiing.\" \"Sure hie's lia(I nough, but lie hasn't got thte nerve. Nobody but a coward wou1(i steal a sucking caif. You just take it froin me. I've heen on te range sine 1 was so sinall that 1I had to jurnp to pick a rosebud cnd I've iever seen a rustier who hiad haîf the sand \u003cf a coyote. Why a man's jest natchelly got to be a sneak before hie ean bc a thief. Now you just leave this bad man to nme. 1 know 1mw Dad liandies thenu,\" and grini andtilent she rode Up to \"Dcad Eye's\" shack. Without any prelintnat'ies Rate ivent straiglit to business as soon a8 the old thief showed hiniself. \"Say, Dead Bye, we've got tlîrce of your calves over in our buneh.\" \"Thet's qucer,\" Dead Bye answercd, «'I aim't none short.\" \"No, you're righit your none short,\" shie shiot back at him. \"You've got a thoroughibred Sitorthorn caif inl yotir buchl for ovcry knot-headed Hlolstein we've got in ours. Now w'hat have you got to Say about it?\" \"What biey 1 got to say about it? Why jest titis. Thet if you wvas a mnan I'd drive thet lie down ycr throat with a bult.\" \"Yes you m-ould, you poor old one-eyed chirken thiief,'' sle tatinted with withering contetimt. Wi you neyer got farthor titatn to steal a luail bounter in ail your life and if cver yvînt lv u îake Wild Bill talk to mue aluotit- vour gunipiay l'Il take you (bow'n and i st (t yo(ir ueck îvhile 1 pick the fox lail out, of your whiskers. Say, V've got, a notion to tromip the liver out of voit riglit n11w,'' ani, uvlapping thle spurs into lier lborse shit junîpd hini fair on top of I le nid sinîter, Sent Ilim spinning, wiiii'h'd lier brun k aoid ,t\u003c tlt01'ito in\u003c1 foot and St ututi ireir\u003c' t rel)eal. the performnance if lie offered lI show fight. \"S -,Y, ttt' the mal ter wit.it yuili, an ' Vw:;t %vu-pîîgu ar niedite onIlle ilîîîav oli ilnow llintvalves is lranded'c dd, ut -u'ii' in'own mittlIers, so wviîat, pilt goiit' 1I o oaboîut '',I1 know w'e eai't, get Ilite caives' l)aek, for you've itade a good job of the 5sVop and M-eC ait t pin a single I iiig onto\u003c yot, Ibut ii\" Il pass Ille word aioîig I o IPaddy, Ille Nituînt y, antd have Iijiiatt yot onulIhe black list, and i' you eýrer so inucit as bat an eye again tîter Mounty boys'il go after you just like lte stag liotiitds go after a coyote. Antd ini the tîietitilit- ibang, the sitot- gmtlitaï, sue iteidlted across lier saddle horu ent off andt( a luati of dtick sitot tore a bucket of dirt oit tif lime, old sod sltaek tchind Ilis lite.id. -Uaîg tat gin, tiiy%%a,,'' Site exriaiimeti,'1I iever vil1 get umcd to iîandling .111aîtutilatic. Butt ton t yOtt Seec lo to irkcly you were IliteI.ou \u003cidî't gett liittb'1 A side of' yoîtr lead sitot off? And Noit kniow as wellas 1 I o thalt)ojury o\u003ci Illte1pra irie wt l ld 'ver vt iiv nt a gI- for il t tii.i iiila iiisi 'iarge o f li er sîtot g\" unl it es u l w icîtItle a vcie i tie ap - iteell i lie a iitiss tîtief. Cet 1uic?'' -i#([ tlle girl lotked liîiii stri'agiit. ini te eye, wvit h'a vîtutîtis gleaiinu lier îtwi. i\u003e-Dva î-;Ye eeticiîtv gmt lier,'' for lie i iîeia sivkiyV eliow ait(I afi cmlthe girlS fiad ritode avv c iuuttcred to liiiiself: '\"' lieliiia ver i ck wutuld liiiflirt a 111.111 in i i lil)i lte aîîd (Ithe girls hiad no uftrthcer trouble about their cv.ives- CrIAPTER V Whlîe nourislîing rainit and soothing w nuls î-olibljîîî'i vti jttducuutis illanage- îi en t l igt ie tttîlt i f u Ille p ra irie everi for wl price neyer value three to ye beeni a set to ont scale awaki searir decor al%~ hie ha of th, socks throu alwa3 She v one 'v going their town frienc able not i didn' Pot owIi shak' vi11ag old 1 and1 linesi meet glad Billy hospi dotai the t af ter wrot agau lime, Cam( of ci A,- moVi hom, garb open the he vt worl that they only dail3 and to fi effor Aip Fi hust a de the wreu Wh( Nexm ther the to him litti or 1 the nev god sup teai owl 1 leil her Yo to for str yoi for mue ,y, irw int 011 st a",
         "omnestead almost up to the limit, the ever increasmng demand for war food- for wheat and beef and bacon-drove the price of these cominodities, to a point neyer before dreamed of. The seling value was multiplied by two, and then by tJiree and the fields gave off a yield that was phenomonal. The three month's war prolonged itseof to years and stili May's soldier saw no0 prospect of seeing home. Through ail the hardsbips of three yea\" of war he had been spared as by a miracle. Witb scarce a set back hie had worked his way, first to one stripe, thon to two and go on up the scale whose price is paid in blood until, awakening fromn a period \"of seething, searing bell *hie found bimself a hero, decorated, and with .one leg alxnost shot away AUtbrougb the years of their separation ho had heard from May with every arrivai Of the mail and always favors, sweaters, sooks, tobacco and candy came filtering through from the wee home ovorseas but always of herself she had been reticent. She was gettmng on fine, she wrote, every- one was kmnd, she just couldn't tbînk of gomng home, for she must stay and ovorsee their farm; part of the time she spent in town and part of the time with a girl friend on the Rîbstone, and, yes, she was able to get returns fromn the homestead, not much of course, but something, and didn't hoe think that was just fine. Poor Billy, sick and suffering drow his own conclusions. A shack, or perhaps a shaky cottage in the littie, dust ravaged village, with flying visits i the wobbly old buckboard between the home shackc and the farm. A life of ennui and lone- liness with petty strivings to make ends meet and always the need of keeping up a glad sweet spirit to hearten hm, lber Biily boy. Lying crîppled there ini hospital hie thought it out in every pitiful detail and bis heart shrnnk within him at the thought of going home to hier a cripple after ail sho had endured. And so hoe wrote te bier as soon as hie was strong again, bitter suffering tbrobbmng in every line, and a month later when hier answer came bis eyes fillcd wtb tears at the tone of cherful courage it conveyed. As soon as hoe was in condition to be moved bie was taken to an old English home away back amid billows of green garbed hilîs wbero wie awaiting the opening of the submarine blocade and the opportunîty for the trip back home, hie was taken mto the bosomn of the old world family and made to feel the welcome that was in their bearts. Binga soldier tbey put bim under discipline at once thc onyrulo of wbicb was that several times Sda ieho ave bis wounded lkg rassaged and exercised and soon hoe was surprised to find that, in response to their continued efforts it was growmng well and strong. Ail this hie kept from May, meanmng his irnproved condition to corne as a surprise. Finally, at a moment's notice hoe was hustled to the coast and given passage on a departing.liner on which lie comrnenced the weary journcy home witb shattered wrecks and parts of mon fr company- Wben lho nrrived among bis onpoplein New Brunswick hoe paused a weck to rest, thon started on the 1ast lap of bis journoy the trip across the continent. He wiroc to May froin Winnipeg and thon gave himiself up to sweet anticipation. Wben hoe aligbted from the train at tbE little, squatty depot on the prairie hf looked in vain for the old-timo buckboard or the thin, pale cheeks of May among the little crowd of loafers on the platforni nover rocognizifglgier in the fair younF goddess wbo swept toward birn unil supplo ai slipped around bis neck and tear wet cheek was pressed against hiý own. Aftor a moment lho beld bier off at arm' leiïgth thst lho might got a good look a bier, and bis frst words were: ulo \"H1eavens, May, bow woll ýyo l You are positively l ' y. The sain to you, and many of theni,'' she lauglic ,,But you should feel iahamed of v'oursel for coîning horne to me looking so big, ai) strong, and(lmanfly in yotir uniforin whe you must bave known thit 1 was bookir forward to coddling you. I \"Well, inithe n:tilOof goodneqss oddi mue then i arn just in shape l'or it,\" and i slipped bis arin'abo)ut lier again, laughini ly, but she drew axvay from lîjixi, lblus] ing and said: \"4Here, cone back to earth. Lot 111 introduce Vou to Kýate,\" and she drew t)i other girl forward. After a momnent of jolly banter the started up the platfortf and at last I- abked: THE WESTERN HOME MONTHLY \"'Wbere in Sam'11111 l that old buck- board, anywayY\" \"That old btickboard bas been ne- painted,\" Ma y replied. \"'I just knew you wouldn't know it. Hore it is,\" and she pulled open the door of a big, low touring car. \"Hors,\" be protested, \"whose car are you stealing? Do you want to get us al arrested?\" \"We won't be arrested,\" May laugbed. \"AVe bave a right to use this car wbenever wo care to,\", and she slipped gracefuily in under the wbeel and stanted. up the engine. The crowd around the depot started to mil around as thougb t bey contemplated a reception or something of that kind, but May eased in the clutcb and the big car nolled out of town along the trail for home. May, nursing the purring engine down the winding prairie trail would answen no questions until they crossed the Ribstone and came in sigbt of home, but such a diffonent borne to the one that Bily remembered. For, perched upon the bll above the creek was a cosy looking bungalow and overtopping it a big ned barn. The feîîced field beside the trail was alive witb their growing berd-big fat borses and, cattle--and wben a moment I~7~1= later they came upon the drove of pige bis bands went up i wonder. As the car stopped at the door he turned to, May and said: \"But what does itail meail, dear, bow bas it cone about?\" \"cWe did it, Billy Boy,\" she laughed, nestling close agamest him, and for the second time within the hour hie arm waa slippod about ber. \"But do you mean to say, dear, that you'vo beon actualy running this farmn siiice I've been away.\" \"Evory hour of the time, Billy Boy,\" she answered. For a moment ho vas sient, gazing around at the wonderful imnprovements and evidenco of tbrif t that was apparent on overy aide-the bouse, the barn, the fields of wavin grain, the bords and . berds of stock-thon he furnbled a moment in the pocket of bis tunic and, turning pinnod upon ber breast the omblom that had well nigh cost bis life. \"'You are more doserving far, than I,\" ho said. \"This is the award of menit.\"' The cheapness of Mother Graves' Worm Exterminator pute it within reach of ali, and it \u0026n be got at any druggîst's. 1h. P undil'. ?ln A very distinguished British man Of science had the foible, Baye Prof. Brander Matthews ini the Century Magazine, of inventing tbuilling epxaodeL1anld pre- tending that they were ofi own ex- perience. On one occasion, after ho had spun a marveIous yarn, with himsefin the conter of the coil, a skeptical friend lookod hm' i the eye, and asked, sternly.' \"Clifford, doyuma to say that this really* oc- c re ovu\"Wbereupon the imaçîna- tivmanofcereplied, with a twfklé. \"ýYes-it juet occurro to mot\" An \"\u0026d\" of unusual interest to ou readers, especially ladies, le found on page47 Mm. Lydia W. Ladd, of Windsor, Ont., offers a, trial of her preparation, B3lush of Roses, which gives an instant and btter effect than any face powder, and removes ail facial blemisiies. Anyone who wishes may obtain f ree advice on any complexion or skin troubles by writing Mrs. Ladd. In Winnipeg, Blush of Roses ie sold by The T. Eaton Co, Ltd., and in Vancouver by The Wood- ward Department Stores, Ltd. Any one of these would malce success certain for the. Gillette, but that this famnous razorcan claim ail tbreeadvantages explains why ten million cf thein bave been sold., The shaving edge is absolutely rigiM and free from vibration-bence the velvet smnoothness cf the Gillette shave. The. thin blade cf flnest steel permits perfect hardening and sharpening-there is no finer cutting edge made. The No Honing-No Strcpping feature is acbieved by simply changing a blade that bas bocome sligtly duiled for a new orne. With a Gilotte. shaving becomes a jcy instead cf a job; a man prof ers to shave every day and h. Iooks the botter for it. Every man profers a gif t that 15 realiy usoful to some prottY but PurPcOes, novolty. Particularly in these days, you should confine yourseii te Useful Gift\u0026 There can b. ne question, thon, that the gift for a man is a Gilietto Safety Razor, if be doesn't already own one, and a Carton of Giflette Blades, if he liasthe raz«r. THE USEFUL GIF Ten milion men have adopted the Gilete'- Safety Rmzr in preference to any other razor ini the world. Men buy the Gillette because they can get a cleaner shave with it, because it gives them a more comfortable shave, and becuseit ensures a quicker shave. Sold b\u003e' jewelera, druggista and hardware dealra§ .vcrywhere, at fine dollars. GiLLETE SAFETY RAZOR CO. 0F CANADA, LUMeD MONTREAL 401",
         "THE WESTERN HOME MONTHiLY *~\u003c«II The Il\u003cID I W~ afirde ns of thevWe st V9 Written for The Western Home Monthly by Robert Wilson (Author of \"Canada's Western Wonderland,\" \"A Northern Paradise,\" etc., etc.) a ---àLiT'TLEtravel,like alittie'aknow- Europe; but, how few even begin to corn- ledge, is a dangerous thing. proeud its truc mcaing, its marvellousr This is the experience-the significance. '[ho Canadian Rockies! 'l'lic . acknowledged expericnec--4\u003eýf phrase in itself is an inspiration, su'- the most travelled traveller gestive as it is of a lanîdo! sulent sentirmelsc the most exploring explorer. The worid engagcdto-.day, as they have lîcen for t: is full of odd surprises; surprises which tens o! Ihousands, :îay be miilions of li 'would stagger the raw hand and flabber- years, in a vigil of strange solitude. 'l'lic li Sgast the untutored. The old and trite everlasting hulis are surcly hiere, as thley t M aymng. 'Foots admire, whien meni of towcr sky-ward for thou.sands o! feet.,il sense approve,\" la especially applicable snow-capped and gorgeons in the ligit (oft when the subjeet of travel is being dis- the suri, sombre and sad ini the shadows cussed. The unintated, the inexperi- of night. Senced in the world's magnificence, tle But, wvhen the Canadian Rockies are mind untutored in the cntrancing art of ightly and even flippantly refcrred to, it ~jtravel is invariably the onie to go iuto shotuld bo reniemnibeied tiat they represent Ilrptures at the first indication of ter- ])ut a smai l)porti\u003ciui o! the l1eritagý1 o! t ii'restrial allurement, the first to cry witli beauty witli wlicli a Trodigal Niftture lis ufreasOfaI)le enthusiasîn and extrava- endowed this iîîagnificent Western WVon- rgance at Naturc's first revelatiîuî. derland. 'Plie fart that so littie reference r Experience teachies, however, anîd it s is made to the glories of fic gigantic, inthe exacting selool of experieice, se nameless lakes witlt wliicli tlîis gorgeons ably and rigorously presided over by this territory isýstuidded, tethemiglîtyfoamîîing hard-headed otd autocrat, that wve tegin rivers, to the infinite and sulent valcys, te to learn a whotc lot of invaluable tessons; the towcrilng trees anîd tricklfing brooks * essons wbîch not only reinove the dangers and te tlle sober shadow-laiid wilîih ever preserit with a \"littie k liiowledge,\" 4~n am~ into a scoiiig oterriity, but whîiehi also onnol)le lis by tiroadeiiing wi he~i rcdderied suit and his golden à , Our outlook, by enlarging Our viewv and by glory fade over the last radinit inounta*l giving us just that insighit ilto a lîost of top), speakis loqueîîtly of the fact tiat tlle iIthings, teaving us ini wonder au([ awo, te Ivast mnajority oif Western travellers have grope our own way int.o fte lalîyriniths anid passed tlrougli thils euielaiiting couintr~ maues of a perpetiially increasing, anid on the hîcateut track of steel, satistied witri eternal land of wonder. the înost casual gîanice at titis land o! The experienced t ravollor; the travelter unsullied deliglît, Conitent, niayhap, to *who, wlîon lie speaks o! whvlat hie lias seen tell thie story Iin the (distant, street-soiled and the landis in whichi lie huas travellcd, City, of a trip l .iroughi Canada's Western ihas rîglît to hbc heard and whîe speakis witli Wonderland, ivien thîey were hint the theauhoit horn anîd hegotten o!- et u mîs onîf-plaee lookers- experience, eschews thîe unhîatamced tan- oui, from the precinets of a ivell-ordered guage of the novitiate. lie approves, dining-car, or, lilke mie or two \"experi- when the inexperieîîcod gocis into raptures enced travehleus,\" eoiled upî iii thie dcptlis ili and loses himself in a frenzy o! extravagant o! a capariotis \"Lower Bertli,\" ivhile 1ý iteration. radiant Nature ivas at lier licst. It is withth unequivocal modesty and \"WVhereoii lhe foot of manuin as neyer reverence o! the man wlio lias travelled in trod,\" \"oui whicli thie cyco!fman lias miauy lands and sailed many meus, that the xîever gazed, are ternis whieh have a ncw ti writer approaehes the iimîîressive and i îeaning and beuar a dilTeremt initerpreta- If fasinating subjeot of Canada's miglty tiom wliei thiis hai s rcacied. As the, l wardens of the West; the invomparable, northtera City or\u003c:ifldmouètmin1 is lcft ini tie the majestic, the inspiring Jlocky Moumii- distance and thie î'lî buti attractive toiva tains. The magnitude o! thiese colossal o! Edson falis lîehiimd, thme w\u003crd-fanied jI warriors o! ages their magnificence, thîir Canadian prairie lammids are :lino\u003cst for- infeetious grandeur and îîeerless beauty, gottemi. We ame ii a new wîirld, xii fan as their glory by day and their mystery hîy environmelt, goes, vet a atid ofht i\u003ereiv- t nghtar hyond flic lîow'er o! pen to able antiqjuity, se far as the evidenceo ~f potay eond t )lf o uman to Coinî- sceence goes. preben % Vho can ever forget lîe relief to thie ThéCandin Rekesixan expressionu oye aid te wlsor deiilmi wl mthle as familiar to the average d eiiizmi o! ti first. umoumtaiiîs boegiu te loinm imto vic%\\? Dominion as the war now i îgung ini'F'lie ioiotony o! the leve1 stretcli o! lun- The entarY o Ill' K'19 od \u003c, \u003c f Blii into B\u003c\u003ci3 gus .\\ii 'clreg ,,, llî, 5lunOt Ný'Tflt wild witte siglit f î\u003c; r loI iTIg rilillIn! r il,. F CoUple are in 1lie immlediate u \"I r ih hrrIrî F I r Pr ndin prarieis completely and irre- ocaly lef t b(difd as thc e odee nd 1uixurioulsly-ec\u003ciippcd Canadiail Northern train approaches the entrantC- rigly b-eauitiful town of Jlasp er, Oei y i anaturai position of mntrîrîsic beauty ai snugly leaning agaitist sucli an array of magnificent, multi-liued nîmountains as rnay be found nowhcerc cisc in the entire world. Pyraniid niountain, a mountaini of strange reflect ions, a revelation ini changing glories of lighit and shade, tl the chillcd waters of the saine mne spar-k-- ing in the sun or scintillating in the fitful ight of the dazzling starshine, calls forth the unstinted admiration of the toast- impressionable travcller. Goat Mountain to the west and,1 stili further west the .caning form of Mount Cavell and the glacier-torn and lacerated form of Mount H-ardisty 'may be clearly disccrncd. lit betwven, in a vallcy-lanf !iiiparatllel(l beatity, wlierein the lishing and spray- tossc\u003c1 waters of the rnighty Athabasca add a vigor and a cbarii, lies the town of Jasper , the starting-pxuint foi. manly a trip from i whieh t ravellers returfl imipressO(l %with earth's beauty as thev neyer wvere inîpressed l\u003eefore, and endowed witlh an experience thitt w 0111(1jtstify theni iii ajiplaud\u003cing, iîîstead of îîîerely approvilig. \"I\u003c\u003eols applaud, where nien of seitse aplirove,' umni le trime of oflwvr hallowvdî terrestrial saietuaries, but hiere, ail express admniratioui at first,, but as the encbant- Plent o! tis paradise gr-ows on mieC, andi reality assumes the p)lace of plmautasY, reverenre and deliglit folloçv iii the iatuiitl order of things. At the present time there is lirnited accommodation at Jasper for tourists anici (Atlers wlîo having hieard the call of thle alluriiîg W\\est, hatve comte hiere to revel ini the delights of Nature unadorned anîd at lier veryIîest. liut, the faine of tiîis iii- comparable lanîd is spreading every day andi witli every stinirier coifl visutors fronî the reinot.est corners oif the earth, ail (of wlîoin tettirii iunjresse(i with the heritage wilihis tflc rightftil possession of every Cantadiati. So rapidly are tiiese visitors increasiuig timat the C.N.R. hiave \u003cletermiinied tuponi an cml \u003corate and mmott desirahie muet lîîd of cateriuîg tii the re- \u003cuirenent s of stieli. Chlets of thlie mosi the (iluiforts \u003cf the iiiist moditern and mî -t\u003c- la tel, w iii h e vevt ed il ceirtainm judicnilisly-selevt('i p ami s of t1iis Western WVoudclaîîd. (me of tIiesýe viIli e estab- lishidil, ttue towii of JaLsper, and allic co\"im,ýlenhces Nviiibe at. bauld lP',thiclt toimrists as well as t1lie xisitiirs mIlio love t i lîke il ea s \\.\"ai i b ulige the days ill nirim a:minelled bliss, mnay have thie vciy I \u003c- est t1bat îuî omiaîd oxperience can SProvide. 0,u C, !rrn I r foui ru ý, r, 1 I ' Buy Your Gr afonola 0nd Records on the Easy P aymeflt Plan Gxrgfonola-StYle X $120-75 $12 Cash, $10 Montlily We have the best Selection of Phonographs and the Largest Stock of Records in Western Canada Wite for further particulais and illstrtedcatalogue \u003c.7 'mi g fui K :~ i \"\u003cr pi 'i t i",
         "THE WESTERN HOME MONTHLY Grafonola",
         "THE WESTERN HOME MONTHLY I ~ - - - r 'portant Prbo m11tm Bm trialaipmn-i mareuiY4OYB' hbeepyuFt IîP t mre ma ~ \"ii SubmtGnmmo ,mtm ou am outmU. y cho er 'S M OUpi.a eompnlets Far Market Reorat I~~~~e erm iil.Ia vry chane lu the.Ferutaha. wu FM-Wdafer Ii-NOW. SHSp VOUR PURS DIRECT 7o .A.LSU-BERTic The jarrts B ougsehI theWorld 1~1 .UfWust v.Et3OCP But, beautiful sud gorgeoUs as the mu little town of Jaqpe may bey aud delifu un it la ta the eye of the most \u003cial, it is but te gttway toanauilimitable para- dise. ILkes, brooks sud rivers are mi abuudsuoe, all teemlng with fiali, sud the anglar whoio lafamilla with the delights inseperable from \"casting the fly,\" wlil fiud here sport such as lie neyer dreame of. The humter wiil also fiud a surfeit of pme, for it muet be remembered tbat this à a new land, sud pooibly the last new land the world will ever disgorge- But wbat of the ordlnary visitar; the visitar who cornes out of the merest curioeity sud witli a desire ta associate with the beauties of Nature sud revel lu the solitudes of this amazmg territory? What la there ta luduce such ta travel liere; what la there that will divert the mind from the cauntiess problems of the big city, the cares sud suxieties of a businesa-life overflowing with aniety sud warry? The answer la simple as well as convmncgConcealed. witbln this won- derland are the very antidotes and cures for ail the mental and many of the physical. ailments wbich afIlict maukind. Notbmng is mare calculated ta restare the jaded and enfeebled huuman system thail the health- giving air fresh from, the remote, snow- eapped sentinels. These aid warriors of a million years have unlimited stores Of Nature's health-givmng elixir on baud, sud thev neyer fail ta distribute the same with a lavish band. The tail-worn wreck from afar, speedily assumes a new lease of - lfe, sud just as speedily forgets ail about the tarpor which traveiled here with hlm. From the very first, a keenness of eye sud a sharpness of appetite tell tiieir own tale, sud Lefore many days are over, the com- plaints of physical debility and mental deficiency are conspicuailsly absent. The reason for this la seif-evident ta the thinking man. Nature cures ber own cblidren of their childiali complaints. She takes them b y the hand sud leads tliem inta paths wherern are tabe found inspiration after inspiration; she shows tliem the unsullied sud entrancing de- lights wbich she bas painted with a gen- erous hand. Over that vast valley-land she points ta a hoary-headed giant bathed lu the magnificence of the western sun, sud beyond that an mnflnity of nameless mountaiu-taps which guard, like leviathan gentinels, the passes, valcys and gorges of this incomparable land. Entrancec with the beauties, snd amazed; at it8 ertent, the sh=peied denizen of the tbrobbing citY orgeta his own troubles and aliments, sud, iu that period of for- getfuluess, Nature effects her moat effec- tive, lier most marveilous aud most permanent cures. The question the writer asked himself as he first gazed on tbis wonderful countrY was, \"why la it that sa few Canadlans trouble ta stop off aud revel lu the glories wbich are so unstintedliY Placd at their disposai, instead of passing.through an their .way ta, some other territOrY far less worthy, far less beautiful, far more sullied sud far more distaut. It is the aid cry: \"Distance lends en- cbantment.\" Lands and reorts which are crowded ta suffocation with a con- glomerated mass of seetblng sud bur- dened humnanity are the havens ta which tens of thousands travel, under a vague imapression that, because others g o, they should be there. In other words, they prefer ta let others do their thinklng for them; they prefer ta, travel with the crowd. It is all a mighty mistake sud they learn this whenAi laf re uently toa late. They select same crwedo \"y«resort\"; for their vacation, and luvariably spend su unscionable amount of money and time in getting there, only ta find that they have been but adding further proof ta the wel-warn aphorismrearding the substance and the shadow.r ey returu ta, the city little the better for the change, sud frequenty a whole lot the worse. This goes on unceasingly, year mn, year out, until one almost despairs of per- suadin the Canadian peoples ta take Natures medicmne as dispensed at their own doar lu quantities out of ail propor- tion ta the available number of patients. iFortunately, by a system of wise legisla- Stion, vast areas of this Western Wonder- 3laud are preserved in perpetuity for the peolesothat vast play-grounds will 1 lways be at the disposal'of the people. - But the writer urges, and takes ail the - responsibility for so dolug, that the 1 monotany of the prairies sud of Eastern 1Canada la reieved and remnoved by a brief stay luoeorohr lfte delig~ s terrestrisi havens of ref uge snugl en i sconced in this Western .Wo-nder-land, around which the silent sentinels of ages 1 past stand in eternal vigil. The Scot asa Pioneer in Eastern Canada Written for The W estern Home Monthlv by Prof. Norman Macdonald, University of M,\\anitoba, Winnipeg FURS, HIDES,WOOL and SENECA ROOT wated immedistolY in large or amn3quantities. V.ry hieheuit ice Pal\u0026. UhIP vitoU dla t:- R. S. ROBINSON la1 IUPEET AVENUE and 1502 PÂCIFIC àVENUE E., WINNIPEG, MAN- 1Ulan ieitfn adr ,tics Sc mention ThecIlestern lI', mc iJot/. mng consequences ta Canada1 was the immigration of so many Scotsmen during the lastà quarter of the eighteenth sudi the first quarter of the nineteenth century,g the cumulative effects of which are stilh leavening every phase of our nationali activity. The foundations of Canadiani institutions were laid in the humble homes of those hardy pioncera in thei backwoods of eastern Canada; and under social and economic conditions as dif- ferent froro ours as theirs were from the life they left behind them in Scotland. This article, hy the very limitations of editorial space, merely glances, lu a general way, at some of the causes and consequence s of that immigration. Lt is interesting to trace the origin of that stream of immigration that saved Canada for Britalu. t arose lu the Highlands of Scotland in 173,gammig volume as t he pioncera- were later joined bv their friends, trtil finally that tiny rivulet becamne'a mighty 'river, thi4t deepce and widened with time, over- flo igis hanks ta the prairies and the Pacifie. From every strath and moor and island fastness lu the Highlands men flocked bv the thousands to the new world to wvrest a living from its umtamed forests or die of fever lu its swamps; from Low- land glens and cities, from village and farin and everv known trade emigrants swarmed to thie wilderness of towering pines. They severed the sacred ties of home and kindred. Nrtived the horrora of a sea voyage under iinsatnitary conditions ilhat were indescriliably loathsoini. into a land wvhere the foolish and foui le soon perished. anid onfly iho stronc and the industriolis survived. The sory of the .trîîagles of ho-e brav. farlss pioneers. xwhelever written. il forn a gloriou, epir in the annals of Canada, ln that forlorn hope, in which ta the total ignor- ance af local conditions, it must be re- membered that the first settiers had ta do evéirything for themselves. They did not inherit a civilisation, or the improve- ments of centuries, they had to create them. LI the New World they bad te adapt themselves to new and strange conditions. The utter lack of transportation faciities compelled the pioneers ta locate along the bays and rivera. This was particularly true of conditions lu Cape Breton, Nova Scotia, Prince Edward Island and Quebec and even of Upper Canada until the land companies, or prîvate mndividuals, such as Talbot, Selkirk sud Dickson, began operations on a large scale. The rivera, lochs and bays not only made com- munication possible in an isolation hard ta endure, they also provided food for the hungry. Only gradually, as unprove- ments were made, or other factors entered, could the immigrant be persuaded ta locate away from the water. front. A few instances are on record where surveyors stumblcd across settled and cultivated tracts of land, in what was a terra incognita ta civil authorities, and wondered \"who iînduced aIl these men and women ta leave .reniote glens of Scotland and settle inthese remote cornera of Canada.\" In tinie, the home goverrument considered emigration :as a relief to domestic grievances, of a social and economic character. Ships were placed at the disposa1 of intending enigrants, virgin forest cleared, log- bouses built. tools supplîed, seed-corn and iprovisions providect for one yecar. Ln 1other cases. the governrment formed definite settlomients of Scotsrn, on a .lhuge scale. as in Lanark, 'Ramsay', Perth, ;Dalhousie, N. Sherbrooke, etc ., wbere ttools. rations and a specific sumn of money Md., a~ Bm âe",
         "THE WESTERN HOME MONTHLV la Ten Days Cof Unail New York. pice Upavcous Emar for esO and after 10 day-obadliig by mY method old ber for 175S.-Arrat bought a -mean one\" for $365 and after a few houri' traning iatoe r S\u0026em berl nrb iou uit. . uiew L Wretli0t Dok FRE mk.atir.Lu iA. ro B . re funnished te each famil\u003e'. Glen- Ian arry, Bay' cf Qu~inte1 Lac St. Francais sca id tho ý districts were settled Me ,y Highlanders, whe first located in the an Eoba-,kL Valley', N.Y. in 1773, and their for iends who joined thoin hetween 1786 en( id 1803. For docades the language, cas ibits, eustoms, music and sports cf the lac lighlands werc maLintaincd in their native ha% irit\u003e' ini tlose settioments; iL was aiseof intcd that thora was a strain of Rob Roy' mn aman\u003e' cf thein, aswhen,i1838, en( othorno sent the Glengarrylans te tro ýuebec te queil local disturbances, they tiil ont away infantry and returned cavalr\u003e'; rol uey wcre nearly ail Maedonalds. 1 tht The St. Lawrence, during the rush of wa immigration presented an animated Pi( pectacle. Rer scenie grandeur the mar- mu rellous beaut\u003e' cf ber inland akes, the oti )anoramie eplendor cf ber mountains, the wi fild gogensd waterfalls of hier rivers en Lpp elte the Highlander. Ail traffi~c ou ras at first on ber waters. As the ice eared eut, waiting rafts were fioated; eni suces crossing and re-crossing with ashes Pi' ir produoe; batteaux and Durhanm bouts, 80 âden witb settiers and their effects, pro- hil Deeded in an endless procession towards pe Upper Canada. On the shore, in man\u003e' Pr places, teams bus\u003e' pulling legs te the th mfts, or the smoke cf the ptash fires ce nurling cloudwards. One cf tho most F Bxcitmng operations was the noise made b\u003e' ci Lenty herses pulling a must, eighty four th tet long, down te the water's edge. The th ring cf the axe and the crash cf falling In Linhers contributed te the excitiug ex- ai periences cf pioneer days. le' One canuot do justice te this subjeet sc witbout a glance at some cf the causes at wbicb mnduced these immigrants te beave BE heir homes for uuknown lands te endure cK ho privations cf the pioneor. Thore w wrm many reasons which made emigration hb lesirable. I the Highlands after 1745, Pi ho breakdcwn cf the hereditar\u003e' Juris- tu diction cf the chief, and the dissolution c1 of tho mutual obligations that bound C enant and laudiord intensified an im- C possible agrarian situation. The new fi political conditions teck the romance sud c( chivalry' eut of the 111e cf the HRighlanders. le This leaven, which worked frein 1745 tiil al 1770 resulted in now agrarian regulations, ai irbicli changed even the face cf the v cuntry. New ideas i agriculture, whichI demanded large tracts cf land for thoîr e: sîcess, were introducod after the Sevon a Ycars' War. Engressing of farnis ho- si came common. Land, long ini cuit iva- a tion, lapsed intc a staite cf nature; evictions coîîverted whole districts into scenos cfs desolatien. The Highlander became a d stranger i the land cf bis fathers. Some Pz settled on a few acres along the sea shore. f Many crewded into the manufacturing 13 centres, complicatig existing econonic 1 conditions, and thcusands sought refuge 1 in distant Canada, hating a system that exilcd thein. During the French Revo-i Itîtien, social and economie conditions were consitlorabl\u003e' relievcd, but afterI ponce, vast numbers cf dishanded soldiers ansd tutilors flooded t ho country, resulting in a disorganized agrarian and undustria systean. To intensif\u003e' the evils, we find ai general low level cf trade and commercial whieh seriousi\u003e' afTccted t ho manufactur- ing centres, accompanicd b\u003e' a fallit h prie cf cattle, gencral tbroughout Scot- land, witlî the result, that, farmers, unablo te pay their reîts, were evicted. The Highlands suffered, particularly i the ruin of lime Kelp industr\u003e', which rendered fift\u003e thousand destitute, Another cause, eqûnil\u003e' effective ini ecmcuraging emigration, may ho traced to the stream cof pamphlets that depictcd in gl uiwing colors, the wonderfui cs- bSililities of Canada. It was said t land of 1beautiful cîmmate, whcre fertile acres were given away or se cbeap that even the 1poorest could afford te bu\u003e'. A land of1 akes, rivers and hays abounding ini fishi; a land cf liberty, without taxes, ,there none need remain a servant except Ihv choice and poverty was unkmowm. 'flic writers contrasted the comparative poverty and politicuil servitude in iScotland with the affluence and thc ieidcpendencè of the Canadiani, after a few ycars on the lan. Sallwonder that Scotsmen flccked r tend suchan \"El Dorade,\" but as one ,riter put it, \"all the truth that had heen Written respectiflg Canada, rould Dot cover hall the lie.; that had been telS1.\" rh'[ey advertised aIl the gced to ho derived from emigratichi to the harkwoods, and carefiilly concýealed the toil and miiser\u003e' en route to indiepcrldefee. The privations of the pionfeQfl were severe te.. a degrce to whiclî thosec wlu' ded between 1820 and 1840 had rcely any conception. It cailed for re than ordîary res.I.Utian, courage Id fortitude te hew a home out of the et alone without any comferts, Often during the misories of hunger-iîn some sog existing on peas and shelfish- cking every cenvenicnce te which theY Id been accustomed and totally ignorant the werk to be donc. The future ho any privations, which demanded 6il their krgy te evercome; year by year tbreugh 1 opic heat and arctic cold they strugged, Ufinally the dark curtains of the forest led aside, and lifo and activity breke tsilence and stagnation of ages. It ~ as a continuous figbt with Nature. The j mneer got lest in the surrounding Ir izes, some were killod b\u003e' failing trees , ffers suffering tortures freontfoyers, thout medical attendance. Almost the tu tire settiement of Baldoon was wiped ut shortly after location. Man\u003e' are the accounts of the miseries 0 dured during the fir-st, fcw ycars of Ci ineering. Se poorl\u003e' providcd wcro )me settîcinents that the\u003e' lîvcd as oe ig famil\u003e': a community cf sutTerim ersevering ini fortitude tilI the harvest ef rosperity\u003e. It was a common thing fer eo settlers in Pictou te walk across the ountry through the woods te, the Bay' of ýmd\u003e', fort\u003e' te fit\u003e miles away and arry back a bushel cf potatoos te keep .eir families frein starvation. Many loft eo settlement during tho first year; ene an remained tilt tho mosquites came, ,d, thinkmng it was a judgment, ho \"ls ft. These experiences wore far frein olitary. Instances of equal sufferimg ,tended the first settiors in ail the :ttlements. In somte instances they ould scarcel\u003e' have that relief frein teil, hich sleep affords, frein the dread cf )emg burned alive b\u003e' the Indians. The ioneers cf Glengarry had sevore priva- ens te, overcomo. The saie was true éail the pioncer settlements ii uppe r anada. Ini Prince Edward Island and- ,ape Breton, the pieneers, during tbe irst two years were subject te famine Dnditions. They used te, divide inte ots the very shores where .hellf\" Lbounded and were it net for the abund- ice cff Hh adgie, teir cniin would have b.e\" indee itiable. In Lanark the pieneers wero fer eîghf weeks ,psdte i sorts cf weatber, without ny shelter exoept what a few blankets 3pread ver the branches of trees could iford. In 'im the governinent qrected barracks wher the settier obt*tined helter tilt his log houso was ready. Thut, renched with rain, sleepig on the ground,' wading streains, fightiug the forcet, isolated firo ei brs in hungor and poverty these brave moen toiled; without roads or griat milse or any cf the ameliorative agoncies that male life endurable. Tine and perseverance and .înceasing teil hrought their own rewards. The privations cf pioneerdàkm gave place to comparative coniforta; romda peritted the settler te emergo, i4ber than mn winter, from hiei enforced isolation; villages wore formod,' milse erected, mi\"Cd oend schoolSs ad churches biltidthinuorY of the Ican years were forgotten in the prospects cf sassured succeus: the band- maid te, fortitudo and tlirifty habits. It was aaid that Canada te tthe Irianan meant'license te do as ho pleaaed; to the Englishman it was a land of crue manners and vulgar republicanisin; te the Scotaman an opportunity. Nô race was botter equippod for encountoring the initial difficulties cf the pioneer, none more adaptable, or could endure hardshipit more philosopbically than tho Scotanian. lis succes 1 explasned as the outeome of hardships and conflict, toil and suffering cf man\u003e centurios. Toil lias heen in ScOtland the inexorable condition cf existence. The direct result bas been the developseent cf laborious habits, whieh with the national perseverance converted the primeval forcists of Canada into fruitful fields. Many'ar t ho references ii the Dominion Archives te the peeuliarly, r;,eh and abundant, harvest, which the enduirance, the industry and the courage cf the Scot produced. Tiieme fhîmîle ,pioncers peiisessed the encrgy whielî over- Calie ail dificulties; the frugalit\u003e' whirh spared and aceumulated; the rugged earnest ness and unswcrv'ung integrit y, togethler with 1tlho t houglît fuil and1educated intelligence t bat siipplitel ILvigoolis alld mterIing cleinent te thce populationi. of the two, the ùî)wlander carne first ini ima lrSandl ciifirt . The llighl:tiîlîr s ielilmîn sIaowvî.\u003cthe acinie urderi\u003e' arrange- 111 iitiiis k w îrk Ili fart ili :ali excitsz.- Lhey late. ort\"r ?end and that )rof ;the turu year per- take their )Por- ente. ýisla- rider- the will ople. the the strn b\u003e' a htful ages da ity cf I a, g t ___-1 1~ - t t ts~ i ship ail youru to U\u0026. You Can dqped on honest grading, top pricesýand prompt payment., WRtITE FoR PRISE unT 8, LEVINSON A OROS Peace Hath Her Victories uni ueponublte.The. duty of .v.ry gnan now is te provide a living Wo hinutlf and his famity. end hlp ti the recci- etrucionfi f i.world. lii. gt oaiâl atili for food. Other Industries may ool- laine. but agriculture nmu 0goMn C.P.'R. FARMS xl YEARSTO PAY open the. way te prouperlty Md k'4s pendience. Prairie Land S$i \u0026te $loaWwijs irrigated land up to $10- Cet startd. Land la being rapidly takcn UP. %ft for frea boolica and full lnfoamatl\"m bit lot ST. SAIT. SAVE S ll9Wet direouct. vTorot aduig Led a gor- re- q te y did rev- ,reate adapt itions. ,iities g the ularly Nova aebec l and such began river, con- ard or the prove- tered, ed t A few veors ivated ognita 4who ave ithms le, the rratiofl o f a Ships endg 1lg- orned on a Perth, wbere moiiOY RAW FUR H IDES, WOOL SENECA ROOT m âe",
         "TH4E WESTERN HOME NMoNTHLUY ively HTighland cornmunity, the rate of development was-slow than ina lowland - settlement. But, mix them, 'and no one showed more adaptability*inifacng and overcoming new conditions and rdmP than the Hi der. On the other band, travellers tfarough Canada strongly ad- vised people ai the saine habite, eutamso, a a language and locality to club together, as it engendered greater pesos and content- ment than is mixed society. The advice was, \"Go not to Glengarry, if thou be not a Highland man.\"y o m igai n During the early days fimgain the Scots epread over so wide an aresas to UIDDe N(35exercise profound influence ithe national development. From these Scottish pion- ýdefeic ,-,wôleome eers bave ung men of commanding influence anai character. Ini the recorde coflomical dessert- evente of Canadian hietory, the Scot, and ,fect economy foods. eepeeiaily the Highlander, bas played a iined by combin- leading role in every walk of \u0026anadian by 111e and thaught, sitogether dispropor- fiavors - and Gold tionate to their number. What is equally trii g i h influence Canada exercised u n li hracter. _The Highlander MORE PUDDING was nofnarl ree in Scotland; hie was -- -9 - M ua:.. dominated by a landiord with the power ai eviction i his bande. In the wilde of Canada, hie became a fres iman, a member of a democratie' co Munity, exercising the regts of citizenehip in a system of reeponsible government. Fromn bondage ta conditions hie could not influence to the freedoin oi the new life, aroused latent pwers which made the humble croiters of Hibad solitudes men of action, of enterprise and vision. The basie of the present Canadian development may, be traced, at leaet in part, to these latent Highland qualities, that responded and unfolded so rapidly ini the warm breezes of Canadian libertyand aseured prospenity. Their defecte were those of their qualities and the results of local con- ditions. Lumber camps, and the utter lack of social amenities, meseparable froin bush 11e, do not encourage refinemente in morale or habits. The years brought their transformations; the expedients and crudities of the infancy of thinge were reduced to a systein; prosperity gave time for mental and spiritual development, and the humble settlers of pioneering days became in time, the leaders and legisiators of Canada. scmimChristmasENW By Irving Alen Lad-les L Botter Than Powder Cosa les\u0026 than onc cent a day for a beautiful complexion. The most perfect face preparation and skme beautifier. Whitens the face soon as applied, stili its une cannot be detected. Blush of Roses is as clear as water; no sediment to clog the pores; it takes the shine f rominMe face. removes ail impurities of the skin and leaves no sign like powder or paint. The only clear, pure, harmlesu face preparation miade. Blush of Roses will positively remnove tan, freckles, pîmples, blaclcheads, liverspots, moth.patches, erysipelas and salt-rheum. Cures eczema and ail skin diseases. Remember this. no matter how dark, rough or aallow your complexion may be yon will sec it improving day by day until a clear. smooth complexion is obtained. Gentlemen who admire a lady's fine clear complexion are nlot adverse to having the sane tbermselves. It is fine to use after shaving When used in place of powder a boutle lasta six monthe. Interesting cîrcufar free. 701 TRI\"L a fufl-slsed $1.00 bottie sent for 75e. Makes afine Christmnas gift. Address-LYDIA W. LADD, WINDSOR, ONT. Also for sale by ,eT. EAT 0N CI-MITED TORONTO and WINNIPEG haeahdthe sesnayear wben, with a littleb variation as ta, the precise ] day, growing out of the i differences between the oId and new style, Christians.of almost everym name commemarate the birtbday ai theird common Master.a \"On Christknas Day, bcginning ata Jerusalem, in the Church ai the Sepulobres of aur Lord the Christmnas Anthem hasa travelied with the star that staod above1 His cradie, from region ta region, froms communion ta communion, and from tangue ta tangue, till it bas compassed the1 land and the ses, and returned ta meit awây upon the sides ai Mâunt Zion.\" In these eloquent words the Christmas- tide af 1860-f ifty nine years ago-wasç welcomed by Edward Everett, mostr marvelous orator ai bis land and time. E Sa recently as ffty years ago, almost thea sole exception ta that general observanceà ai Christmas ai whicb Mr. Everett wrote,f was found in hie own New England, ai remnant ai the aid Puritan préjudice( wbich still bung dandly over thr, land afi Winthrop, John Endicott and the Math-1 ers-ýthe witcb and pope-hating Cottoni and Increase. Able writers maintain that1 the abhorrence ai the festivals ai Christ-1 mias and Easter was but the natural reenît ai certain tendencies in the English Cburcb i the days ai the Purltans ta honor withi undue and unscriptural observance the( weil-nigh innumerable saints' days in thee Cburcb's calendar. There wvas little enaugh in the poetic hopes and memoriesi that cluster around these sacred semsonsi that appcaled ta the iron and granite ai the Puitan character. A notcworthy% exception ta the mIle appears in the im-i mortal author ai the grand \"Hymn oni the Nativity\"-the Puritan poet, Johnj Milton. It is only within very recent1 years that the anniversary ai the Saviour's1 irth has attained ta anytbing approaching1 géneral réverence and honor in the1 ancient home ai the founders ai New England. Within my own memory the day was scarcely regarded in the Newv England capital as worthy ai especial notice. The Roman Catholie and Episcopal Churches were, ai course, open for the celebration ai the appomnted services for the day, and here and there some devout Catholic or churchman closed his office or place ai business, but it wvas by no means then, as nowv, a legal a4 géneral holiday; nom wvas it even, as a rule, the happy occasion for the interchange ai tokens af love and friendship, the season for that in my youthful days being the first ai January-Nen- Year's. In the neighbar- hood ai Boston then the public sehools werc losed on the latter holiday and on thé now obsolete festival, 1May Day, but neyer on Christanas, unless the day happened ta fall on Sunday or within the period of a seini-annual or quarterly vacation. Significant and happ,. indeed i, the change! Not that it is ai ail the case that thé New England of our fathers is in process ai canverson-or, as thev %No1d( have called it, perversion-to the doctrines or practices ai itualistir communion tit is rather the natural and wbolesome re- bound from hereditary and cultivated prejudice into s regian of hesithier and more tolerant tbougbt and action. One of the most singular among the numerous puritanio antipatbies-happily dissipated long before aur day-was always an especial marvel ta me-vs., the abhorrence of our saintly forbears for the succulent, though indigestible mince pie and the now obsolete English dainty known as plum porridge. The Puritans, says Hudibras: \"Quarrel with mince pie and disparge Their best and dearest friend, plum porridge.\" Referring to this couplet, Dr. Johnson -a sincere liater of puritanism and ail its works and ways-remarks: \"We have neyer been witness of the animosities excited by their use, nor seen with what abborrence those who could eat tbem. at ail other times of the year would shrink fromn thein in December. An old Puritan who was alive in my cbildhood, being at one of the feaste ai the Church invited by a neigbbor ta, partake of bis cheer, told him that if hie would treat him at an aie-bouse with beer brewed for all times and semsons hie would accept his kindness, but would have none of his superstitions meats and drinks.\"1 In a number of The World-an ancient and once popular English periodical- occurs this reference ta the same vencrable and pions prejudice: \"How greatly ought we ta regret the negleet of mince-pies, which, besides the ideas of merry-making inseparable from them, were alinost considered as the text of schismaties! How zealously ivere they swallowed by the orthodox to the utter confusion of ail fanatical recusants! If any country gentleman should be 50 un- fortunate in this age (1755) as ta lie under the suspicion of heresy, where wi lihe flnd so easy a method af acquitting himself as by the ordeal ai plum-porridge?\" Among the few Christmas viands of \"Merry England,\" which seem neyer ta have failen under the special ban of puritanic proscription, were the \"baron of beef,\" consisting of twa sirloins (a baron bemng, as an old m-ritcr tells ns, \"twice the dignity of a knight\"), and that lordly disb, preciaus in the eyes and fragrant mn the nostrils of aur fathers-the baar's head. That worthy aid chronicler, Dugdale, describing ancient Christmnas customs, says: \"Service in the church endcd, the gentlemen presently repair inta the hall ta breakfast with brawn, mustard and Malin- sey. At dinner, at the flrst course,. s served a fair and large boar's head upon a silver platter, with minstrelsy.\" A later writer tells us that \"Among the eairliest books published ini England was P col- lection of carols prepared ta be sn as an, accompaniment to the grand entree of the boar's head.\" It. is «i anelancholy truth that, in parting with ancient superstitions, we'have also last niuch that vas beautiful and poetic. It was assuredlv a superstition-albeit there wvas in it a quaint element af paetry-- that ascribed a sentiment of reverence ta the verv cattle at Christinastide. Even '28 1 t hii Un] rea near t the be of De on Ch asuMM outeoO that i style c6ntUÙ the eév Bra ities,\"j living. near. me th àstrial [ ve r$ oren( expreï Chriel Th( in cl Chrisi la.nd. Wash Most more \"IBra( the ce in a and Chris thue'1 stitiol the f oeleb] we 1 Cray vor. green toe. seaeo old. \"T are r hous( doorE food tbroi want M glory paetic diviio mas, auth i . Di cont dg] N Ai T Rob men was bis swe( ber 'nos and reac Chr",
         "THE WESTERN HOME MONTHLY la Of aber snig n of dae the ent rs of of the ~be Mtnt, and feles Irty. their con- tter from ta n ùght and were tine and day\u003c1 ators The Poetry Of Christina Much of the traditional delight and glory of the Christmas tume is due Wo the poets of our \"Old Home\" and to the divine singera of our own land. \"Christ- mas,\" a poemn by George Wither, tbe author of the still familiar limes: \"Shall I wasting in despair Die because a woman's fair?\" contains this favorite stanza: \"'Then wherefore in these merry days Should we, I pray, be duller? No, let us sing some roundelays To make our mirth the fuller. And, while we thus inspired sing, Let ail the street with echoes ring, Woods and hilas and everything Bear witness we are merry.\" The date of Wither's poem hi 1640. Robert Ilerrick-of blessed and jovial, memomy, and who wrote somewhat later- was a charming and melodious lyrist, and bis sprightly verse still keeps its ancient sweetness. Wbat 1û;er doca not remem- ber with gratitude and apprecîstion the jolly poet-priest for bis ever fresh and Inost lhuman ditties anent the deligbts and pangs of the tender passion? Ail our readers are famiiar with Hemrick's jingling Christmas verse of which this hs a stanza: \"«Corne bring with a nose, My merry, merry boys, The Christmas log to the frmg While my good damne, she Bids ye al ho free And drink Wo your hearts' desiring-\" No reference Wo the poetry of the Facrcd season would be comnplete without a word concerning the Christmnas carols. Within the last thitY Years Our own country, as well as England, bas witnessed a revivai of interest in the old custom of carol singing at Easter and Christmas. Who does not recail that homely favorite of ancient times, begnning thus: \"IGod rest you, merry gentlemen, Let nothing you dismay, For Jesus Christ in Bethlehemn Was born upon this day.\" Dickens in the immortali Carol\" puts this old rhvme into the mouth of Scroogc's unlucky caller on Christmnas Eve, who, the reader' will reniember, had a narrow escape from the mahogany ruler ini the hands of the irate old miser. It is stili sug in England by choruses of men and bYs on their annulal rounds in the evening and far into the night before the great holiday. There is not much holiday poetry ini the writings of Wordsworth, but a poem of bis entitled \"Pictures of Christmnas Eve\" la so beautiful that I cannot refrain from quoting a few stansas. It is au1ciresed to bis brother,' Dr. Wohbdworth,- later an emmnent Enghsh bisop: \"The minstrels played their Christma turnes To-night beneath my cottage eaves; While siitten by a lofty moon, Th' encircling laurels, thièk witb leaves, Cave backa rch and dazf nsheen Thatovespradhei naunugreen. \"Ami who but Iisteed tili wa ui Respect to every mnmate's chde; The g eting 'gi i the marne .i Infhoercof househoki naine, Duly Do ne w.lusty Cal ,\"d'Mherry Chistflia' wiEhed t a? \"'How touching when at midnight .weep Snow, muffled winds, and al is dark, To hear and sink again to.leeP! Save Sugar! Don't use Sugar where Corn Syrup wAi serve your purpose as wefl or better. T~ ships that carry sugar are needed for - soldiers and their suipplies. Crown Branid and Lily White Corn Syrup are delicious, wholesome and economical alternatives: for sugar ini pies, puddings and preserves; as a sweet sauce and on cereals.1 Use CIIOWN BNRAND CORN SYRUP The most mutritiotIs part of the corn converted intoit l \u003cae m\"U syrup forai, with the added laver of a littho cane ayrup. Co\"? LILY WHITE SYRUP ~ft'~LIiP For use where thie Food Board Bulietin Cai for Coin Synap (White) iwD iicious for table use and cooking. near the begimmng of the present centuryq the belief was prevalent in certain sections1 of Devonshire -that at precisely midnighti on Christmas Eve, the oxen i their staUls1 summed the attitude of -devotion; a drol outcome of this tradition was the beief1 that since the adoption of the modern style of ' reckoning, the devout animais conitinuedto prostrate themselves only on the eve of Old Christmas Day! Brand the author of \"Popular Antiqu- ities,\" tel l us that \"an honest countrynian living on the edge of St. Stephen's, down near Launceaton, i Cornwall, informed me that he once, with some others, made àtrial of the truth of thia. Once watching seve . ai oxen in their stails at twelve o'dock at night, they observed the oldet ozen only falU upon their knees, and, as he expessdit, make a cniiel moan like Christian creatures.\" The writings of Sir Walter Scott abound in charming descriptions of old-time Christmas keeping in England and Scot- land. The honored friend of Scott- Wah ýn Irving-is one of the otdelightful of Cbristmas writers. In ail our literature there is scarcely a more thoroughly enjoyable book than \"Braoebridge Hall.\" Edward Everett- the common friend of Scott and Irvig- in a paper wherein he refers at length, and with exceeding interest, to the Christmas sketches of those great authors, thus writes: \"'Although the ancient super- stitions connected with Christmas, and the fantastia revels with which it was celebrated, are now almost forgotten, it la gtol observed ithe Old Country, and as we learn from Scott and G3eoffrey Crayon, with no little cordiality and fer- vor. The church is decorated with ever- greens, and the hall adorned with mistle- toc. it is a holiday for the cbildren and a seasn of good-fellowsbip for young and old. \"The scattered members of the family are reassembled; the desoendafits of the bouse ar gathered with patriarchal hospitality under the roof of its bead, and whie ge nial festivity prevails. within doors bountiful supplies of clothing and food are sent to thbe neighboring poor. Ma this 'ballowed and gra- cious tiine' di-ffuse its innocent cheer tbrough every family circle, and scatter its bounty largely axnong the cbildren of wsnt.\"y e,aMIànI, irARCH . L-- le MONTREAL Pick out one eft te gloloul. nd!iant. Gonkir emsn et la wMo 14-kI. aold. ad gel st On, a .daSu' fr.tuai.Wér Ik 10 the aithie opera--On the treet-40 Worfk- everywhv or fatflSdaimthondeode whutbmt FOU W\" ta bar ora. COL B atfmumao by~ ~~c Il adac -lyn aidef limimdS oe tige*Ohmthon thàk of aM in i$mmdad-*BNd st bktoiOiBt. YudnpV iathe bOtrial. U YoudeoldeO= t. PthoroohtatOmhoelutm S- mb boc u Ou dlanoCulE s ineumli. uiiB o m Ik a \u003c10 \u003eumOttatous. liorol lu.. Yuuudit la good with tii. GoIhlr Diamoné Ca. Bond eau= onew nwlir bok. MARVELLOUS NEW DISCOVERY Ak problam of the. ago boai bau mlved. soienai bai t li iidadm-Uf0o\u0026Maulna boetllaoB. T\"huB»misal\" idopai Gémi. ana reombme l-hsé itOnda 50 dai' ytbat -aule 5p10 Luilth mare dmrtndtbim. Capair Geànidmore Mmd bold teta mmd ont am oit aou trateIdai. Wm Itbiai. ion deoi.tabar. SET i SOLID 14-t. GOLD-CGoihfr CernA». Net Enlatos. tIi... pnc emi matb\" masturproduMot elnoe-4he uBilmBa tothe duBua .1 ..ut1. Tbaiare oiatInay tainut mod 1-kt. goid. mmeliti o aaodêBém h xnst Dvstid a osit SEND TMI COUPON For N.IJwhvDe\u0026 s. Put vaur na-e and addSUm lausé i on Ouo a letter oa BP0it4aradMmd mte lm et Mmoi he. Meaunv book uUre-bbhl-30 of e.quit. Gophir Qhmi.Remi bihIa b n si gb oR09hov SbtléaitB 0umai bai eawanliSd Matai. dbée SMd fun pif UuliN5ORt1\u003c11 SAaduoisBglroni.rdant Wer overmo - dotla msant ar mart \"Mt MMhMd. Thui la tâmeoqlbut.................. the fte bSk imedwwt.isitt wgrestOum tue. ..................... 97 Piece Dinnr et and lovely Silverware G~T2 you G Lpen o canstii,, C91 lAetcomplete. 97-piece EnLIah neService anda loers teaspioofa.eachWine srvcelaguaranteed full suefor farnfly use, km 97 pleom comrpse lsg1 u 12 sneM 12 t tMs.1 b lt.12 re d dibtt lt ..12optplates. 112 sauce dius. plattrs 2Ovu1covered vecetablc«e - I 1!rsejg cv UU*. gravy boat. pickle dish. and a slaâ bowi. I a han\u0026 omuill decoratedla mchfoal desiga aud wil surely del lght liecatladlor elle btata\u0026UII set of Temipoou iaela the famoum Wn. A. Rgr Frufth Causatios demas wlthF.. m \"h Md bdtli poImkmdb6ý Read our WonderfulOffer Wn7 M-itat 22 - t\" amff om 184Modsa We have just Produced a dellttftil em terfumne kowne ai 'Coroeation a.ny 15e. .aCh? Bouquet.\" It ila 80 deiclously tragrant tlîat tee maman who tries It once null use t aimays.and. bet of ail. »\"Coroatlon Bouquet\" la sud, ra tet oue an saillido tthis beeiuflorenonte OU eVvmli i m sd te tvu me banaln tijat no one cati resust il Lovehi'tiIs 0 oflaou\u0026 isem iput iii new upeef ure. To lrnpbeSit casier eliii. mve\"? baisela euuad. a handaumely labtelieticontainerstm met1fur oel 15c. each. *ïarnuua i'lture ('oupe0.\" entitlins everF purrhetiaa iui.-siaf Yeu Io recelle lier choirc of tour Mailâcert NU Icolofr lleeduetlan o BEAUTIFUL FRENCH 1m s war NO *ONes-it g en our anime and iddrsOi te-day anid wvo MI CARNATION ed the 22 botici otae Diii. YTou mlii b. able (o miii (hem ouieli'8\" ThASPOONS cull lu îyotlt pare tUie. IBitu vrturn aur mon«i. onu S..and mm utU proimpll Wnd Fou. ail dellreîY charges pali. the beautiful ut of sooas. a\"i E ~ ~ L~ L~ U enuleSWin. A. RLogeri the haumne dinnhr met Fou cala alsa reette mlt lmiinu ioen m.d Make -the Mot beautifl byompysIiowing pour fiue reward ammcciyufl ids mmandgotiug onuamies Rc mci t eli our goodi sud reuT'- otir diue prefuifian pou did. W@ p\" \u0026al magnlcent spoons ilii de- REMEXIBER YOU TAKE NO RIs. Tou do lot ipendt a cat et Vour0Mn IgLst any thoustckeCer andi moeey. We trust y00 wlth aur gouda until sold and If for moi r.amW yffl «». eut oeili tfiem awliitake them back and UEle pou beautiflul preum « gaio they arc guarneteed to gilo yuu a bRgih cmuu n cethe QuanItP tY .u deoeili. Write tua'davIf y«n evry n atlsactioe LU Wear. ws u Ie aîntagu ut titsliberal Citer. It t. la us ti m ortuniy ti a Ife4lfie. Addreis: s e n os su ra nsd PremiumS. M- THE IIEGAL MANUFACTUAINO CO.,SOfigt. 0.21 t«Owatg.op Wheis uwiting advetuers, pleate meoti The 'Weater-a Home àmothll# la2.5, 10 uai20OIL. tus, at aul delen e re- vated and the ppily was ,the r the e pie ainty itans, lum hnson all its ave )sities what =n at hrink mritan ng at ed by d him house ,asons would s and acient ical- erable t the s the from e text Sthey uttr S! If S un- under e find self as ais of ver to an of mon of baron ce the y dis, in the head. gdale, stons, 1, the all to mac. is ipon a L. lter ýariest p col- ras an of the aarting e also -aibeit cetry-- CANADA Z51AMOVIS %ém. sel",
         "THE, WESTERN HOME MONTHLY Or at an earlier es%~ to mark, SRsuspense li~om1acntinnocence. \"The mutuel nod, the grale disguise 0of hearts with glades brimxning o'er; And somne unbidden tear that risc For names once heard and heard no more; Tomr brightenod by the serenado For infant in the cradie laid.\" John Milton's great pocm, of which I1 have sRoken abovo, was written at t1ic ago of twexty-ono. \"When,\" says an emmnent critie, «\"it ie recollocted that thie piece was producod at that eaTiy age, ail deNp iùkers of fancy and sensibiity muet pore over it with delighted wonder.\" 1 shbuld be glad.to quote the entire poem; but every resder in familiar with its imblime and stâtely nunibers. It ie surely one of the best ilustrations of the genius of the greatiinstrel addreesed by Tenny- The host and I sat round the wassail-bowl, Thon half-way ebbod; and thore we held a talk, How ailthe old honor bad front (Chtristmnas gone, Or gone, or dwindlcd down to soine bdtl gaines Ifll soi 0(1(1noks like t bis. In sloep I1semed To sait with, Arthur under loorning shores, Point after point; tilt on to dkawn wvhcn tireames Begin to foolthte 1ruth and stir of d:ky, To me, mthought, w~ho waited with a cro-wd, Thero carne a bark tlat, Llowir.g fr;ardl, bore ICing Arthlur like a modern gentlteman 0f stateliest port; and ail the peopte c(ried 'Arthlur ie corne again! ho cannot die!' I AYESERVICE \u0026 SALESCo. Lni. Wnqm PZAr Sir RosslYn WernYst, Firut Lord of the British Admiralty. was associated with Marshal Foch in the armistice negotiations with Germany. It is reported that at tbe negotiatiolis tige Germnan admiralty representative protested strongly against handing over the Cermnan ships te the Allies, as theirs, he states, was still an undefeated navy. Sir Rosslyn adjased lus monocle leisurely and replied, \"Well, you only had to cone out.\" DECAUSE 1 LOVE YOU ________________ TI»B. e0k et Love. Coustmhip land marriage r\u0026Paea_ Cotb. 75C. Po\u0026tP\u0026td ,Er ~ ~It fNIly expWifll 1w HPF S ý^U5E1 1 maidenfl becomO happy EC UE wivefl and bacedorgbO-AI L.'4E .Y OU coin.happy bU@bands In \u0026 YB easy nuothods. AIso Coin- IE Piete tiretions for deriar- ing Intentions. secpti mg vowSs ad retaituflEffe- tionls botil betore and alter tviationls. the dresse,. the ceeniy and the ~roper bebavior of both brise and bri(legroom wbether ln public orbehind 1the nuptial curtW I. t alsn tells plaIlY way to get over bas lful- ï1 LOVE -couRIlH D(43%ethe way t10 *it Up., . ji -Mjua h UAeItisth ay lu obnd asor po . sHogan Hide \u0026 Fur Co, Ill the swttttieart q I)retq. yougfg bachelor or malden every married inan Or ITE wOman every wVidow or wfdower. Young or oid-in 362 Pacifie Ave., Winnipeg %ac it 6. a compets imarriage guide. Write for cala- ~WbjsoR SVppLY Co.. -WINDSOR, ONT. TT'lîc,, îrritipng advcrtiscrs, please moitioI The lVestc-n Hoilic.Ioiltlil.Y son as England's \"imighty-mouthcd in- ventor o! harmonies, Milton--a name to resound for ages.\" Tennyson hirnel- t utly tcrmed by one o! our own nt*st brittiant singera \"the nobleet poet that ever lived\"-has cetebrated the Nativity in sweet and lofty measuros. Thero is in English song littie that is finer and more sweetly pathetic tian tisl; littie thnt more tenderly touches and unecais tie fountains of sacred grief: \"Again at Christmae did we weave Tih iolly round the Christmaa hartlî; The sient snow posseeaed the earth, And calmly foU our Christmas Eve. \"Thc yule-clog sparkled koon wtý frost, No wing o! wind tie region awkpt, L», But over ail things brooding sept The quiet sense of something lost.\" Ilere is a specimen o! the ,Lnureate's verse o! n different, periaps even more eiaracteristic, tenor; it is from '-The Epic\"-thc introduction in liter editions o! tic poot's works to Morte d'Arthlur: \"At Francis Allen's, on the Christ nias Eve- The game o! forfeits done-the girls al kissed Beneath the sacred bush and pnst away: The parson Holimre,. ite poet Exerarci liait', bchind Repeaited, 'Cone, again, and thrice as fair'; And further inland, voices echoed, 'Con e Witi ail good things, and war siati 1ie no more!' At this a hundred bells lxgan to peal, '[bat with the so 1 I- 'oke and\u003clheard, indeed, The elear elhureh beils rin iii the christ- tuas ioi. His Christmas Rose By Etta Squier Seley Sammy was o snlt that it was hard to realize lie wzs teîî ve-rs oid. He had ben tossed about :tIl Iis, loiielv littie life-living (1ow flamong the ,%-harve s ot.iin aieys. Of father or nther lie lad no memory. Bis oiily idea, of home care was forni\u0026t front th2e attentins bestoved lupon tîjîn front ltine to tiîne h Soîne nîotherly SouIs living in the shanties oit the tide flats or shettered 1w the miserable houseboats 1)Uilt ont scowvs and anhored atong the shore-, of the river. He arneil a pittance 1 s a h1ootbkiekk. nnd took \u003care o! himself; Wh theb Christ door shado wet 81 were 1 lad fe was 1 1) Fmo He echool bon i ness 1 cent That and n boys somel clams, penea car, à broke rutli It wa sie o: ver by, hi he wa It l she tc muet very 1 a 1?el ittie1 Samn BlOem the fi saw great he dr4 broke great nover I gue bawl i \"'it thou@ morr ne time your I sup H( TI unue Our him open thnt part he ti. carel ho b piec4 ib? worc gîf t( nigi of t) cont miss Chri Chri Ci CE tak suth reku whe plez,",
         "THE WEsTrERN HOME MONTHLY Wlien I firt met him lie was leaning1 against the door of th church listening to the boys sing.. They were at work on1 ChristasMusic, that hapy festival being not far distant. 1 a opened the1 door hastilyad lie crouched in the shadow if e expected a blow. He was wet and shivering with cold, and 1 eoaxed hlm inide to get warm. Our corby were a sensible lot, and se made the ~ lad feel somewliat at liome-ailtho\u003eUgl li wus greatly overawed at first by the strange surrouadings. IFrom that aiglit the choirboys took charge of Sammy. He became an attendant at the Sunday- school, was quite independent siace lie had been set up in a good boolli and lis busi- ness prospered, and tried hard 10 use de- c ent language and keep out of figlts. That waa hardest-to keep'ouI of figlts and not lose lis standing witlitlie otlier * boys on tlie street; but lie managed it someliow. Then one Sunday lie was not in his clas, and we ail knew sometbing lad hap- pened-something ws rng. We found hlm at the hospital; lie hdfalen under a car, and boîli his poor little legs were broken, but lie had not lb is cheerful- ness. icHard luck, Sammy,\" I said 10 hlm. «£Ye Ilhe eplid \"ardluck, but I'd ruter aveit e lgsthan me arrns.\" Il was always se; lie ever saw the briglit sie of the dark clouds. Very slowly for Sammy tlie day. dragged by, but tlie choir-boys came often 10 see hum, and semetimes 10 read 10 hlm; and lie was 10 be out soon, tlie nurse said. Il was the day before Christmas wlien sIe tbld me lie miglit go the next day, but must use crutches a long lime. That very aflernoon Sammy's teaclier sent him a 1?eutiflil, lone-etemmed red rose. The litte card with il read: ifWith much love and best wisles for Sammy, and ia remembrance of the Blessed Christ Ohl.\"p I was witl liim wlien il came, and for tIe irsI lime s\"ce I lad known tlie boy 1 sawliim cry. He heldthe roeefirst gantone clieek and tIen tlie otlier, and great soe shook lis whole body. At last lie drew a sleeve acrs lhis eyes, and said brokenly, -1 reckon-you tbink I'm a--a greal cry.-baby--an' 1 reekon I arn-but I neyer bad a-a rose before in my lfe-'ýn' 1 guess .I1am't very strong-or I wouldn't bawl about il.\"p \"I1t's a beauty,\" 1 remarked. liepitel. lie cent neyer get out, and dont you tel hlm i had il tel hlm ils frumý the christ cild.' \" He paused. \"Who may reckon tlie price of this gift?\" lie said. Turning again, lie preeented the roe before the altar, as lie would the regular alms-offering. As., one person tIe con- gregation rose, and tIen sank 10 ils knees as the rector left lIe sanctuary. A geat wonder held usa ai. Who that day had given best? W. of or plety, orSmn who had given 1he aweeteS\u0026thinglncl ever had corne mto hie 1Id., nSe uought praise for himuein t h. pving? \"'Ain't it a peadli, thougli?\" lie said, smiling througli bis tears. \"What d'ye s'pose ever mande lier send il 10 me, thougli?\" \",Wly because aIe cared about your mg sxck and liopes you will soon be well as we ail do. And besides, you kaow ha else tlie card says, and t0- lie sat 1oo out of tlie window a long lime tlien, l- the rose caressingly against lis cheek. Wea IleftI1said, 11l, boy, you and your rose leave togetlier li e mornmng, I suppose?\" He lauglied as lie said, \"«Well, u kin jes bet yer head the rose goe,if 1do!' -I The servie Chiristmas morng w unusually well attended, and we feit from our. pastor's voioe tliat soething moved liim profoundly. IFor one, I confesI was openly curious, for it was rare mndeed for tînt voices10 tremble or lesitate in sny part of the services. After tle benediction he turned 10 tle altar and lifted something carefuily. Wlen lie faesd us again 1 saw lielield a loag-stemmed, red rose and a - pieoe of brown wrappmng-paper. \"My people,\" lie said, \"you see wliat I hold lere.\" TIen lie related la a few words tle story of Sammy and of the gift of the rose, of whicl I Wl 0d him the night before. \"I found this at the foot of the altar cross here this moraing,\" he continued, \"and wtl il this note--sadly misspefled, il is true, but overflowmng wth Christian cliarity and tle true spirit of Christmastide. 1 will read it: 'Deer rector. \" 'i 1eev tliis rose liear. i was gela 10 tak lb bom but when i gt to the clurch suthun kep a-sayin pig pig pig. so i rekun the lord dont want me to keep it when sum uther kid needs it morn i do. pleze send il bak 10 jimy ross at the It wiIl hasten your recovery. Order a case to-day and start drînking one or two glasses daily. Put up in quarts, pints, haif-pints or in casks. Order from your dealer, and if le cannot supply you, write for prices and particulars. M *~*- ~-' 4 Fochi à ips lus ce as Cone îcard, nrd tn cl ben -living O. f lis 1 front 1 front souls Flats or eboats ng the ittance iimelf;",
         "THE WESTERN HOME MONTHLY ra owe ',Dv E. Cora IIý:nd mhere ffleallth anxd nlap-pi1ne_s We ed9 a SPECIAL EXCURSION RATES FROM NORTH-WEST POINTS TO 4FOQITSqCOL t/MS9A. Niake, it possib le fori vott iid your faiiy to iijoy at delightfu iiinmter Vacation Trip at reasonabie expense. See your Local Station Agent for details Ce't. relierf fron iimi xv ie's eîîli-visit thle great. ftii h cit v (if iî:îdi :î e'iiîîl'f lv ieîvs i if ml mit a inmlamndIand sao tdo ife pib1v l~l e i ert. of wimtcr wiîhIlt'onfort. K ~~~ivîîIt ii i il e. , rFIreo oni retîihî.. J.R. Davison B('i ort 1\u003eiii im\u003cit 'mi nsi i10r .. i z 7~ irr Î~ rib BRITSH V CII IAAJo(lv l OLUI31 1-zhe spol A'i\"~prdo \"And on carth Peace to men of good wili.\" Some years ago when public attention was9 so much drawn to new translations and revision of the Bible a veriy wordy con- troversy was waged as to cbriatInSBtbe superiority of the above 1918 rendering of the familier text \"And on earth Peace and good will towards men.\" TO-day with actual fighting brought to a cessa- tion over the greater pars of Europe, but with the gigantic task of the Peace con- férence facing the representatives of the allied nations, it ils not difficuit to see a significance in this form-\"Pace to men of good will.\" It is difficuit to holieve that there cen ho any \"men of good w111\" in Germany. A recent lether from a friend, who in pre- war days wan familiar with conditions on the continent, contains this significant paragraph. \"Not since the boom of the guns wan first heard ini Paris have I feit 50 apprehensive an I do et thte present time. I nover doubted that we should win the war unhil now, and now may doubts are grave indeod . Every Germen is eVlY with the Kaiser \"a beast of Berlin,' and nothing but the crashing of! their owný citios about their ear would havre brought fuil realization of the wer to the Gerinan people. They have escaped ail the horrors which they have heeped upon othors. Hindenburg is stiil in the country; there is no stable governmont and 1 tremble for the pence conferonce. I fcel thet al celebretions should ho absolutely withheld until the pence ternis are fully known and signed.\" This lethýer echoes the apprehiension that has been in my own heart ever since the commg of the armistice, and while 1 have no wsh to cloud the'happm ess of those who are rejoicing that the wfu] slaughter 'las for a time, at lesat, ceased, 1 cannot help issuing the warning to the women of western Canada not to mndulge ini the feeling of f aise security, and above all, not to, harass public men who have Fo - deel with the peace conference, witl petitions and suggestions et the prescrn tirne. Also let themn try and stifie the natural craving to have the mon home, and not distress the govrnmont of Cenads with pleas for the speedy rcturn of tii mon. A number wili corne home; soms ,wil ho here in time for Christmas tIi presenit year, but the work. o! \"makiný the world safe for domocracy,\" a phras( which lias been worn threadbare, is very vory f ar from being comploted. To m3 mind the lack of anything like enthiusiast.q clebratiolis by the women of France an( Belgium las highly sipificant. They ai4 on the spot and realize, as we can nevi do, whah it hias been to figlît the \"licast o Berlin,\" and whiic giving thanks for tIq cessation of hostilities apparentiy foc1 fa froni safe as ho the future. It is rathier intercstiiig to note tlîat it1h the Americans, the iash people to enter thi war and thie peopîle who have sufferet least front it, wlio are the nost confiden that the struîmggh is over. Tliere is aiiot lier paîssage of Soiptur that risecs \u003c'omt ially llfore îny minl It is, \"'Be mot dcel'ved, Ctid is not înocke.l xviîahsoever a iuli soîvetît, tliat shal hoe also rcap,''1 \"andti nany lias assuredl uiot yot rcaped wlî:îhsuce lias sow'n. Patience , t'i\u003ciiraiiet andi courage on th part of Utexvomncn n iox muy elp th Situation matt'riullv. 'llic wolmnenc Canada bave breeni brave :andtihave (dii 1woîiders, bmut.t ho iîext t wo iiioiit lis, iii ni h umble iî 1iîîIî, xiiitest thli as eVeilithi. war lias îîoh donc. l'le nmen who ha the hbusiness of thec peaoe coniferemice i tlieir liand(s, anid tllia ne'nms, n parti least, the govertîment oif ('unaida silot flot lic liamfpoi'c(ianîd li:rassd wit appeals for his and thiat. 1 oit l:îvln enîiphiasis Oi1 thii , b liiN ' of thle fact tIiO Othawa to-day is liraci m1i'lliumîdate witli 1îtit ions for thî ime dîh'riturii( iiost, cvcry (anuiaffinstillier uversea 'lleie îte ienselves, are 111:111V if thl 1îaiiflîîyloins ho get home, anti it j l st alid right, tliat thîe na ixo we (1.11v1viad have licen thiore througli tl tI'm le st rugg-le siloîild lic reicased 7ait Poir-it 1ssi ut' ieiti, lit if, as verv 1iiîssl t the ecnd of the arinisti the striggle lias ho be retiewecd,xWOU tiev itot il.aetilcou f1,a wollien of Canada wouild thev mot ashanicd ho lbaveo hud ite men witlidrai f rom service overseas. own desires for the returît of lier men, but this is not merely a nîationli or even ail international crisis, it is a world crisis. The requcst of the women of Alberta to have a woman representative at the peace conference, naming that. representetive, shows that in one province of western Canada, at least, there is an amazing lack of vision. As hias been so foreibly written by Allison Craig, at a conference of this kynd, countries cari only ho representcd by their governments and there is no woman member of the government ini Canada. Even the advisroy committees which will assist thc actual pence con- ference can only bc eomposod of those who are nationally representative. If any possible exception could bc made to this rule, it certainly could not bc made for Canadien or American women. The only women who would have the slightest claimî for such represontation would lx' thle women of Belgium, France, Great Britain and Italy. The mails and cal les so far contained no record of these womeýn clamoring for representation at the pene conference, and lot the women of western Canada govern theinselves accordingly, and while thankful in their hecarts for the cessation of slaughter and the hope that 1the cessation may mean permanent peace, let them \"carry on,\" in quietnoss and do nothingto weaken lie hands of those who mustndeal with the tremnn(ous issue of 1the peaoe conference. During the very trying period since the influenza made its appearance in western Canada,'1 arn sure that scores of women, particularly ini Saskatchewan and Alberta, f have thought Iongingly of tlhe The help which would have corne 1Influenza to many of the scattered homes and communities, hall ethose homes heen served by the Royal e Northwest Mountcd Police as they were emi the old days before the war. Then 0when any general calarnity overtook the Iproics these capable \"riders of the leplains\"~ were always requisitionied to round up the isolated fams and communities al to see what was needed and in bringing le In the grim winter of 1907 when the ie roads xvere blocked with snow and the 11 whole country short of fuel, tiiese two :gea provêinceswere patrolled by the se muntd poiceandevery homesteader Yaccounted for. I have listened more than ýy once thrilled wit.h stories told by men and Icwomen on lonely hornesteads of the dopotnaria.oa roeadhwi rehad meant lîfe to al the family. Now at er this tinme thoere have been undoubtedly of tragedies on many rernote commuilities, lie and some substitution for the work of ar these wonderf i men should ho found by isthe provincial governments, and hofore winter closes in, these homesteaders and leremote coînmunities should hoe hecked, idup andiaceoitct for. No force ah present nt exists that couid do this work with the WCsaine effiiency and(i dspat.oh as couid the en o\u003cf the faiiar searlet tirne, but it \u003cc otild ho donc and should bo donc, and this ý11 wotuli be a verv laudable work for the ]ynonien %, to iurge utpon the provincial goverrnneits. le ie The epidernîc lias l)eon a testing time tf andi mucih trmu:'lwemiimlbas been shown, lic nuît. îîlv liv thle iil:ii 1rofcssion and the ii traiiicd nuiirses, batliv the voliutecrs, men lie ant1 woinfen, who, rcmlizing ,v Siîneltting of thle (danger, on Wanted have risked ail to bring at Cô-operative hiellp and comlfort to Id Service their noeiglrs-.. The, itii r'ollof honuir, Ibose xxho lig have giveili ife to ti s it work is a long onie, but it wvilI ioevtr cild cont ain al lte nainest hat it should, 1)lit o f onte t bing lias \u003c'oine homoe withi great forte a\"s. tii thelicuneml tof C anada ii this crisis, and 'lU tliat. is, thewiived of tif e 10oigaflizatt m s whoerc ii tine of disaster, it xiii mot lie ('ut neccorsarv tii reiv on t ho voluliteci' liclp. lie Whtvrthe irganiizatioii îav lie, %ve lhe siiotîli havte siiietiîing nationial and ii'O iinilitzt:.in iii o'iharacter, vhercby the ouif iie- for iglît îmîg tiscase should be co- tlhe îirdiîîî:îi'il and whieri' it wiiuld bc possible be f \u003ci b1) î!L 14-!1 i t ii ciii to be ot'service. .wn I hmiliî1 Iei le iititiig duit wciuic take in 1I-ith it îîîiî i Viiitt1 friîin 'sa\\, 18 to 5M \\ans tin natio vagil out. died had adeq for ix ent t Anei wher Ye StatE give i a rat have concE is foi the 1 grow. factu orgai care ( TEi Heal velou ago 1 with knovE of do in or smngl, there betw to-ds heait adeq anim have has d Thi entir have remo have outsi amnoi vent( aIong doub the i aboul -, ast s been ca-or, whert of. by J Pune rny d The Punc Ile, 1 mn ch: to th( Stead actern on th ta rea phase lîpen WXest aiehiei sti11 t a o ivide On ce the M The IL tif To from e Ti tîther Chii 'vere for ti iiemic Bevoi Ont h iave mîidst p lace,- t liose l'igheE M-e -ierifi \\pres - nt i. t, .'.l '*1 -.... -t, .,..,U *1 ~ I I t. 4' '4 i 'i i :.~ il t t i ~1 t, I s! t, lui,, i. 'SI' il., i' tIt~ ~ i~i t t 'T' i \u003ct t.",
         "~1 n THE WESTERN HOME MONTHLY\u003c ~$ars of age, who would have certain tining and would be at the cati of their nation when the need\"Icamne. Trhis sounds vague, but it could and should be worked out. Probably 60% of the people who have died of this epidemnic need flot have died had there been at the beginnmng an adequate supply of help and food available for immediÎate distribution. Just at pres- ent there is a serial running in one of the Amnerican magazines projecting a scheme whereby ail the youth of the United States who have reached a certain age, to givea year of service to the country. It le a rather fanciful work and possibiy might have many a klw picked i it, b ut the conception is a fine one. The idea there is for the controing: of the production of the country and tle regulating of the growing of crops and the industrial manu- factures, but it contains the germ of what organization might do with regard to the care of heath. There is in Canada a very wonderful Health of Animais Act which works mar- veiously, so marvelously that four years ago when the U'nited States was over-run with one of the inost contagious diseMes known among animais, and when millions of dollars worth of livestock was sacrificed in order to get rid of the disease, not a single case occurred in Canada, though there was considerable commng and going between the two countries. Had Canada to-day a federal systei for the care of the health of the people, in any sense as adequate as they have for the care of animais, the present epidemie could not have reached the gigantic proportions it has done. That it could not have been prevented entirely is evident from the fact that cases have occurred on scattered farmis and remote islands of the sea, where there have been no communication from the outside world, but that an enormous amnount of contagion couid have been pre- vented by adequate health laws acting along the border there is no manner of doubt. We have been talking ever since the war started of having iearned more about the value of human life, yet ia the - ast six weeks'many hundreds of lives have heen sacrificed, because we have no proper co-ordination of national welfare service whereby they couid have been taken care of. Last month 1 made reference to the book by J. W. Stead of Calgary, \"The Cow Puncher, \" and since then it has corne to rny desk and 1 have read it. It is a clean wholesome tale, and sets The Cow forth what is really the land Puncher boom of Calgary and Aberta in an mnteresting llght. To nie, however, the whoie thmng is too local i n character to make a great contribution to the literature of western Canada. Mr. Stead is not happy in his women char- acters, hie does mucb better with men, b\u0026t on the whole it is a tale that is înterestmng to read and is not a misrepresentation of a phase of life in western Canada which bas latcn so of ten the objection to books on the West in the past. Mr. Stead has not aichieved \"the epic\" of the West, that is stiii to be written, but hee bas contributed a book which will undoubtedly have a wide circulation and which is informative on certain phases of the deveiopment 01 the West, and more especially of Alberta. The book is issued by the Munson people of Toronto, and can, I fancy, be obtained from any book store. Earning Christmas Th tacer in our Province and eer Christmas blessings. When their schools were closed they risked their lives to care for those suffering froin the recent epi- demic. Some have gone to the Great Beyond in the service. Out in the foreign communities they liave nobly carried on the service in the iiiidst of great difficulties. In some places doctors could not be had and i hese teachers bravely did what they Vould. I know some of thein personally .md feel that their service is worthy of ighest admiration. We have learned se much of noble cýirifice during the past four years that lie triumph of justice we are now ex-j l-riencing fils our hearts too deep fori ,.\\pression in words. Somehow we feeli - intenseiy that we must express our- I,-ves in service. As Margaret Deiand -ys: \"The cup of sacrifice and sutTering is belng held out to us. 'Drink ye al of it;' civilization says to us. And we put out eager bands toward that sacra- mentaldraft; we take the cup-and give thanks.\"' Chriatmaa ]Proof At Christmnas time we feel we are related to everybody. Let us carry this kinship through the year. As we grow dloser to the Heavenly One we think lovelier things about others because we realize God hs the Father of ail. Beautiful flowers cannot blossom in a weedy mind and a muddy soul. If we want te ac- complish good we must develop beautiful ideas. Why I have known a girl to give a Christmas present to another and then eay somethmng mean 'about the recipient! The loveliest and most helpful Christinas reinembrances we can give h kidness and consideration. A Christmas remembranoe should be Cbristiy. We have been given a mind and a tongue to use helpfully. every material thing for an ideal? Why are fastidious woinen scrubbing filthy bodies in hospitals and sending those they love to die, while they and their children endure every hardship? Why has that bulwark of huinan flesh aiong our frontiers held at bay yesr- after year forces of superior physical strength? Why does the civilized world (which does not include Germany, who fis~ for profit) sacrifice every inaterial tbing, that unborn gener- ations may possese bappnes and peaoe? Why does humanity Ive up wealth with prodigality and personal ambitions some- times dearer than life itself? Why does this gigantic tugle continue when paoe might be had at the prioe of dis- \"Because, madame, there hs a foroeý strenger than any law of the inateriai world-the force of the spirit! It con- trols man to-day; it controls destiny; it will decide that this sphere hs not a mote spinn through space inhabited by a bighlyeveleped animal called man, but Lieutenant H. T. C. Walker, of the British Navy, is one of the herocs of the amons attack on Zeebrugge. He was an officer on board H.M.S. Vindctive, which was the centre of the enemy's attack when they discovercd the attempt which was being made to dcstroy the Mole. Lieutenant Walker had his arm carried away by a sheli on the upper deck of the waresiip, and lay in the darkness and confusion wbile the storming parties raced over his prostratc body. He was rccognized and dragged aside by bis commander. With hi\u0026 remaining arni he waved a greeting. \"Good Iuck to you,\" he called as his friend had,to leave him. Happily he was rescued and is stili able to do bis country good service, while bis naine s one of those which will neyer die as long as the history of the Great War is read. Hi, photograph shows him to be a typical British naval officer, and doubtleis he wiIl soon become known to a very great circle of friends on this side of the water. This photo was taken upon bis arrivaI in New York City. The experiences of the war have con- vinoed men of the presence of God. Out of the bitter conflict have men realized the truth of Christmas. Mme. Duryea tells in Harper's Magazine the story of a farnous surgeon wbo lias found in the war a true religious experience H1e said te ber: \"Madame, before this war I was a con- firmed estioner and doubter. With al my intelec Iseiced men's bodies for some pofo the existence of a soul, and found none. I feil back on two codes: that might hs right and that the strongest law of tbe material world hs that of self- preservation. Like Germany, I founded my creed upon sucb fallacies, omittmng and denying any spiritual element. But I iearncd better, for there hs another iaw abroad in the world to-day tiîat cannot lie denid-a law as old as the creation of man. Tell me, madame, wby are you here? W?ýhy am 1 here? Why are these wards filled wlth broken men wbo do not complain, although they have sacriflced a tlieatre of events pertaining te the spirit-a ihty force, sublime, part of God imlf The first tine I aaw a battlcfield cleaned up under the stars I seemcd te se, above the pieces of rent buinan flesh, radiant angela tri*gte make me understand that t h.e eath o01i body was an unimportant and insignificant thing-that it was not bow a man died, but what be died for, that mattered.\" The Provincial Conference of Women which was to bave been beld in Decernber bas been postpond until the latter part of May on account of conditions caused by the influenza epidemic. This tep in decmed desirable in order that when the conference is beld representatives f rom every part of the province may be able to attnd Rebecca Dayton, Chairmnan of Conference. Steele, Briggs' SEED Catalogue 1919 Ready January let Send in your naine for a Copy PLACE YOUR ORDER ECARLY Fror thoe Splendid Stocks Dr. Saunderi' Early Red File What Kitchener Wheat Imýportdlfaner Oata--Germiriation 9%in4 a. Weight 45 ibs. Per bushel. lLin' Brome Graus. \"Lion\" Western Bye Grauu. \"Lion\" Alalfa. \"Idon\" Sweet Olover. \" Lion\" Tlmothy. We are buyers of Brome, Western Rye and Tiniothy. Send sam pies. Steele, B riggs, Seed Co., 221 MARKETr ST.N~INNIPEr., Man. CalT Eneiesl WHITrESCOURtS BLACKLEC Your Vterinarian can stamp theru out with Cutter'\u0026 Anti-Caf Scour Serum and. Cutter'\u0026 Gerrn Fr.. BlackIeg Filtrate and Aggressin, or Cutter%. Blackleg Pilla. Ask hlm \u0026bout th.mn. If he hasn't our literature, write te us for information on these products. 9 mhe Cutter Laboratory Berkeley, Cal., or Chicago, 111. \"eThe L.b.r.tery Thot Knoua Hg - SA DAINTY CHRISTMAS GIFT Cut ohmn Eowl c UT GLASS is always welcome ini the home. Thîis beautiftil bowl, 8-irîcl diameter for Three new subscript ioris to The Western Home Monthly. WRMTEUS ]FOR PREMIU LIT Western Hom 'e Monthly WIn;nIpEG Got Gophers? -rGet the habit. Kil 'oui now! Keep on kdhlng 'emnlUeKL-MQI. * 32A the 3term men, erta, f the corne tered Siîad toyal were Then k the r the ound nities nging n the 1 the two ;eader n and F the low it ow at )tedly nit ies, rk of nd by before ,s and eked resent hl the ýId the but it id this or the vincial g time ilown, nd the . mcli aliziiig laniger, bring î1 te ,The, e Whbo Id(, luit t forte jis, and tzat ion Ilot lie r liclp. le, %V( 1l anOd v seifi- 1wy the lie Co- possibile servive. take in S tû no",
         "e THE WESTERN HOME MONTHLY 32B Young Womnaf and Her Problem By Pearl Richmond Hamilton The Guiding Star \"Flic star which Lhev saw in the east went' before the\"', tilI it caine and stood over where bbe yoing child wvas. \"When bhey saw the star, they rejoiced o wibb exeeding great joy.\" Every girl lias a guiding star. Some1 secu itlcarly-~Others allow clouds to obscure the vision. Those whose vision is clear follow that star until bhey accornp-1 lisb their goal in life. Wbcn a girl secs hier guiding life star she is happy in ber work, because she secs the vision that crowns a career-of achieveinenit. Wa.s there ever a Christrnas when the whole world wa9 so bhoroughly convinced of the truth of the star of Divine guid- ance? lias there ever before been sucb profound evidence of the triumph of justice? Events of the pasb four years bave convinced us that aiong wth the clash and struggle of rigbty material forces, there have been powcrful spiritual con- fluts anid victories. This Cliristrnas wît,- nesses a world that is heing convinceci that \"God is a Spirit; and thcy that wvur- ship Humin must worship l-liîn in spirit and in ruth.\" During bbc past six wceks Our young wornn eachers and nurses and business girls have sacrificcd their lives to save others. Surely with leýssmis like this everywbcrc about us, wc mcmist leave bbe old shehi of criticisin and al other selfigh intoxicating poisons and grow into the larger life so wondcrfiilly irnpressed on the wcrld by our soldiers and nurses. Thcy have lcared away the louds t hat \u003c\u003estrcicte(i the ligbt of btce1Divinie gii\u003ciing star, and iilnotu iicerstaii lis if wc ailow tice(\u003e1(1 nuisty specks Lo darkciî t ie truc vision of life. 'M'at brave Canadian lad, Lieuiteniant WValer I. Gayner, like tlicusaiids ofl ctiers, emphasiscs the truth that orclinary min aînd woîncn (!an cxert tlie5lves hW:-oncI any liit thcy iiîay have set. After rlatiiig 5soute of his cuurageoiiii c iýperieII(i'5, lic says:'' lconiy intcrcst- inîg tliing abouct. ail titi s, it secIns to Illie, lis t lic way il shlows how the wiIl t'O (1o a bling I \u003ecoilie.s a soîrt of hiabit of thec mind And if tlbis is truc iii the armiy, 1dit\u003chu swec Ol V il, Nwuid iotlic truc niicivil life. And if itl is truc' in civil lifc, R is certtiiilT w1i rtih au y une s wl i le Lu foii t ih uit, h 11.1it lit it (ivcw iescthlicdc t cri inat il in tiicarry on beccainc:a ixeci idea. I l is tle saine %vitli tliouisands oîf ocicr fclluows w'lîu bave kept doggcil 'y at, Ilile businecss of figliting. No mi alter lic w uftnciie l*îcvwcrc 1put outi o~f Lim gailie, tllecy ellit' :ik. Andc if t1lu vouluidcIb lis inii tue litîic business of u ar t lîcy--aîîdotier moniii ciîIcl l ii tli blcis iiicss of living anid w cirkiii îiu Evcry :isc i d inig lire isfi suries of ces wvc \u003cic1d citer agu--Fai'ilts iîi:t iiiil our growthI hve i1rt c nob îchle wui- îtt,liitiil iv itTcr frotIlîcI iîv î:irrOWiiw ui I lbve h s:Lil ivt,lIiiig t lîtit, iiijqumrcii liltliur I havi 1 t'tluis hliiîl ]chiIV ()\\\\.I îI l ils follwbiug the guidiiiiig st:ir? Wliab iiiI:i 5jIi'iks llitivi' I \u003cl cwiil li iiii uy visao ocfIlle ic tir? Arc e efullof fcar of tith andIii tutu? )l us f bis possessioni uf fýi Mciilit li e m s il icî ! IIlis iccîL 1lgi -For ( )d luitili1iicit,.Iiei Ilms the spir of fiar; Icit uOff powi', ici iido i Iiid i Ti'lcii luis gciiliiig star pcmcilises is iili 1irvo 'gri-atgif ts. LikoI'liii wisc-uicon oic1. Isclîtticcis X ii clh (f gifts -III wvI fcllîcw lii i'- stauilid IId iti tI of t ii ciwc'i, iilvi I ciii il - iiiiiih iiiii ui i t ticliiliiilcuit-\\. i lh I riIl inii -1cr tc Facci 't l:ic, c;cI i licr Iur tiu ti i i i t ( i ,\\q ii s: due l c t. t 1cli -(. i i tlii' -t\u003ciiiti 4iiin \\tl ccci cii N ciii ii i \\01ii 0 îîl :I I'i ~ l Icie îîill ccii ji lup o i' i i i îli:I olluîîîîfî-.î- lîitî i~,i \\i -tt :11 iii i tit I li t i ti i i i , Il l ý l Ic iii tl i i s il l ii IuI il , l l ýl ' Il \\ hi: Pei a A im it to mi st( th or l . One Viewpoilt hIl Wc rcad so much these days of wornen's exj work. Wornen bave taken new positions 1 -they are doing the work well-and aiv some exponients «Ven say tbey are not willing to give up their work. We read article after article of thîs wornan's work Su and that wornan's work, and tbe impos- sibility of ber going back into the narrow Eç life of the borne. 1M 1 ask myscîf this question: \"Wbab kind TV of evidence of appreciabion are we showing to tbc brave men wbo left these positions, s and afbcr sacrificing everytbing are rcady ar tii rcturn to thern?' Jusb hat wilI tbey think wben tbey corne back to their work y anîd wc say: \"You cannot have your posi- o tion. 1 have it and what's more 1 arn going wl to kcep it. I've decided 1 arn not gomng fi liack to the narrow home life to, look after f children and cook and sew. I've learned tii wear overalis. 1 arn earnihig more e moncy than I did before tbc war. 1 can b wcar better clothes and afford more r luxuries.\",b Jusb whîat value is a girl's patrîotism L wbo blows a horn anîd shouts at a peaceh eclebratiohi, but kceps tbc position a sol-h (lier lef t to fighbt for in order to make that position safe? Whab respect can hle havep for the young wornan who refuses to lets lîirn have bis position back wbcn he re-h tmrns? 1 belicvçevcyslier is entitled bu lus position' or one better when lic rcturnq. Sirely a good position is due Ilirn, as well as a hiapp)y homte ife. Whcre shahl we find good home rnakcrs if our girls ait go into bhe' business world? Is it pos- S sille for iotîers to care for lbitte chmîdren i 9if bbheunothers are out al day? Surcly wce 1caînot say bbc art of bomc-mnakihig isi tnarrow w'hen wc know of bbc brave ment andl women our mothers have sent out *iiito bhe worid. Characbem' building is mot ya rienial work, iL requires a broau i iimdcd I.wuman, bu deveicup strong men and pure ywciiiicii. î'ew inen xvilaiiow vanyonc bo esaiv their mothers wcre narrow'. On bbc :1 otlier lianîl we hiear them praise their ILincîLers for their keen iîsiglit and1 power of enduirancee. W\u003cîîîd our soidiers have bvIcen simichs1lenihiimen anidivir wonmeti lear-wvrkei'5 su nul lv ciliiemt if their ('r niiulIrs lîad spent six days out of seven iii business? \\Vlicmti our menicouice bIck, shah blicy ,. lii;i- cci or visuint ccciinarn 1w for b iir is' bri uliiein incis? Xili bc edisap- Il' piiciited lt ciiir sel fishiim ss? k IL i-c ummfcrtulite fIblîL(cir young girls ishu cldlle iiiliietiied hy -,v(im xî-bwo have 'c? lit le rc'iet, fior îîieîî. lbisivuinen mw ho Slirive failcdin homecciîc ife or xvlmo have mot :1, e x ci Ili 1h cpîcsire of ite trime hom e 01. IIi~kl er Nw liiiI cliffl e 'tili rt \u003cif hum e m akii cg 11.1; icidmurge cciii'girls cuit iîîtîctîhe business 1:i1 Ncrld. IL is t rue iL is iielessziry for miany mu vcîmmîg w icnmcn bug u oît ito buisness. i t vi respect- and admire thleni-hut 1 refer tii tllise wliclr ciipiigpstostli rit are dlue our, rel îîciid scihciers and (ibu alose cif ivîcc regard liie-iakiing as maricw a nd iliclil. Vse We ( Iionot ficisiocc'ssfiîl lhomne mtkers ucof \u003clsc-citeitcd. 'Flic are allioiigt'bic iali- c:1 - p ie s t îv ciie n l m uw . NM Y litt e g irl lii clzaici1 licr-r ci us lrotii i iv'iieek I o-ia iii tii stuc: \"I luevi'Xci, iiothier.' Is bhîcie i. :i liNv slar y or piositio1cmiwouid aevcpt- in i S I v \\ i- h tilu n , fo r I l l e 1 h -a oi f h o l d i n g i01 i\u003c lii lit tle c(Ile iii iliy Aiîs.nd wli i cd i i ai-cucl-t girl îc isis min front ciscliuul andi zl iik t quiet-t iiii 1t1:1t 5iiid l le i intu tici' icihiiî:rvfor îci. :Inrsearciliii Il ,\\ilu, -a:v1lNiiIlle ilfi- is cia roiw :a11i d i imiit erest in g? ,\\ ('l D )î I cicI-wt-iitlC drlgery xvhetm ',)i- il'iivuillY ici l dc»1 ltcV id c iii iiitatlcIIt :111\\ i iiil t lic ioctid I1c ý of il the tg- Il -0 i l ici ticle it I-,I[,l can i f:it 1cr (, : i,ýIl i l ictirui. 1. 1 ttî i imil I s il! ~ ~ ~ ~ I ih r i:111\\ii cii-- ii- i \\(iri l I-t v c c i î- -ii lii - , t gc i l ', lV 1i i v l oI 0 1- . Id Hr t-, il 1,4 mny living. What eouild 1 do? 1I had iciver had the chance to learn any partiviiIr kind of work that would fit nie for eaîiiîî-1 a living. 1 went to the city-afl( of coor:Se you know the rest. But the brother muri- ried; they built a new home, and Ili,~ wife does not necd to work. She lia luxuries and comforts, while here I ali struggling for a narrowV living-)roiii down in health from heavy farm w ork.- This is the story of not only one girl, but of many gzirls 1 know-girls wlit have corne to mie. W'hy mnust the girl lu sent out penniless to make her own \\ and the brother given the property ail! protection? I trust fathers and mothers -who ie this inclination will think seriously be(fore. they send the daughter out imbt the wcrId practically penniless. It is not a square-( deal. The daughter in the home deserves the saine consideratiori that is given lier brother. The Star of Happines ves a little ,vork? On the pages of our itory bas not the influence of a great ersonality counted for more than a trial alance sheet? Narrow%? In the hands of littie babe rnay lie the destiny of nations. mean, petty, selfish, vain mother wilI îpress. those traits on her ebild. Ah- brequires great mothers to train great en. 1 wonder if witb the glare of the ,wness of tbings m-e shall measure up othe strength and personality of the aothers of yesterday. Biography is intensely interesting to, ne. I have clipped references from the ories of great men, and thc cmpbasis, hey place on the influence of a mother, ,wife, or sister surely places a bomb rider the theory of the narrow spbere of ime making. Captain Fagan, in referring to his awful peinces in Gallipoli, said: \"WIe did sing a little, and one chap Jways got us started on one song: \" 'Dear old mother, in the days of old.. ireethearts then, sweethearts now, sweet- hearts evermore, ver true, dear, as the days roll by; !y sweetheart then in the days of old, ýIy sweetbeart tili I die.'\" Captaîn Fagan said: \"We'd sing that ;ng-and cry like children, cry openly ind net care a hang who saw us. It's our mother, God knows, that you think f at such tirnes.\" Abbe Patrice Flynn, that noble prmest, who has worked su, hard on the battle- ieldi, in emphasizing the soldier's longing or his mother, said: \"Wbcn I arn adrninistering the last comfort of the soul to a man on the )attleficld, I usually lie down by him, to naei airfor his pour, tortured breath to, speak to, me. And often lying there beside him, when he has wvhispered his longings for his mother, 1 have said tc riim: 1:My boy, let me take your mother'i place!' And he has looked up at me witi~ such love and gratitude in his eyes, anc ias put his arm-s around my neck as h( would his own mother's, and bas gone t( sleep happier because of that!\" Home making is a w-ork of the heart aj well as the head, and that is just wha makes it a broad,' beautîful life for womnen Then shall wc ail go out into the busi ness world and leave ernpty homes an( hungry hcarts? Love is the oldest thin, mn the world and the newest. Christma is the hirthday of loee, and we shaîl cor tinue to, kcep our heurts open for thi blessing of love. The return of th Christrnas season is a rernin\u003cler of woman mission to hiimanity that of motherin the race. fhîere are nu friends like oid fri'iîcs. And nîone su good ani truc; 'e. greet them wvlen w'e meet thcuîî, As roses greet the dcxv; No other friends are dearer, Thoughb hum of kindrcd muId; Ani whilc w-e prize tbc new unes, We treastîre more tbc old. Iliere are nu friends like old fm'ends, 'lo lielp us with the load That alil niîst bear w-ho journey 0cer life's uneven rond; And w-len unconquered sorruxvs l'lie w-earyh'yours invest- 'l'le kindly words of old friends Are always fuund thc besb. Tiiere arc nu friends like old friends, N\\ lere'er w-e clwell or roai- lu lamnds beyocîd bte ucean, Or iear thie boummds of houle; And i eu tbiey siuile bu gladden, Or sonietihcies frowvii luguide, *W e tumîclîv wisli those old friends Wecc r le bt y our side. Fhc-eare rmiino riends like old frieîidr- 'la'Oc1!i cuir fre1uenb fears, N\\ lien -a ii tf1111anti deepen 1 Tbrti lifes teclining years; Acici xbi i (ut'faltering footstcps -\\ li Ie (Great Divide, W Il lii r ecet the ohd friends \\N liii c tlit utlier sie. itavi I i, Sîckels, un 'Banner of G- ii.' have in mind a young woman who hiac only a few days bo live. Her body ivas so badiy dccayed frorn bbc dregs of xvriîg living that in lier extreme pain, slcc cxclaimed: \"I bhought nobbing luit money would\"bring bappiness. 1 liad it -plenby of it-here 1 amn. Tbere's mîcçcli- ing in sucb a life-nobhinlg.\" Suie \u003cheu hefore lber bhirbiebb birthday. The ceidcîf a selfisb life. The crowning bcauby \u003ccf a wornan's life is unsclfisliness. I lb avs lcads to service. Elizabeth Fry neyer a9wakcned f rontIlir sleep wibhoub asking tîcis questionî: \"i hcw best may 1 serve to-day?\" She said: \"Ici bbc besb sense we are ail one, and biiocgli our pabhs bere may be ditierent, we halve souls equally valuable, and have al bhe saine work bu do; wbieb, if' properly (ciii- sidcrcd, sbould lead us bo great symîîuatlîy and love for others.\" At bue age of lirtvý- tbrcc she began bier î'emarkabic w-orkiin prison reform. Wlienîlber naine bcaeti known cverywbere she aeknowledgecl the succcss of bier work as comimîg froni itli desire for service.ý Success in tbc truc sen4 of the wccrd means bappiness. We are ail searching for bappiness. Some une bas wrillcn: 3\"Ilcbas acbîcved sîîceess wbo bas lîvech well, laughed ofben, and ioved mucb; vho bas gained bbc respect of intelligent imic and the love of libtle cbildren; whoc las sfilicd lis iche andi aceomplisied bis task; who bas loft bhie xorld botter thlaiec found it, whetber by an iînprovcd iopucy, a perfect, poem, or a rescucd soui; wliu bas neyer iackcd appreemat ion of ci beauty or failed bu express it; w-ho liais ,r always looked for bbc best in otimer- lunci LIgiven tbc besb lic bad; w-buse ife wiVIiii cinspiration; whose nienory a benedi- rt-jon i for the world to Iearn. They have rnade the vision of the Christmas star clear for burnanity. In the darkness of war bhey saw a great light. We girls-young womcn -e~oder wornn-all wornankind shahl not have roorn in our rmnds any more for the things that mar life's vision. No, the pabh bas been clcansed with the blood of brave rnen and nobfr womcn. Tbis pabb of glory must be kcpt dlean by our women. lb is now broad-very broad-and tbc shining star lcads to God. NWimemi LIe ('Iiîristia.s season draws neat 1 alw-ays tlîink (if tbc girl in an isolabed pîlace. Perlîaps sule is big-licarted and longs bu rerneiiiler evem'y une iii bet famihy, 1 mb lias not une cent of ber own, At nu tiine of tîce year is it su ham'd for i girl bu bc witliout a littie mommcy as ai Chmristmails. If the fritîer or mnoblive -oîld sec lat their clauglitcm'ficas little bu siienti ut bîis binie, Ltme dauigîter' w-lidle life w ouilucileiîIcel. 1 kiîcw girl who îîcvcr lad Ia centb bu spenhi Christmias. lnisbead of mmakiîg lic ecunonical, iL made lier extravugluhi W\\hmei she started bu caru lier owîî livingt she spent cvery cemnt. Sue suici she mwa su dîsgusted w iLli bbcspirit \u003cf licc:ui bimat, suie neyer waumted bu lue gifflt- f il If bbc girl lidbeeîm alltuweil à iti le mc ou duuing lier g iml îod sue Nw uîli I rve ir-i ci bu spend it w'isely. She Stc1: -1 ulrc-t Chîristmas. Çciidinot watt ita i ru -sei b alieaui1 i-oi c ncct.give c ccc uand I cxc %iînitmas duriiig mmm glicllood w uts dark perio(ui'' 'h-day'v hie gilc-ic notiig for lier lioîw, n d,:c it i.-(Ili largely bu the uegleit cof lier pacrd-nt carelcssiîess of bbc lit t 1\u003c'love thblîi that Chi-istucas ucai.Ail tt ial nieblink of oliii icgirlI lriiiw Xc liilmtt notlad l wi i-ii\u0026Iit tii slai-e cf lion haî'vest. Il'Juttit1lIitve til)(c upoiii îî 1 w-ulmdl like tIu sîteak bu ic fît lcurs clatghter m'siic urge ticwiituIIivo i girl un91 lclititu witlî Iti. u I'i - Giils ltv iu iit ici- ticte puimile- - s \u003cuf theimu I fit .1i lit wtîîî tlus Il tîcni lehil ti - X 't11 ttt I it I %.i, i i X woriutclc l' - t ie -c-i x tiit i. ei fili- l . i ucu\u003c' i.,, 'r- * cf ~ t-' i-4 't' i c",
         "THE WESTERN HOME MONTHLY 32c Through the many conservation mecasures on flour adopted by the Govern ment for the wining (\u003ei), f the war OgiIvie's Government ' Standard Fleur bas proved its, superiority. Its quality bas wlithstood the inroads various substitutes have mnade on its strength. The -Lgoodness of \"Royal Household\" shows throt gh tht Governmnent regulations. But now the food ('(ntr\u003c\u003e 1r ha s released you from conipulsory use of substituites you can bake bread, buns and biscuits fromn Ogilvic's (iovcrinmieiit Standard alune andi marvel at tht resuits.- Get a sack to-day The Ogilvie Flour Milis Company Limited Winnipeg, Canada Canada Food Board License Nos. 4-1 to 5-372-418 \u0026 2-023 t; 41.'' I",
         "THE WEBTERNHMEMNTL \u0026 1_iR r s nul r e Sucoess for Mr. Edison 1 Life-like music at last 1 For years, the world's gratstInventor worked night and day to make the music of the phonogragli true to life. At asat he bas been crowned *with succssi1 80 years fgo Mr. Edison invented the first phonograph. Wh\u0026ën hie patents expired, others copied hie ideas.. But he hiniself was mot satisfied. This was net rea1 music. It could mot take the place of the living singer. or player. His ambltiép was to invent a phonograph that gives you genine music. Something that would brlng the joy of truc music into your life even though you couldn't play or sing a note. Here it is. The New Edison Amberola.,, The phono- graph that Re-Creaieg the living tone. Send the coupon on the opposite page and fid out about this wonderful new phonograPh. Is Your Home Hgappyl How abo)ut your home? Is it a res1 home? Ta it something more than a house with a yard or a farta around it? 19 it .omething more than a pceto eat and te sleep and to shelter youP Ilait a place wherethc united ùaely cao gather together and b. happy? Has it somethinx that will bring no lto the life cf father, mother, grandparenta or childreo? Rau it something hat will make your frienda ezjoy viiting you? That is happineas. That kind of a home ta a happy home. Such a ife la the ooly ite worth while. And an ything that wil brlng you such a life la a senUaiy. It means as luch te yon as« food and clothing. Money cannot measure its value. 80e ,haS Ld.u.. dù.s dmkrola oas dofi our oine for happinesa that tic würld has ever kuowo. As long as history bas becs written, music bas been maon's inspiration. It la the mother'a lullaby, the warrior's cry, the lover's song-who, indeed, doe mot find the expression of ali his mooda an;d emotions in music? And now Mr. Edisou's genius bas put real muaic within your reach. Yeu cau make it part of your lifé. Rwead Our Ofr Just read on the opposite Page how easy it is for you to get the New Edison Amberola into your home. new bonorap . 1L te-coupn on-teIoppo icepgua r fi Consider how important-how invaluable-go music is to your life. Theni read our offer. How ridiculously amail l the expense of making muaic put of your home! Find out toc, about Mr. E\u0026dison's wooderful with anything leus than Mr. Edison'a great, oew instrument. F, KL BabsoitEdisn Phonograph DistributomS 355 Portage Ave., '' Winipeg, Mlan 9\" ,' 51C 32D IbX4I~ s My Mit Shf i] Hoti IN",
         "THE WESTERN HOME MONTHLY Red heCopo Blo !An astonishing offer-mthe. Rea fle oupn New Edlison Diamond àAmberoa Mr. disn's rea ne phoogrph ith the Diamond Stylus re]producer, and 12br d new Bue roi Indestructible 4-MinuteReod snttyo on bolelfe ra Sen nomony--uRtfill out the coupon below and send it to us at once Wtwi eyo the big lOte outfit immediately. No C. O. D. Entertain your fami1Y and friends wth the 1aes sng his Ofthbgctes Laugh ut the side-spitting minstrel shows. Hear anything from Grand Opera to Comic Vaudeville Jude fr yurslf usthowmuc Itl gret Phonograph would m to your home. Decide if you Sna pe- along with@ut iLt After the trialin your owf home,9 make up your md. fyodedeottkopt.ouit,.d tb ensaWrwN Only11 Alter SdNOMOl If you wish to keep Mr. Edison s R *Uperb new instrument after the fre u t t eh T14a trial, Sena us nly 01.0o. Pay the balance of $7.80 for the =oipete outfitl ines57 paymiCfts Coi\u003e nSc yowWef Onrt. Get the New EdimnD.in me' Of antr 6.0 or $lmnh u 5.» for the lti MOnth, total STiJO Reinembertlime 15 layu oeo retil Swa a «wo.oef'I.tumba b- arev tlue brimE tbie ounie esb ed aMgU5U a lvr. tei. s.tuS thS blad ne. Blue Ainhero Indlestructible \"\"iue record arc ànld iritil thie outil otb 1«M Deloies the jokS o et hm fnwa ysdVIéUt5 ai IEh Think of lt-a $1.00 psyaient, sand a few dollars a month to get this outfit of if they vers tmers Îus 4. Ose for yoursif hm et rn.iwe Mr.Edieosne pbuogap vih te iod Slus repoducd, the IÎf. K\u003e'.maood Ambroia ln yor 1f. Sms 1ev muc aiio tb un\"Mba~ Mr. disn'snewphongrah wth he Damo a \" snd t in. 0f cours. vs deo tle m âUtB likemusc-te saie ineAmberel Records-SUl the musical resaite of the~ i ont th e o ieaIU ligetpiee tt.a b l tm tb nl that yent Iiibetpice otis.T=eef test thatmoleYcSl boy atvery mmcli ieuhh'n lthe a trailmItens price atwviicli imitations of the GenuiDe New Edison DialiiOulmbe we Ofee VYt. noe as ukdr fa fotots te ko anOuiflot uatlsfa toltI l layuWat fbt su After years cf labor on bis favorite Invenio, Mr. Edison bas made the music e., copeau wha am~.L nuire tbis rock-bottofli offer-why yin sbouldVlic sitisfied vltb any'tblng A~iU enm thanà Mr. Eimsii genuifle instrunift. You are under Do obligationl os tais rs trial Fe IL BAuMvI, ofe.Hear the. Newo Edlmm Daamond Aberola ûb pour oies A~m bel ors Pm dec1de.U..0M.8 Àmmleb e. 3 UUUUUUUUUUUUne 0 11816111 te MWy la Mig Ibi moeu;, Me l \" ------otaWUs F. IL AMSN Dept M5 POrtai. A\u0026VeaIi WIM*W\u0026e\u003c llabate D«rur.Babwn-.~~~~~~ ~ ~ ~ ~~~ lueyrfeuoldieoerrEionscdrunt InMy home os free trial. If I iee to kms tas e0tât, I viii have tas privi o* f the rock-bOttom price or 872.5 direct front y-ou on speclal termes. 1 meri agce to take th. otutprompt Y yro the us\" e ixffn If 1 do m A\" Ilu satiit m c o rya i rem rv t, 1ig rel r tervleeo tthaeo nerigyh tt e p fl . O b e v if . v iith ed tim i u t a y e n t o f 81.on ce a i fo ty 4 g h b o rm ftJ li frb ct issaa mm*lan cs exceeding one week, and wii make monthiY Paymefti thereafter or 8.o0 for il IoDIIs andi 05J0 for lie Itth m ntas. Total #ni\u002686 Tihe ouW at o a.vu * litpsyct babeenmm\"c. (Tis offer i Dot on banyofe under Si years oftage. If you are under 2i asIc yeur rallier, motteror guardia te gU un mmi aig taicoupo My = e . .. . . .......«........... ........... .. . .......Address or R.F. D. No. . .. s . S m y .~ -~ - . - -- - - s . ... .. .......... . ... ....... .... ..... .. . . .. . . ... . . ... . -. . Married o r S i n g I e . . . - - -t a a y p l se e t te . s Ho v long a resid nt in your neighbor hoo and your ?iint P ..I.t ee a - - - - -yofc an D ......a...... .ur.....the........a....b... .i......y.U........................... .................................",
         "THE WESTERN- HOME' MONTHLY 'o id lthladi eadem bave beau iraiued. là. ufolm\"ais thcharmat e# Mmi, ça ti Rot m ieeMitm a rote \"L'Allegro\" lpe incidents: 8 nd«0-lu int.el\" i.churéh ai Horten Jburied. ftorn there we wenite = = I, 116e Pasthemoon f Graysu I avaltilsm oro t pceef, wbat Ch.Withn sight of the 8toke Pg am te .\"%wpI. pathes\"l ny Ife au I look back ocuit? eh\"rcà sthe fsr I manno .Penns, vhere the fotrnder . Pnuylana asu b.A ride of a few Usomsudtlihe ari Louer mles teck me te Chiafort St. Giles, uhere Milton, Oas f b.gmt ocksbaiI mdlu.m bovood 4\"4flnisbed \"\"Pa Isa bt.\" The ctt ina Cbgofte «4.boh tst1 rdin Mppse I\u0026 wicn bels uliving at the Urne sMMlstands. That :lreagreeent ita in thi eatsnovel ev!enin luthe rain I rode alone te Gmet Marlowe, #*Mr, - wouhhere Percy Byme he fleey lived fer a Urne. M JW he mmcame viien I vlsi Salex, tb. old agu'o M mseste toma vhere Hawthorne urote ibis Mmoa . eCauor Heiue sMM stands viiere Haw- I vas lu Cagr the other day. From My wludow gi*. wuemWyedwheu hie produced ibis gmet iluhbatiu Pallier Hotel I couldumethe ice sud -c-O. ray sIt se tereb. sovc Rcki. Lookmng ai them I could not pa Wç bth la uad, Of course, the bleak rocky h81n fintaiinpe cf the Alp, otfrcm the W\" tm bIhe b.witüh.. vere executed lu 1692. Mien F\u0026,cf. the aiSbt\u0026 ase.HoShi evening es1te iaii icg about the place usatbe ainosphere of puaimut lu My memforyl I could bardly persuade *!iotmobmmWoeu f which \"Thie Scarlet Letter\" M soe iYSf -ba\"t\u0026u m t banka cf white vere really pgrefu a eprein. \"Tii. Ourlet Latter\" in a ucri mountala. 1They l=kedlike grea oud wracks. u~ocouterpart cf tb. \"Paradise Lost\" ocM- 1n Iremember that my lteresi vas ail»fumier wbetted 1w th 1wâ 11at4m thJohn Rnrn ailfirat sSnthe Concord Shortly ,mter rny firsi visit te Maien, wbich I have mmuc smm several Urnes, I made my way te Concord, Mausahustta. Coucord bas probably more literary intereut than any other towu of its aise lu America. With it are amociated memrones of Hawthorne, Thoreau sud Emerson. Emeruon'as'on silil lives there. As one entera the town frern Boston oeemmses \"Te Wayside\" vhM .fHaviborue was living ai the Urne of bi» death. HM. de\u0026*hactually occurred away lu the North, lu New r% Y*4fI amrnont mistaken. A litile farther outê,srrtbh centre of the towu stands the home of Emmoei, a endort\"bl looklng wbite woeden bouse. Othovalcfthe. library is a picture of Tho-a Carlyi the fhd u ontem ary of Emerson. In the utêryiConcard-1= -or te fluet Urne the corrsouec of the qgmt American sud the great Soci. Erneraon's rnd vent almost completely, towd the baut Concord stilil uurbers quite a few peple who rernember him iutimately. Away at the ctir end of thevilage stands the old manse, where Hâwtborne wre Mue from an Old Manse.\" Eýocc*ed ibis boueseimmediately mter bismarae It l wihina atone'. ibrow of the battle-fleld where t he British regulars met the minute-men a little later than the engagement at leingten. On the base cf a statue of a minute-ma neemrade EmersoW'.fiues ending: Il'Tvas bere the embattled farmerssateod, sud flred the. shot heord round the world.\" One may sil see the. spot wbere stood the shack or sbanty lu wbicb Thoreau lived, ai infinitealmal expense, near the aboe of Waldeu Pond. Tboreau's ivo znost famous workS are \"'Walden, or Ife lu the Woods \" sud l\"The Week,\" a narrative of a week spent by the author on the Concord sud Merrimac Rivera. Perhapa the moat interesting spot lu Concord las leeey Hollow, the cSpetery where ail three men are buried. The grave of Emrsn la msrked by a huge granite boulder. AÀFMti Aternoon ln England One cf my halcyou memonies in the fluet afternoon I speut lu E d. On a lovely June afternoon lu 1898 My wlfe an\",ccled from iàv l te Chester. This was my fluet g *pue cf rural England. We passed mauy noble homes cf the Eugliah qentry, which made me tbink of a stansa lu Tennyson a \"Palace cf Art\": ««And oue, an Eugllsh home-gray twiigit poured On dey pastures, dewtee . Softer than aleep,-.aIl tig ~ order atored, A haunt cf ancient Peace.\" That evening, lu the golden light, we walked about the walla cf Chester, saw the charming river Dee, made beautiful by the ruina of an ancient mil sud by swans, wbich I then saw for the flm t Ure. Hawarden Tue next Mo .no we wheeled te Hawarden. Glad- atone had just dil We viited tbe village ciurch, whers he bad been .0 faithful an attendant. Iu the churchyard we saw the grave cf bis elde4t son, father te the present owner cf the estate. For the fir* time I realised bers the wonderful charm cf English churcli- yards. 1 could understaud why Gladstone wanted te be buried there, ratier than even lu Westminster Abbey.; As we wheeled through the grounds wc met Stepien.Gladstene, then Rector cf Hawarden. I had seen a picture cf bxm playing a game cf chess witi bis great father. We opeut the whtole afternoon lu the ruulued castie that looks down on Gladstone'a home. That castle takes eue back te the time when tie Wclsh border was a stormy sud turbulent territory. A Great Afternoon On. eue single afternoon we had all these great experieucea. Starting from the Royal City of Windsor wre saw fluet Runnymede, where the Barons wrung from John the Mlagna Charta, the foundation of British liberty. Then we passed through Eton, wliere x1pfror at proint. 90The 1\". of Lucarne Borne of the fairest dayi of my lifeI apenit on the shores of the Lake of Lucerne. In the hittle 0 5of thatnameI rad to - l te mS be I know. One waa Renan'. Vie de Jesurie other wusRodmadCyrano dé Bergeac. Much of thelfe of Jésus wuassuciated with the Lake of Galilee, sud it was a gret privilege te read Renan'a lovely pages looklng dowu from a beautiful garden on the waters of the Swis lake. Above me ns I read tewered Mount Pilatus, lu the waters of a lake on the aummit of wbich legeud bas it that Pilate vainly strove te wash bis bloodataiued bauds. One of the cbief attractions of the Lake of Lucerue te me was the memory of Schillers \"Wilhelm Teil.\" No book that I have ever read embodies more completely the fine old Germany that the modern militarias have apparently destroyed. In the Rutli meadow, on the other aide of the lake from the city of Lucerne, one finds three prlnga re- puted te have spruug from the spot where Te leaders of the Forest Cantons teok the oath to tbrow off the yoke of hated Austria. It was at Altdorf, at the other end of the lake, tbat Tell la reputed te have ahot the arrow ou bis son's head. I re-read Scbillers noble drama, sitting at the door of the old monastery at Altdorf. Marvellous how Schiller, who neyer visited Switzerland, cauht the acenery sud spirit of the place. Thereafter my wife sud I walked over the St. Gotthard Pasa from Goechenen on the Swiss aide te Ticino on the Italian. Golden days, thoee, etched forever on my memory. st. Malo I visited St. Malo as one of the sbrines of our Can- adian nationality. Thenoe Jacques Cartier set sait in 1534 for the mouth of the lSt. Lawrence. What intrepidity there waa lu those old navigatersansd discoverers. Champlain was a noble example of this type. Canada bas some flue statues of this Christian coloniser. There la a fine one at St. Johns, New Brunswick. There la a splendid hopefulnessansd eu\" l the flgtre. There la another on the terraoe at rUuebec. Stili another lu the park between the Cbateau Laurier sud the river at Ottawa. These statues are like so mauy ateps lu a gallant progress. But to revert te St. Malo. Two memories crowded on me there-those of Cartier sud of Chateaubriand. The great Catholie writer lies buried under a alab of ganit on the rocky llet of Grand Bay. I liugered al afternoon by the grave of Chateaubriand, from which I withdrew only as the advsucing tide drove me perforce as the night came on. As I did so I thouglit of Tennyson's words: \"The deep moas s sound with many voies.\" A Ride Tbrough Lombarcly One breathiess moruing we spent lu the refectory of the old monastery at Milan, on one of the walls of which la painted Michael Angelo's \"Last Supper.\" 1 had neyer before realised the difference betweeu a masterpiece by a gret artist sud modern copies of the samne. The room is crowded by copies, each missing somethîng of the glory of the original. 1 shah neyer forget our ride across the Plain of Lombardy fromi Milan ,te Venice. The places that won my attention chiefly were Brescia, the, blrthplace of Arnold of Brescia, and Padua sud Verona which I linkied with Shakcespeare's \"Mendiant of Venice.\" And then think of the witchery of Venice! The streets of water, the swaying, graceful gondolas, tie Rialto, the palaces cf the Grand Canal, the square of'St. Mark's witi the Doge's Palace, the Cathedral sud the Camipanite. Three yeurs later, 1 think it wvas, I was in Peachland, B3ritish Cohîmibia, when I rend of the fall of the Cami- panite. 1 feit, as so niany others did, that 1 was personally bereavcd. The iterary nmemioricýs that crowded on mee most at V'enice were those of Shakes- peare'ya great tragi-comedy, Byron'a \"Childe Harold'a Pligrmage,\" Brownings ta=ia poonu send Rusldn's \"Stones of Venioe.\"1 I think I ahulcL add Shelley's \"Julian aud Maddalo.\" J. Fenulmore Coopea \"Bravo\" was a good deal in my mind, too. There was no city that Ruskin loved so much as Vemce, unlesa it was Florence. I neyer realiaed the spirit of the fidl ge ntil I read the tbree vciumes of \"h Stones of enice.\" Browning \u003cied in Venice in the Palais. Reszonico, one of the noble palaces on the Grand Canal. The Grand Canal mus imply the main atreet of Venice, sud the Rialto in a bridge apanuing it, in fact the only bridge so fer asIremember. It was once I tbink llned with shope like theoe clebrated Goldsith's ]ridge at Floreuce. The fluest single g icture I have seen is the \"Aossuption of the Virgmn bTitian.- It lasplqýendidly hung lu the Academy of Ue Fine Arts at Vemie. Toward Canterbury Inl 1904 1 rode over the route foflowed by Chaucer'. Pilgrims from the site of the Tabard Inn in Southwark te Canterbury. The ecclesiastical bistory of Canter- bury stretches back te 5971 the date of the landing of Augustine, the firet Christian mu*miouary te Englad. The Anglos and the Saxonabad lauded onthe Ialand of Britain the century before-te be exact lu 449. Those two, by the way, are dates that I learued very early. It seems te me that the practice of mnakmng children learn dates has gone teo completely out of use. Tennyson saya:. \"For manners are not idle.\" Neither la learning t he dates of leading events 'idie' that la inisignificant. But te corne back te my ;rrnoe Tý Canterbury wbat a beautiful ride that was lu the June sunsblue-tlru h Chatham, Rochester with ita sturdy Norman Keep, tbrough the Kentishho edste the relilous capital of England. The murer of Thomas a Becket in 1170 was another event the date of which neyer slipped from my memoryater I first Iearned it in Colliers histry.I the f u of time the tomb of Becket became one of the famous abuines of Christen- dom. Thither pilgrim wended their way lu vast numbers. This opportunity Chaucer seized. ne gthers lu the Tabard Inn a motley throng of pdria in oe tikHobaginwt te. will ride with them next day te Canterbury. lu fact he will be their marshal. Each member of the compauy muet tell two ateries gomng and two atonies coming; and the company will decide when al la over which tale takes, the palm. Then in bis memorable Prologue, one of th frt glories of our great E nga literature, Chaucer describes ail the members of tle party. Incidentally we get an imperiabable picture of l4th cetr1 xne:d I wau introduced te this claasic by a fine old profesr , happily stiil living. I saal neyer forget his readrng of the Lies : \"ýA Knight there was, sud that a worthy man, That, fro the Urne that he first began To ryden out, be loved cbivalry, Truth sud honour, freedom sud courtesy.\" How the paat la linked with the present 1 As I sallied out of London in the path of the pilgrims, I passed the gates of Chistehurat where then lived, sud I think atml lives, the Empresa Eugenie, widow of the ill-fated Napoleon III. What a strange frouy if she is still alive to witness the capitulation of the children of the men who broke ber husbaud so rutblessly. ]Brttn One ot the \"«purpie patches\"l of my life la a bicycle ride through Brittany. lu Brittany the four places that impressed me most were Auray, the abrine of Ste. Anne* Carnac with ita baunting monolithe; Paimpol, tLie scene of Pierre Loti's \"Iceland Fisher- man\"; and Treguier, the birth-plaoe of Renan. I was at Auray for the great festival held yearly lu honor of Saint Anne, the patroness of the Bretons. I abal neyer forget my walk lu the dewy mornlng from Auray proper te Sainte-Anne d'Auray. Axriving at the litt e own, I breakfasted with an attractive com- pany of nuns and pniests sud peasants lu the little inn. 1 remember the bowl-like cupa from wbich we ail drsuk delicious coffee. The desolate moor of Carnac with its long, sweepiug avenues of lovely atenes, eaves an indelile impression. One feels oneseif there lu the presence of an immemorial antiquity. At Paimpol I visited the cottage in which Yaun lived, sud chatted with thepest mother of Uotile ahy sud taciturn hero. I slptoe night at Treqier where Renan was born. Renan's life of Jeans and bis life of St. Paul are written with mnfinite charm. Renan makes Paul lbye before one's eyes. The reader of the letters of the Great Apostie to the Gentiles la struck with the spirited passages that rise, often a little incongruously from the body of the text. Renan has a plausible explanation of this, if I remember rightly. Saint Paul cmployed an amanuensis or secretary te write for hlm. As lie read over the copy he would ever sud anon comment on the original text. These commente are often the rhapsodic passages to which I have ailuded, and w hieh frequently have the air of not being logically incorporated in the tissue of the letter. Whether this 15 correct or flot, at any rate it la interesting and suggestive. i 82F",
         "THE WESTERN HOME MONTHLY RECONSTRUCTION DUTIES OF THE CANADIAN' RED CROSS Care of Canadians, Prisoners of War on German soil during the period of demobiliza- tion, transport, homecoming and repatriation to Canada. Care of sick and wounded Canadian sol- diers in Field Hospitals, Base Hospitas, Convalescent Homes and Specialized Nos- pitals in England and France as long as any such remain. Care of sick and wounded Canadian sol- diers on transport to Canada and in Hos- ptals and Convalescent Homes i Canada. maintenance of complete Red Cross estab- lishment i Siberia under the direction Of Lieut.-Col. J. S. Dennis, recently appomted Red Cross Cominissioner with Uic Siberman Contingent. maintenance et complets Red Cross estab- lishmrent with the Canadian army of occu- pation iEurope for as long a time as any Canadian forces remain i Europe. Care, personal service, and comfort for Canadian forces during demobilisation and return of officers and men from France and England to Canada. Demobilisation of Red Cross active service establishment i England and France and the return te civilian hf e et Canadian Red Cross workers overseas. RELIEF FOR THE DESTITUTE SUFFERERS OF WAR HE REFUC Gaunt, hungry, d that come from whe brother, gone; sons, -- child at her breast co ing in the features o What is it that keep. her plodding footsteps heap she once called F And she is not or is left of King Alb\u003c Department of the Montenegro, and of A. We have saved the soul of civilization ---we must now protect the body from the blight of Anarchy. The Star of Hope in all this desolate land is the crimson sign of the Motherhood of Christ,---our Red Cross. If you ever felt the sacredness of your humble part in the great organized mission of the Red Cross,---hold it:now and carry it high, for Red Cross needs you now and for many months to come. Remember your Red Cross Pledge and keep it paid. MANITOBA RED CROSS Provincial Headquarters Winnipeg Kennedy Building",
         "THE WVETERN HOME MONTHLY nmu i-ine-imuwwm-rh mu The Obligaton of Chbltmua The vorld may ro on wih iis vers and vicloedness and misery, and kingdoens \"Ay go and governmesla 1imay 0o16 but vhataver os may betide, se long as th.reàa ôhistaa the blessd houa.hold festival, and se long as the spirit cf Christmas, th ratam -7rarywlich commomoratos ecn lco Ch1,rislaty, is in 1h. vcrld, sot oves the most an diesd Pesuimiat cas say that 1hiA life lanol ort -living. Il la lbe cbildren'a festval, and il speake te evéry heart of the birth of the Divine Chin the stable cf Behlhem. To enter inte the spirit of the Christmnas festival va muet caler into th. spirit of chldhood. Those vho are privilegsd te lake part ina aChristinascelebratien vitb oblidres are th. tortunâte oses. There are se masy men and vomien vho have no cbildren, For \u0026H auch lenely oses, for ai vho bear a burden ot bereavement and deprivation and vhose days are ahadowed with .serrow, for a with vhom the venld bas gene bardly, those cf us vhose lot ban been more fortunate and teSvhom life bas broughit happiness must do wbat we cas te make Christmas a day tbat speaka of humas oomradesbip. Thlàis lana obligation vbich resta upon every one vho bus it in bis pover-and who cf us lias no?-to do smtigte brigscone brightness aI Christmas inte seme ibadovedlonely 111e..WiIb Ibat obligation nol livod up te, ne ese's Christmas cas b. a truly )appy one. Chrilmasand Ohildrmn Those vho have ne children about thern te make Christmas joyous cail up memories cf their own cbild- hood. a ,a lýoneIly mas and veinas lsd. a littie comlrl nthikinof dreain children, and of what inight have boss, il hbad gone diffrestly, and envies the father againot whose ksee a littie head resta wearily in th dusk of' Christmas Day, witb tb. utter trust ef cildheed, and envies the mother who feela the seft, tired, lithoe body anuggling up againat lber bresat. Tre xýare many cbildlesa mes and women ithe world; but bas there ever bees a Christmas before 'these recent yeara of world war wbich dawned upon so many orpbaned cildren as Ihere are in the world to-day? These are thouhte which muet corne j everyone wbo has a feeling beart. And by lettmng tlim prompt, us into kindly acOnM that vili hallp in nakfl Cbxataa uamtbin mer lik v t ilshould be f éhdre, w éba bemalin t amore è= motof rdI ue tdm that emt vo become as littlebldree eansot cater the spirit of the Christ- mas festival. One plain Leon10n o»ankind one thaught vhich th. coming cf ttis year's Christ- mas brings te itoknid i httersr 10 force, thal is 10 sa, w ithout righl.ouases behind il as 1h.ipgpoe r, yl alwaya bereufter be foredoomed tofiur.W inlaanothervway cf thlthe wrvhichhmbas rought auch carnag and Zvastation in lhe putl four yearu and moreyl be th. laitof, such cutbreaka of savagelr.yin 1he vorld. The mind and conscience cf humamity have been arouad as 1h. y vere nover aroused by amy pevous wouurno fe fr ashlumnan vlslom and frih cma acieve thal purpoas, againat any future attoîspls to violtI. hum. 8ui-m cnaton e\"eramn vil' delude ilseif with 1h. Iéba t megt àre The lem of Ibis w a a been burned into the mmr of mankrind; and as long as human memoryenus il vii h. remsmbered that reliance upon the doctrine thal might is right and th. other doctrines of kultur mut nd in db\u0026aSt. If it did not, there would be ne meanig in civilisation. Th orealmot actor In the War Ever sine the firaI horoie resiétance by the Beian rieoi Liege ote .advancing hordes cf spike- invaers, cnd the n0e-ob-ogte dovotien cf4«1h. oconlemptible little army» froin Gret Bdilan d of the French regimienla vbicb threv themielves Bo sel-sacrficnglagainst Ibe German advance te save 1h. precous tours and das se terribly needed by the Allies innumerable are . instance in the wr hich have proved beyond any posaibi#ity of qpestion or doubt that the spiritual valor of mankind domn bath. for the cause of righl.ousness and justice is mihirIi rt orce.Aasad aga thers have bs heroic rallies s tna he enormous Masses cf Gra brute force ad the Germans bave been beaten back. Wodruwere the pre- parations cf the Germans. Neyer before in ail history had there bees se many new and terrible methods of destroyngr life put into operation as the Germans used ;nith uller ruthiessnesai on land and on sea. Amasig vowre their uses of the application of science te those methode of ruthicssess. But with it al they laced 1h. vital facter of spiritual vaIorinspired by righleouaness and justice, whioh made il possible for 1h Allies te make good the lorever famous vords which tht spiritual vaIor *nsired, Manahal Joffre to- ulter: I\"Tbey shail net Passi' Doclors asd Nurses The recent visitation of the influenza epidemic, wbich causied such videspread suffering and se many deatha, bas given thousands cause anew for gratitude te tvo classes vhose devoted fai1hfulness te duty is go often lruly hergic, namely docters and nurses. Not mas y of us are there vho have sot aI seme timne had ourSlvîs in the keepin4g of a docter, or a nurse; siii lever cf us are there who have sol knows vhaî il is te h. avare thttheb. 11.oe a beloved ose bangs i the balance, and that for al Ibat humas aid cas do te save that precicus life, a doctor and a nurse muet h. looked te. Some of us, il may b., have known what il la te lie helpless in a b.d of pais abeolutely dependent os the ministrations of docter and nurse, and aller resteration te health have neglected te manidest the gratitude due for those ministrations. There saa odi. poemn about a sick mas who aller singi near tinte dcalb, recovered asd was both lorgetfulof what h. had been tbrougL, asd ungraleful as wel- \"ýGod vas foriot, asd the docter ligbted.\" Docters and nurses see us with our disguises remeoved; lbey see us helpiess as little cbildren. That muat b. why tbey are, as a rule, se kindly i character therosselves, and se charitable in judging others. , Women iParliament The progresasof the British nation through the centuries bas bees accuralely registered by the evolu- lion of the British Parliament. Asother slep forward bas now been recorded by the passing Of as act by the House of Gommons te entitle women te become mem- bers of Ibat Houe-wbich la, of course, lb. logical consequence of womas suffrage. The lime la past when the Houa. of Lords uaed te have the power te block legisiation pssed by lb. Commons. Indeed, Lord Robert Cecilbas' taken occasion te expIais that the Government had considered lb. question of legllation entitling women te ait in the Houa. of Lords, but tbat there were sorne difficulties tb h. got ever in that connection. Il la te b. noted that in tbe Houa. of Lords there was only a amail mninority againist woman suffrage. Iificonnectian uith 1h. lIio entâtbng vomen 10eo memDOU I .Ouse of Gomma.. ài i.no:=.orth t t taMonthsa go th. Iav officeru of th.eHOusdeelded that vomen wee ingible, as the Iav stood. But, et, course, ParliamSt can alter any lav. Parliament ,malione of th. chiai jusies -f England, cas do anything except make a mma wTx ý. o a man-ait ham the supreme poer m e d\" steni of democratic, resppnsible govemen. .It s cnq mater of lime until theze are women in our Parh I.nt Already there are two women in the Aiberla'Lguture, and one in the Legisialure of British Columbia. The Nememi iof aachi \u0026Wprou Germany wiii furnish forever in history the outý. standing example of 1he resuits of the absence fromn a country of froedomn of 1he Preo. For more Ihan balf acentury th. au= tc military7 state syalem cof Germany laid ils ironhn upon ail newspapers and othe pubicain Germany, and ailowed 1hem te pril oly haliljudged s\"iable. This vas one of 1h a inod by which the German people Were reduced 10 a state of submnissive mncapacily in reWd to citisenship. Thus the Germaii systemx of pin education, so remarkable in some respects, vas uMd in thal the Germans vere not free mca, citisens of a selt.governing ste, but mer herds of humasi catlle mngdlike the caIlle on a ranch by their rul\"r. Deae aller decade 1he Germaena\"ae syatem became more and more rigidly a military autocracy; décade afler decade 1he Germen masses became more and more incapable of demomrtic sef-government. Fr..- dom of the prous is one of the fundamental essentials te \"1government by the people, of 1he People, and for the people.\"y Nov ary espeats IlmoIf Justsas the Germas Emperor attempted in 1h. second decade of the twentieth ceslury toipose Hohenzollern domination upon the world, se ais liad Louis XIV, of France, styled the Grand Monarch, allempled in the lest 'quarter of th. seventeenth cenlury to impos Bourn domination upon 1he world. There is, imdeed, a strikmng historical parallel belveen the ver which began by 1h. Germas rush upon Belgium in 1914 and 1h e r in wbich the Grand Monarch sel France against praticâaflal the rut of Europe in 1689. Like 1h.eKaser'K-g.Luispro claimed loudly thé flaehood that hie vas gting because hie had to, iseif-defence. iàke the Kisr too, he begas lby a audden and overwhelming Invasion Of fBliu.I each case il was the oldf fable of th. voIl and the lamb translaled imb zilitarya mion and attempted conqucat. Like the Kaiser, Louis haed th. advantage of the Allies who joined their forces againat him, i thatlihe had th. superiority in military preparation; hie won masy victeries over them, but 1k. the Kaiser, hee bad te sue in 1693 for an armistice and suggest th. discussion of peace terme. And the attitude of 1h. Allies in 1693 in regard te the armistice proposai and the pcac. offensve wasth same as tue attitude of th. Allies of 1914 towards like roposels when they einanated froin Berlin. TheBriishseapower vas an ail important factor, againal the Grand Monarch, whose coasts il blockaded. It vas th. compulsion of slarvation that finaïll made humi surrender, and brought to a disastrous e tin he Bourbon attempt te achieve world mastery by wbat hie counted confidently upon as bis superior military might. The Rfi.cof a Notariaus Faily Incredibly absurd as il may appear, il is nevertheless a fact thal in Germasyi the peut twenly-five years not only have mes been sent te prison for th. crime of* lese-majeste, or majestatab.leîigun, as il is i Germn (Iat i, scakig dires Ictily of 1h. Empeorbut mshavealuiy en priee o phbmgr, uth about bisancetrs og ed Hohensoilerns who lived centuries ao On a bg bll i1h. kingdomn of .utmbr, one of the coin- posent parts of the GrmsEmpiewbich Bismarck form.d and prophesied that the rosPnce of bis lime, who livdt ecme the Kaiser WilheIrn 11, would live te, destroy, there stands a caslle built by Ibat mas (whose naine vil l orever hold an evil plce in bistery as Ibat of 1h. maker of the w which bucaused carnage and devastatios usprecedented)' buill as a memorial b bhis ancesters. The truth about Ibose ascesters of bis, lh. Hohenzollerns, la tht they held sorne lasd and a amanl calle 6n that bll, and maislained a band of freebolers who made it their praclice te, sel upos and rob travellers and pilgrims passing along 1h e bigh road te Ilaly, who did not pay thein blackail. From that beginning 1h. Hehen- zoliern got on in the world, tbrough treachery and grasp n, until they were able te, seize costrol of the petty Z3rman state of Brasdenburg, when lhcY assumfd Iheir first hereditary title. Such were the anoes \u003ers cf the mas wbo prated of bis divrine right to rule Germany and who soaked the so0il of Europe witb blood in the attempl tQ rea.lize bis dream Ofming hirnself ruler of the world. C*. miul volî âdis et h \u0026hîgh Sn, ro. S1-1?!! A LI Woh, 'Gyl .Poli TfTHE! Tbf. offer for X Te",
         "THE WESTERN -HOME.MONTHLY Copy . nv aklat1ion Mo0 the wm were iliamnt h. Chief make a supreine tl 1hee lhe out- Lee frora mre than stem Of )ers and them to 3 one of pie ~e ous of a an cattle rul\"r. becade décade ore and . Free- mentiala and for lonarch, 21teen1h paraflel an rush 3 Grand erest Of nvasion rab! of ed their ority i Be over 8 for ani Sterres. 1 tb the vus the bowards Berlin. ckaded. made ti1 he y what nililary rhelese e years 1t ishiml Df th. ned for dad- a high e oom- amack Sof his -lm il, uit by 0n evil ,which lented)- j about il they Hl, and t their ot pay Eohen- ry and of the they Se the ight. to e wîtb aaking 11W ompelue. i 8g Clun;t 3 i2$88a75 9/a nd u ee'mIm.... I fMI S.\u0026PNTYThe=Radiancap ha. Doen ad,, dby hundrd flhinexrt .1 ve h rld . Iteemai a i tmnb.macle. Y,ýe etumnitupsidedcown a\"d itl Wnlbure Juet as welI as ia an up- rigbt position. it caà bc upeet vithoul, a 1lngci. It oe net amoke and ham Do odor. It in the afesi and mot satis- faeiozy liht ever devimecl. TmE I IM IU.? i.n àme e4ual tenyobtainahi ll % re made aheZ . f. i neat sud aymmetrical. The shape in very artistie. The lanip f. attractive in eV\"r W\u0026y. BIRtmomy-The Radiant Lamp in jOui as simple sit i ale. Therela no iek to, boiher wiih, nor chimney te dlean. It une twe shadowlese, lnverted mrunle. of exe ngdurability. It genérates in 20 MO%\" and ne generating torch ta required. lh.o eneator fa remeovable withouit the aid Of tools, and withoni dis- turbing mther ebade or menties.. Né. I-mU-Sutahfe fr henging or Mt- u u neable-, .flise cps22 e f tl«M rit te. .%:lb..mplumre. will beaeil yur hoen.fülly 100 par cent; 1oh nat 1k.an eleceo ight am ta ei G.nsratSi.re . .. ...... .70 Mirror and il poliehed 1 Fzra large ,hPremiier -ich oven; qg SurfaSe; j end guai'ntesd tO hum les$.'fuel thon any other range .end Bakes to ParfootIen lYse it for 30 days, and if net atitsfk.d 3you ha-.e Savd at. IaSt M.000 and ha% e a range e\"\u003ci\"n]te wàalhp it baek to u.. and yOUr naoney will beimine- iateiê_refunded. Fer Nor'WestParnee'rend- ora during December we offer tlinarange-ai 810.0 hm t han cur Catalogue Prire. Buy. Now no. 0S----Coipleta a. ahowu. F.O0.B. You Can 4lun staýndooln Table the RaientMueI*pa.s. lit laithe cNi povezfltbeo L 1 m m im m nh . y.lh d Y' a h t88emdspvr lthe, I limes lime. a . \",teel k cetel . or \u0026bout )j re SWjhbi Il nred80u mPre, i uiaiU .qa salng of cil. enu iiuimud .. F ho et 4p Md op\"!at Ib Toeu bave 0 lumournenté. yurb1 *eit t the a~ I1M-u un.I~ omtain recorde; \"sliaJvoeOe Eilon5 f!istdmt. diri mal damnam kae ai sys .muy aocmWbe(sjbuma eMm)s. Top eau ...i be lowered scmd reasd, eneloosi etim cOra msling i one compact unit MaI gai injured or to pappeurane.\"' eOpSdI Sound waves do not pen through mrtal. Ton. crmin f fviola libre. This preveazte rapb4 metallie ring. Rom\" n aeted and you.u neway rewind or ebsag rrecords. On wlndlng ploya one lS4nch recontd, . two ton-Inh or three 84neh records., Every musical nota reprodueed w inUite fulimuad Mabe1gcny finish. The appearane in a urprnes. M in bp.autiful artistie sud dlnufled. The. daiesyed excellence of il. finiah. we believe yen wmiI cagrs0, rMM,\" fi the flneSi Ioolng little phonogmaph in tibm w. Simai1 and convrnin te h andle. Light enough to carry abouti the.houa\"; dIdu for yacht, te take to aumumer ottage, or in motor a *vearfl bergain, aMd iM v sMb o . hila %pin. * M I la lngoeliM) ........OP.0 Vtauig. ; - -. - t -w 33 ~Omut remu hvIl- alni voake. H- 1age- eatwth deep ýd le=excedinglycomfortable. The rMqî ado cof hard maple, kilu dried Vvria \u0026hîgh grade imitation leather.,It's a biul A LIMITEU NUMB3ER 0F Tant Wohd.rful Ftenownd ROYA L DOMESTIC Polished Top Range i ffTHESPECIAL PRICE$~tI fýor X881soppru Tbf. wonde p Rag. ih fulli tue Back M [alon. Folihed ang C.ost Door. Sl È ail ustoves cffered you t-day; ha lurge 20-ii rge ire ar brne aythng; arge ooki THE FARMERS' SUPPLY 'CO., LTD. W DNAVepLVL.H.T mwmý",
         "THE WESTERN HOME- MONTHLY Vi~hilO l. W~IiiRUenom tlly By mms A. T.HorIon ~~uite Iasi ,Ume, th l A oahi m mmd goduisu shning i L yw stnu o $9U p - k- aw voku spool- 0o cnlg.th kphatie I behnd I a con- ti i ould hg b' on-m loww*zbfulif Gertrudehbord very' ~i~~v:of .bein,tn eponi en- te dtha ilh.Y, nih ave* tw hii' kaV thnothat bad ben- o voryngh 0 mRîie .Ps\",ee -weuhd ork together fo.bel.s o' \" la,'sgcid? Ad et .d.' ,M ov ldil ermoter e nw pt\"etther, vbt a euJInt - Oh. ~ Ly, bo amlythings bad gone w~ith~onoo Mr. Norton, Ger- hW atbsd benobligedtOive up WX o um oeton nthelb. ty on accoint of The.occulist bad mmbut that tie badsgreva otudiy.-.oiS until nov b. could bardy susse IIl.- Theybaâd ben ébhged te give up..tbo~cfotabàa home, and-had corne dc\u003ewntP Pidâmmore, ameasie tovn, where t4ism6tiei'and ber tim .daugblers-bad kept h lbomýetope\"erby etting'lodgings. Tbteugh heb. uaier môlitha they -had mpad INil ebut now,tat inter ano~àcingkeviitera .bogn - an\u0026i Ibose wvlio.did finnuitier, ostly old limera 'nhe. ve.ahife itb -accustoxped Winhruater a and did net look eut for M novk, «n. Gertrude's vork i t lb.ouse vas.net qit. of. such a astrénueus nature as that of hén iaeta -and mether. She had mad il ber obief duty.to wait on ber-father, and by eadaing te bim, and vriting for hum ho lemen'hias trouble as fax as ah. poWmbly could. As th. result.of a family conclave and a serions nveahgatoninte Itheir vaysanmd men, it bad been decided Ibat tye of tbe girls muet gel moelbng t do during tbe vinber Mir he ledemt, vaat Ooshce as the one te atay witb ber fahe nd moîber and lb.two younger girlGertrude anc1 Mary, made up thoir mm nategel asee knd of work to do. \"lIt ims ahh very wçIl for yen, Mary,\" O.rtrude bad remarked as they at rounid.dicnssing the malter, \"witb your stenography and book-keepmg you cmn easly find a job, but whal' about me? Fra ne kood at anytbing exoept nursing andI've bad no proper lanu\"Mary bad' laughed reaasuringly, «Oh you vi find,,something easily onoug an old lady wbo wanta ber pug dg tlen eut for walka,- or omre invalid who vantsaa companon.\" But for'smre veeka Gertrude had tried in 'vain to'bear of any auch pot, or indeed of- ankyhing thal ah. could under- take atisfactorily. She bad answered adyertisementa, and advertiaed i» the ocal papers, and îbougb ah. hsd had everal interviewa vith unvalid ladies, ahe. had alvays corne avay disappointed. \"'You have not had sufficient experience,\" or \"you are net a certificatcd nurse\" had been smre of the objections raised, se that piarticular Sunday morning found ber in a despondent fraine of mind. Mar, as ah. had prophesied, had hiad nodxliculty in finding work, but Gertrude eemed doorned to disappoint ment. The opening worda of the sermon thafrnerning moade a deep impression on ber heart. If.ah, could feel the confident faith ex- pressed in the words of tbe text how il ioid sstinmd uplift ber during thi ta ime. OuMouday mornmmg Gertrude fel ieedby ucsug ase r te onea n aêrti.natafrorn an tavalid lad, màdlâ,\" ah. siida tbey wr idei âo bIter over the breakfaaý table,\" it nlyaitte loutrhbantme OdOVÈ 8h. net: eut footing quite bopefi 'orbaps 1h.e a\"h tlie vasove t bau 1evgla she wodbe tobe settied momethan d te b. able oehep aItt in the home-expenaes The walk did m emm long, and it vas vith a bopefi iearl Ibat ah. drew near te ber desti tion. It wms a large 6nae, evidentlYI oleo-wealth\u0026eople Gertrudo lbougl un be an th .She wuaabvn into »ettiy f nmni bed aitling roin d a Wa lng on acouich by the vindov bade hm geod afternoon.po AI firtal u.,vo aplendidly, and Gertrude beqan te fu coefident %1at ah. wouldreiyglti M'uthia lime. But alas foi bw'eheP 'Are yen7 a- good pianiat?\" tho lady asktag. Poom-Gertrtpde, ah. vaýs Ôli to onen thal ahô-vas neopanati- md i seinded w~bee a m yi be d kmteob ni ht. 8h. b- eri ber folm- m direotion of the ound\" paug e iiw '*lthm on unc j eimd eceu.-n avefteguide ber in ýàhe ie*t direction. It wus not ln Lt efo ah came upon a IveoifflDtO penalai~emqnefB rtiY shetécedfrn u ritrm nmre bu-d uenhnear bv \" 1 àtI esldd-fobWtalepm oing, and tbg lhhm*çbt et belp.\" \"-Wbta theb.mater?\" aaked* Gertrude- Mr «I Wu. iking on th. moorsIbi afternoon and prine.d MY foot.ýI bave al. hen m ever mic egt home, but -I arn Jàm aorne way frrnWe t hon t il don't lhink I cm get much further tot et Doî you know the way?\" aauked SRidgemore, but believe I muet have bot heMY way. Y$ Lt\"You are' ai long way frorn Ricigomore,\" a the lady repHied,' but neae rilb or tbree quartie of a mlile frm Wqembon.\" Mt \"Ilion 1 tbink,\"sMa dGertrude, \"Ibat ad you bad btter lot me help you home a0 Le ashan neyer find my way te Ridgemore im in this iten, and yQu cannotl poeabby med I was a Iodionsand iweary valk te i. both of thein. It vau eident te Gertrude ma mu Washing th( ByMadmBal Whon father viamed -the diiahs, W.i,' Oh! th. lop andinee es.b.madg Thon The kritchen floor vas covered o'er The,% With cake and bita of bread *-' Woul Ho viped il tb itthe disherolb The Ea He mopped itvwitbhte brooMI l CuleD Oh! sakes liv., you ougbtato meo 8h. The momm Utahl back room. Her i Thoen i.and Jim next took luxa lx vsin p the deif,, .. TbeV meemedto ho an endiesa lime Fincling the kitchen aboeli, Hon aveetheart kind of dxied tbom, H. toppod and rnoped around, I think there vere ly iss Bient China stndngrond. I Evwr Thai Whe \"Then I amx afrsid you vould not suitt me, Miss Norton, I amn orry te have I gvnyu the trouble of cailng\" and1 gertrude feit boràlf *dims dudrosec te leave vith a ore beart. Wsah. neyeri te have any success? She trudged-alongC the moor bier beart filed vith rebollious1 mand gloorny tbougbts. She was tired and bungry after bier vslk, and thal did1 net belp te make bier more cheerful. Then1 after a lime yesterday meming's sermon1 carne te bier mind; if tbal vere really lrue tben Ibis disappointîment must bho one of tb, \"ail things.\" Did ah. believe1 il? If m, it vas vrong te feel me dis-i couragèd and disbeartened, she vould1 trust snd net ho afraid.1 The interview bsd been a long one, and9 nov the. short utumn day vas losing ta, and by the look. of lb. sky a terin m..m.d near. Gertrude began te burry,i lbe moor vas net a nice spot ini vbicb te ho caugbt ini a slorm, as there vas ne sheller of any sort, and Ibere vere stil nesrly tbree miles in front of bier. Tbe vund vas facing bier and groving bigher sud bigher mïaking every step a toil, sud nov down came the rain bleing in blinding sheets agaunst lier face. On ah. struggled, oping evry moment te reach the turnung vbich would take bier te Ridgeo. Surcly she sbould bave reachM il by nov.. She gazed round in tb. fast growing darkness,. Could t ho possible thal sbe had mistaken the way in the sterrn and ain? As she paused she tbougbt ah, heard a faint cali, or was it th, rnoaning of the wind? No, tbere il vas again, a vernan's veice she felt sure, Then1 A dixt eDishes mUMOM ka-Tulbey Mary Ann, the hined girl hook a crack aI lbem, ray ah. apldandd crashed about Id give you. just a pain- cap and greman d cabbage-smell io ice with ber aI al wipd,abhinod, taced thei p iighapeed bathe. .ai! P Sunday nigbl cornes motber'a tunn, tlbe an4 ao90neaI, er th. dushes nover look 0f girlhood daym o far, - Wben ah. and dad vere mrnied And boughl their kitchen vare. plcsat the table stn iagepty Dow, ehaeamng aad songB to ber ins gone to the war; îcup and plate sheoftly wipes à heart sad, Bick and sore- my -oldier of the dishpan, my vry oatgoo w\"ses, L e may find smre recompense en washing up the diabes. thal the lady vas in much pain tboughi abo lnied tema mke lb. beat of il and managed to bobble slovly along leaning on Gertrude's ami. Forhunmlely the wind vas at their bscks, anid at lasItbey couhd aee lbe lights of Weslon twinkling hhrough the ain. \"My narne i. Mrs. Vernnam,\" aaid the lady as tbey entered the lown, \"I liv. near the sea front se v. have not far te go nov.\" 1 A -fev minutes- later, their vet thungs, laid aside, tbey vere s.ated over a. blszing fire and. forgetting the discomfomhs of a ahort lime. before. Gertrude - hd tebe- phoned 10 let ber mother know Ihat ah. vas a., and that Mrs. Vernham insisled on ke.pung ber for th. night. \" 1You cannot poasibly go roarning about the moor again to-night i thIis atorm n\" ah. declaxed, \"se you vi»l have te, make up yo r r id 10 sty snd eeer up m y lon:eles. Gertrude vas only tee glad tý accept ber hospilality. She bsd bsthed the injured foot and bandaged il up se neatly Ihal Mrs. Vernham had5 laughingly-asked ber if she were a professional nurse. \"\u003cI only wis h I were,\" sighed polr Gertrude,, the question bringing back te ber mind ber troubles of the aftennoon And then it seemed quit. natural for ber to b. sitting there teâing her nev friend of al bçr recent disappoinîrnents and vorries. \"Wby I do believe the storrn bas blown yeu te me on purpose \" ssid Mis. Vern- b ain, \"You are just le one I vant for 1our little Mollie.\" Tho it wm.Gutmide'. turu b hlen, and Mm. Voniam tld but how hen littis Mollis had met w1th Ma ccident and bon 1g mm ad bwthiedoctor .had odedhmn te thé s=aLidetre . intd\u0026. \"It wilib.omre lime before .be oaa walk,\" Mirs. Veruhar went on, \"aând I1cannot b. with her al 1h. time, and do not llme to lave ber entirely -wMthe Î. aiKh My huband u -an oye op=\" i t wn and cânnot beave except te ihn down now and mpm for the week end no I have l cdi,!\u0026e my time betweenihie two, and 1 have been trying te find 9emeone who weuld look after My littie girl whlle I1vau The next morning Gertrude w.a mntroduced te the invalid, a littie girl of eight years eld. She aoemed te take te Gertrudle at once and begged ber te atay and e m o orn f ber tbye. \"18h. u a very good litIle ptiet çaid Mn.. Vernham, _stroking lb ltte fair head beviiily, \"I do net lhink you would find ber mucb trouble.\" \"Oh, mother, is Ibis th. lady yeu aid M ulud et te look afer me,\" ciéd re b ow nicel\" 11 don't *no yet, diling, anawered Mrx..Vernharn miling, 'but w. yul try and arrange IigafMisa Norton is wiUling I ahainot mmnd my mlained ankie if it bringa a kind companion for My littbe gi.\" Il must be one of the \"all thnga' lhke mydisap'po\"ntmont yesterda ' and the trma n dlosing my ay\" jà Gertrude Z .uietyfor h. hZaaeadymfound hat ahe and bher new friend thougbl alike on lhese thinga. But Ibere was more good working ho- gether for Gertrude frorn b. eorneeingly trivial circurnatances than ah. bad dreamed of. Wben Dr. Vernham beard of ber father'. trouble h. vent over te Ridge- more te examine bis eyes, and gave great hopes Ibal an operation would work a Gertide took Ihat-Sunday-morning's text for ber lif. motte and it belped ber lhréugh 'many a rough place iii time to corne, for did abe not know mid that b porsonal experience, that \"Al hinga work together for good to lbem thatlèlve God.\" How Oould He? Lady: Can't you find work? Tramp: Yeamum -but ev.ryone vantsaa referénce frorn my lasi employer. lady: And can'lyQu ge one? Tramp: No, mum. ferme, be'. been dead tiwenty-eight yeas.. Back Again bsaac vished te consult a physician anid aaked a-friendbe recornmend one., \"And vbal doea b. charge?\" aaked Isae, akig anote of the doctor'm name. \"Fîv dolar for, the firat visil, the dollars- for aucceeding catis,\" vas the reV., au hour later Isaac enter.d ».th pbysician'a office and gave Ibis grect\"Ê: ,'Good morning, docter, I'r back again.' No In anmd Out for HMm \"Nov, Iben,\" said tb. captain he is men, 9\"vo'» go tbrougb the d\"iiquickly. FaUta.\"t The men did. \"'Fail eut.\" The men did. But one man atarted te valk off. \"lHere, Ricb, vbere are you going\" \"Back,\" vas the laconie-anaver. «T'il b.damned if I go tbrough .auch fool alunts. You don't 1mev your ova Miuid one minute in another.\" A Tust A liltle boy called -one evening aI «Mr. Jones' lbouse vith a' basket of mushroofl as a prese nt. Next day he came again, and mmv Joues' bousekeeper. \"Did Mr. Jones est the- mushroom5 hast night?\" be asked. \"Yes,\"* repied 'the housekeeper, \"b. 1usd them for, bis supper, and enjoy0 Ibein very much.\" 1~ \"And is he qUitee v.» Ibis mgmning? \"Yes; quit. ve»l.\" \"T4chèn that's ail riglit\" replied the fi tle chap moving sway. \"Ij wanted te fnd ouI if 1h... vere the right kind of rnushrooms.\"9 No mnan or woman should hobtile painfPr about because of corns when s) certain a relief is at hand as Holloway's Cornl Cure-. .Obddb~",
         "THE WESTERN HOME MONTHLY Ag'r tT.EATON COSTS WINNIPEG CANAbA - -~ ~1 \\'-~~ v i . ~ - 41 wua girl e to \" ered ined t for like rde that F to- bey ued er idge- grt Sk. a 1 er ie te anand asked [ame. s theyo d ase etrn: acdy. ted to à fodl nd it Mr. aga, Sms ýnj ad tshe eted to dnd o trtain 'a ie X N 't ---b t, -~-c",
         "THE WESTERN HOME MONTHLV l rà cil Written for The Western Home MonthlY by H.-E.-Vialoux AGEýNSWAKTBD ~ 0~~ WS TO »MAtE ,ýEXTùA t 140a7: ttractive mannr-o Cmk ona*OtUutae si !'rday1 up-)securing .or- dur fr. e~~sl ;nemtmm8 reting. cardm frblsor~ sanifeest iee ipine béok. ý No ChuresCo.', 36. . Ï]iMN-,WAN.rtEDSi 1epýii prvIneïsto represeilt \"ma~ Gr5teIst* Nurserel' .nl,\u0026rgest-, Ist.of.,hairdy stock, re- cqrnmead4 estilnm Experimentalstio. n9t necesmary, g£bod cbmmissions, .4 votgttoey.-I*diome, . free r'oùlfit. Sione *\u0026,.fflington, Toronto,* On tro. 12.18 * ForaSIse FOR 'iÏLZ-Silver* black and pýtéh foxes.i T. R. Lyons, Watervlle, Kings Co., N.S. 8-.19 FOR. SALE-\".FHeaven and Bell.\" Sweden- borg's great work on the life after death and a ceai orld byond; 400 pages, only 25c postpaid. W. G. Law, 486 Euclid Avenue,i Toronto, Ont. 8 1 LtýWORTED FLEMISH. GIANT AND i BELGIAN HARESý-In p airs or trios, for b r e i g . D t e e , u , S s . T F F O R - S L E - F a r n i r a is e d , p e d i g r e e d , r e - e~t«\" Sotch cllie uswitilibrains,« satura i orkers, born hee ers. C harles Reas- bèck, Vankleek Hill, Ontario. 12-181 FOR 5ALE-Registered and pedigreed black Siberian haret and red Belq*'anlhre. Youssg stock for sale. Northern Far Farm, Clinton, Ontàrlo. 11 FOR SALSo-Beit Dairy and Mixed Forme, Fruit Lands, Business Stores or City Property. Beit climnate. Apply te Frank Lester, Salmon AZmBIC. 12-18 BEED GRAINS FOR BALE-Taylor's and Kitchener wheats each outyieldqd registered Marquis, our grounds nearly 7 bushels. Many costomers reporting hi h yields of these two, ;aIm0 .yoas, Norway ing and GoId Queen. tarvemllous yielders, drought resiteri. Somne excellent registered Marquis stocks. Order Il 9 8su0plies limited. jas. W. Broatch, Box 7Î0, Môoie Jaw, Sask. it-18 Fruit and Farm Lande IXPRtOVED FARMÈS FOR SALE TO SUIT ALL NEEDS in one of the beit wheat rowing districts in Saskatchewan. Enquire 1.J.RLd, Perdue, Sask. 12-18 BUFFALO LAKE PROPERTY-Mixed farmi of any size. Acreage suitable for truck gardening. Ranches with or without stock and -aîmnt. 820 upwardi. Easy termi. Write ~~(n.MirrorRe..,MraAlla. 219 MisceilafeoUS JD. A. EVANS-Teacher of English Com- position, etc., Crystal City, Man. T.F. ALL 34AKES SSWING MACHINES REPAIRSD - Send machine hcad only. Needles and larts. (Repaie Dept.) Domninion Sewing Machine Co., 300 Notre Dame, Win- nipeg. T.F. LADIES-Make- money at home in your * spre ime. We buy hanid crocheted lace or apatingby yard or yokes. For fuill information write ome Necdlework Company, P.O. Bbx 122, The-Pas, Manitoba. 1:19 YOUR PHOTO *OR SNAPSHOT' neatîy copied and .mounted in pretty 'grèy.ton fold- ers. 81.50 per dozen, pôstpaid photo rcturited uninjured. W. L. Randaîl, Mý ann3, Sask. 12-18 RAZOR STROPS-We manufacture the best razor strop in the world. Keeps razar honed as well as sharpenýd. Will be sent on receipt of price, $1.50. Canada Hone C., Wawancsa, Canada. 2-19 AUTOMOBILE OPERATION and Repaie Manual, with 12 valuable formulas, gasoline îonic, renewing old dry batteries, asoi1î substitute, etc., etc., 25c. Automo bi e Ë elrt. Box 202A, Quebec. 12-18 SMALLEST BIBLE ON BARTH, postage stamp size. 250 pages. New Testament illus- trated. Brings god luck 15c, lwa 25c, fis-e So.Christian Workerbox 2 02A, Queiec. SOc. 12-18 DO YOU WANT WATER?-I have an in- strument with which I have lacateel over 400 wells in Manitobar .Saskatcliewain and Aherta. ý,egisters only on springs, no soakage sîrown. Terns moderate. This instriWnent not for sale. F.. A. Hobart, Water Expert, Brandon, Man. TF. JUST THE TRINO FOR THE SLDI~ BOYS-A Duplex Automatic Hair -Cut er. Juat conib the hair and il cuti it att Ie smre time. Sent postpaid for il. . Stir, 616 Charlotte St., Fredericton, N.B. !î '12-18 BILLIARD TABLES-For 'farm\"bômem, portable and stationary. The gaine of.'kitigs, 150 up, easy terme. J. D. Clark BiIligrdzCo., Winnipeg. 2.;T.F. A. RANCHSR'S LIFS IN CANADA7-A tele- of. adventure -and success inu.,fruittrowiîng, pâttryeepiilf ducks, gçèse, turk-y,, hares g bâ b éé , fiéw e t\u002b s, etc.,; 2 5 ce l sw tP 5tip a y C H Prva,ýLngeyF-ortIB.C! .ý.-2-19 WANTSD RELIABLE AGE3NTS4;To sell fruit.and ornamental'trçes, mmalýfriits, meed potatoes, etc. Good pay:- Exclusivýe téfritory. W;egrow varieties recommendedby.oÀr- ment ExperimentaI Fartners:foýr ojar. Wesiern trade. Nursery of six hundred acres. Reli. able stock. Write Pelham Nursery Co., Toronto, Ont. T.V. DYKS'S AUTOMOBILE AND 0450- LINZ ENGINS ENCYCLOPEDIA - A standar text of over 900 pages, adopted by th lUied States Governmeflt. Money re- funded if dissatisfied Every automobile and tractor owner should have one. Sýend $4.50 for pstpaid capy ta Dept. M., Dominion Texct BookCo..Calgary, Alberta. T.F. A CLEAN, RELIABLE WORK which every family should _posmess. \"Dr. Hollick's Origin of Life and Marriage Guide.\" A bock of 932 pages, containmng invaluable informe- lion, illustrated with 44 full-page color plates- and 200 engravingi; 34.25, carniage 'paid; money refunded immediately if flot satisfied. Saskatoon News Agency, 156 Second Ave., Saskatoon, Saqk. 12-18 BUILD UP a Perfect Memaory, Concentra- tion, Self-Confidenlce. The Peiman Mind and Memnory Training course will teach you bow ta remember names, faces, dates, events. etc. It will strexfgthen vour power of concentra- tion, develop originality and double your mental efficiency. It will show you haw ta learn languages, poetry, etc*, in half the usual lime and with h~ the effort. Complete course of physical health exercises also included; no apparatus or equipment required for these. Over 30,000 officers and men, in the Army, Navy and Air Forces are now taking the Pel- man Course of Mind and Memory Training Over a quarter of a million students enrolled. This is the course whieh you see advertised in the big London (England) papers, and re- commended by the biggest andI bcst-knowii men of the British Empire. It is available naw ta Canadian atudents througli the Can- adian branchi of the Pelman Institute. Booklet giving fuUl outline of the course sent for the asking. Pelmnan Institute, Dept. W.H.M., Toronto, Canada. 12-18 DOLLARS FOR YOUR MINUTES- Spare lime study under aur guidance will niake your minutes earn you dollars later. We teachi you at home. Beginner's Course- A thorough grounding in the important eIe- mentary sbjels. omlete Commercial: A complee traîinginCousiness subjects. Sten- ography: Fils.yo for office work. Civil Service: Full instruction for examination. Engineering: Stationary, gas or asoline steam traction, gai tractar, automobile. Pre- pare you for license. Mechanical Drawing: Covers practical work in.deiring and draft- ing machinery. Architectural Course: Plan- ning and preparing for aIl classes of buildings. Electrical Course: Lighting and pwer sys- teims. Univeirsitv Matriculation: Full course preparing you for any university. or tuitiai in any subjects. Teacher's Examination: For .any non-profýessional certificate in any pro- vince. Stoïy Writing. Special English, Sales- iniahip: and'manyother courses. Ask about 1anything that interesîs you. Canadian .Carres- :pondencc College. Limited, Dept. W.H.M., Toronto, -Canada. - 12-I8 Nuriniig PRIVATE NURSES-Earii $10 ta 325a week. Learn wvitlioutleaàving- home. Booklei free. Royal Colle.ge of.Siieîîce, 709 I Spadina .Ave., Toronto, Caniada. 12-I8 Patents FETHERSTONHAUGH \u0026 CO.-The oIe . stablished firm. Patents everywhere. Hea( roffice, Royal Banik 11lg., Torpnto; Ottawý eoffice, 5 Elgin St:' Offices thir'ukho)ut Canada e Booklet free. T.F 8 PATENTS-Trdcrnark copyright.ý Consult -ing engineers. Agencies in il fot-eign couiî etries. Inventors' Adv-iser sent frec on requesi 1-Marion \u0026 Marion, 104 Ufliersity Streel eMontreal; 918 F Street. WVashiington, D4 Over thirty years of continuai practice. - Stamps for Sale k. STAMPS-Free package ta collectors for 1.cents postage. Offer litndred different forcig ýrstamps, incîudling war issues. hinges, catalogu, 1 10 cents. We buy starnps. Marks Statn 1:Company, Toronto. T.] now héeturkeys, dgcksr qese ancific ens will be fatened up fo O urreunn beys wbe have been wounded and are coming home for Christmas as quickly as the hips can bring theml Thebet is none toc, good for olur Canai*n brces and we muet get our poultrY in extra go9 shape fer the -Christmas trade-pribes a\" goed; there is pleity cf coarse gan d wheat screenmngs .aviaîable te fatten the poultry in Manitoba this fail. In ail my experience I have neyer seen ilarger kernels cf oats sand barley. It is frea]IY wonderful and therefore makes splendid' feed for ail stock and poultry. Very strict regulations came mn effect on N\u0026v.- lit in Canada, im regard te feeding mffllmg wheat cf a\"y kind, te stock: screemings may not contain more than 25 per cent cf wheat when wbeat and other grain iso5 mixed up. It canxnot be separate for milling without undue cot. ,It may be fed'te- poultry and stock. Any perOsol breaking these rèjulations issued by the Food Board.cf Caà ada- are liable te% a fine cf not leos than oie hundred dollars or more than one tbousand dollars, or te imprisoniment not exceeding three months cr te botb fine and imprisonient . This ail shows the crying ne ed f wheat con- servation soe tarviftg millions may be fed in the war zone. Canada's surplus cf fibre flaxseed bas been commandeered fromn the lâtest reports, the seed te be lanted in Great Bitain and Ireland. owever as flaxseed ishardly used at ail as a pouftry ration, we need not worry when we may use cir abundancë of coarse grains With impuity jïand aise a by-reut' cf wheat, brah and shorts. Thef armer with a fxe lot cf, chickens te finish for thé Chris as tYadeý shotild send te the Publicatidn Branch 1bepgt- ment cf Agriculture, Man.,' for Bulletin' No. 7 on \"'Fatteniug, Kili1hr 'and Dresding Chiokens for Market.\" Tbe bulletins from the Farmers' Librar1 are f ree uppn application and are fMûlf practical knowledge, eentaining cuts off atterunig crates, etc., as well-as the correct metbod c f killing and trussing fowl. Chickens \u003ewill aise fatten very welin. a small pen with a suitable trough flxed in one end cf it. The pen should be darkened. Dust 1the cockereis aged 42 te 5 months old with a good insect pewder, starve tbem 24 heurs before feeding them their fatten- Sing ration. On the farmn the best mixture *te f ced this season will be cracked oats, two parts, cracked barley one part, and £shorts one part. The fluer the grain àl .chopped the better and the huila may bc 1left tin it. Wheat sereenings cracked car .1 aise be fed te advantage in this fattening ,ration. Mix the grains te a thin batter :witb buttermilk and feed very little ai flrst, about one ounce cf tht meal te each ;bird, weighingit befere adding the mi\u0026k ;-Give twice a a and gradually increase s eat the end cf 7 days the birds are gettinj 'r about three ounces per head each meal. The size and breed cf the chickens must c; f course be considered in feedillg. SomE .charcoal during the flrst part cf thE 8 14 te 21 days required te fatten the birds, e If a bird dees net cat greedily and seem, listless let him eut and give him hiç .liberty for a few days. H1e is suffering 'from indigestion.Apesn edst ,a keep a sharp eye for aling birds durine 8 this feeding period. Soaking the mnea -a few heurs ahead cf feeding time soften, the grains. No water is needed as thq -buttermilk supplies enough drink. . week before killing these birds may b, Id given a little melted tallow in their inasb a about three ounces for a dozèn bird, F:The beef tallow gives te a flrm whil t- dressed. Crate or pen-fattened roastei I.will eommand a much better price on th ;t. market than ordinary chickens. Th ýt, extra weight and price will pay for tfi 1Qtrouble entailcd. BODY MASSAGE, SCALP TREAT- MENT, MANICURING Mme. MoMlitn, Suite 2 Phone G. 3464 470 Main St., WinnIpe will bé an açèful priée. Certainly, new- laid eggs wM;,coinafd a good figure and the- city markets have been unable te secuxe neW.làid egs for \"lovie or none, for some weeks'new. Whether the high .ie of feed cf ai kmds *s makingîhe Et=nirs stint their layiing bens cf egg proilinggrin, bas anytbngtdo with the' shé l canniot tèl. Weather coenditins;veLe en -unusually suitable for- ioultighens and spring puilets and they--bhave benùable te ,rùt eut cf doors mudch later than usuaâl. The lack of whéat .wl n.ept ha4fe, prevented the hens Iaying many egg durmg the faIl months. 1 have demnonstrated this- ixmy own poultry yard where '.Biddày\":has lid al t~hrohber moult, and is new getting in fin fettle for winter Iaymng. When a beck yard poultry keeper can make bis pen oi fowls prcduce plenty cf eggs frcm April lst toe ov. lOth at the amiail coet cf 20 cents per dozen eggs and buy al bis war rations in the city, surely the farmer WF32 - Cold Standard Ig. Co. -Wlnipeg FIO M O O àew- es Numbéra 8I.SomisI The Federal Collge of Canada, toeher with the Wnrpeg Business Colee. ave trainéd over 24,000 students for business life. The excel- lent influence cf this vast armny of. business workers may b. yours through a course of study at the Federal College, Regina, or at the Winnipeg Business Colleège, Winnipeg. No Christrnas holidays this year. %ein any school day now. G. S. Houston, General Manager. idn p resmt tricti T' ho i ~etn and begi to gwe t eshbird, 1jid in 1 Ibsat 3 mornlfg mattered perasor potsh mi :kml tone l in the fall. weather i (cracked) au useful the fcwl b Ibis Yeuoe the count anmailperc to buy it early in 1 nigbt to g' iîqg at ni vegetables apything 1 r5v then 1 b. ygreE grams and ier. Th( any kind j be refiled handfuls o Clean wal now and à For a ch . l c e, j TV ribt'cu au. - - - - -- - -",
         "THE WESTERN F d nake bi lens prodluoe e~g paos.o oecardbnsf h an=d=m 1ia good pmoit on thqm aoup pot scorched in tberange. geencu poat pcm. A Winnipeg man ;bgs b e is. fine for. laym. hem.wenue el.surl.g thepetsm rk g speringly, but very e= ve. No one stric account o every outlay aud-nonedoryithycntgtitGr- iubtho le but one of. manywho mangeZleione and oyser abli, gravl and g mail flock in a businesa-liko-wàay. charcoal al belp Bîddy 10 lay inter egP .inter feeding for eggs ml an important -plenty of snaline and a good dusl bath Question these .daya. of. early *ihiter when and: freedom from dra ghts, are also âe flock are gettmg used to confinement factorsu Wbeoconsider ed. and begnning b show \"1red heade',\" a Fortunate la the man who saves a MM eslgn of eus. Take a.nicesmild day couple of loadsof grain sbeaves when the to-gave thehlinsand pulleta, adose of. thresing *3g\u0026 ron and reservesl hem esom saits one-third of a teaipoon b f r the hiens. AÂIlock of layin hg lens can iMb bird, diaoîived in alittie water and dôtheir owntrebn to a mocely, and, îïlxed i a bran and shorts meuh. Feed as the straw gets bco deep on the floor Ibsat 3 or 4 p m. when the flock are someof it la forked out on the sInny Bide hungry, withhoèd water 'until the neit. of the house, where the hens may Do let morning when the usuel grain feed la out la, run for an hour on a mild day, but scatlered about. A litte piée of cop- nover allow tbem to mope about mn the preorepmcbh of permanganate of snow i winter. Be on your guard -hmxe in the drinking fountains against over feeding, seo thal You keep wiil toe up the bon and ward off colds thein just a 1111e bugry The houa wi in the fail. I nover give sallei very cold nover et loo muche] mabterfr weather i this country. Grain, oats the bopper or trough can h iied when (crackted) and barley or cracked corn are convemient and lef t ready for them ta anl useful 10, scalter in tbe deep litter ini vick at. Use mnsect powder often and the fowl bouse and wheat areeninga froin kerosene the roosta, hens infested with Ibis year's cr0 p cen bo freely used out in vormin do not lay weil. the country, but as it contais a verY T wiil answer any questions mn regard 10 amail percenlage of wheat it does not pay winter laying with, pleasuro. Address 10 buy it for the hens. Give the grain H. E. V., Cbarleswood, Man. early i the mornmng or after dak et night 10 gel the bons warmed up scratch- iîqg at noon. Feod bouse serape and Mu W. AU Know vegetables of any kind; boes WÜIleca \"Father, whal'a a substitute?\" asked anytbing but celery and Prbubarb. Smail Charle of bis.faîhor. voaoecbbage boots,* mangels ail \"A substitute, mY boy, la anything that kepthemc healtliyad gv them tho costs more Ihan the original ari.tcle.\" bZy gnfth nood 0 Jtvereplace the __ grass and tasty worms and bugs of suin- a 3o h nier. The bopper of crushod grains of q ýncBke mn Tho wn h.r any kind mixod-witb bran and shotscan \" neke a h ethnr be refihled in tbe afternoon when a few in order 10 buy feed for his horse,\" saîd handfuls of wbole grain la scattored about. Jone.- \"I cam undereband hiesenjiments,\" Cloan wator should ho givon daily and aaid Smitb. \"Many'u tbo time 1 have cul now and again-a moist mash'can bc fed. down on meat and potatoos i order 10 buy For a change, e few bakod or boied gasline.\"y ar?I thley new- re and ble 10 eather Étable le and doors îck of a bons ionths. rT own aid ail Ling in bou a ke bus e from mI cool ail bis farmer MY YdWa usinC88 24.000 excel- my Of. youra t the t the yeai'. nager. -IOME MONTHLY An Have vi Ho b Andi He And- At Or 10 Th And An Tei thhnw M' the e cf thi gratel us bi was cance aima authc u lmnrnnmunwuîISund ay - Read infg-~ '* -And lu a..hdTh=,\" controv.\"; - What \"la 10 b. tii. ro\u0026at uls hatf9àer ithfaiingbreth, end and auni f religon? I i s h h a t il r i t n g b e l, T h e s e lin g o f t b . w o rsà i ueif c s t ld witaty igtn th They ane pWScded in LuIke's nrrtive ayo gene t0 ihe Healer of Namaeh b ce. nsentences which Mat iw n- hocuret sucb anye? Jude\u003ciin the Sermon o0% th. Mo1!4t» lesealesck bo oub Bs hm, sentences wbuch il la by no mem nsm- lense the lek 's t f Hshe, polelOHo mey have used on M« ts bn ai clne thonder's soo ne occasion. At Ibis very lune smre allthewoner Hewrogh fo thmnauneleus pharisesinvited Him 10 bis au do for you-yea, more. home 10 dine. Anl the clrUMOm a m~o i .Whthe yewai fr te gntl tochnot tbld us. Prom the convr ati Of wheter e wut or he ente tucbjesuis, il wus prelty \u003clear blut wbile the the angel-troubled pool, invitation wus ostensibly 10 honer lfim, )ng for the hand Ibel healelb auch its réa intent was either 10 silee lmn r.the gate called Beautiful. or ta catch Hlm iHis lalk. H t iîtrent;Hwilcom-th Lod, had Hia reason for 1oing tWIbis eau= loer of Hea lco that e Lrd, Ilwas 10 seercb and try tb. luarts of ielvrofsusthtcy those in whom Ho recognised là OeneM. tbe lame saal leep and.laugh at Hie In lbe. moat golemu sud awful WVy Ho word1 exposed Ibeir hypocrisies, contrauted.tbeir id \u0026Bis emo hal aatisfy. pntlousnews in imtters nd mdureîitih Frederie lawrenoe Knowles. theur negleet of the great realities which are the soul of religion. «Y. litho ýPint and rue sud evory herb, and pous over !he usgingcf l. Chrch dgment aud tho love of God.' \"i,. The lmaivin ofthe hurh Cr alunst\"Ho cries, \"1those thinga wbich he %ev. C. Silvester Horne, M.A., are within! Study not 10 prouent tb. M.P. mere appearanco of respetability andto xl-Hwhot gve fr ame lio e hobaeesin regard of lhe law of ext-owbet gve fr ams toseexternats. God requiretb lrulh ln tbe ~whieb are witi.-Luko xi. 41. mnward parts.-bolineus, witbout whieh no.. y ubject le the true almnagiving of man canose the Lord; love, as the vm ylUfe ehurch. I bave chosen as a text one of the soul. Give, Iherefore, for alcms, lb. hose passages for wbich wo feel most thinP Itharenwithiu.\" eful to the revisers. They have given .it nmay almoaet ho said that anyoiue cu back the true saying of Our Lord, givo mouey, and that moot people do. 'e aime of sucb thinga as ye have\" iTl l fe i bbaurese t t. a somnewhat pointiess translation, Il in unthinkable that Christ mroud in bas nothmng approacbiug the aignifi- direct His disciples 10 do what the hl* -e of the true translation, \"Give for of every other faitb did in like Poeurs. 5those thinge that are within.\" No* but wben you got Ibis amplifyln Word bis formi my text la, as you uce, an lunLukes gospel you gel aI ltheamie tie nrit.ative contribution to a great what wus unique In ltheacbing cf Christ. PACIFIC :WINTER ON -THE -Milder than Winter- --Coolër than Summer- TflE YERY PLACE FOR REST- 'AID RESREATIOU $pend your vacation ,at the Palatial Canadien Pacifie Nlotas: EMPRESS rIteiIVictmra VANCOU VER Hbt.I, Venoouvr fi 9.1 Fer ruit IummsaIU. *nu.CuI\u0026Es m »Y ofSS ~Teftf WOieD'SIA~ -.'i,~ I .- I .~ - \"i.-, s; KOIEL vAICOUVER. SEE THE MULTITUDE 0OFINTERESTlING SaIl1 GOLF, MOTOR, IDEDU.9 VKl. ALL oUlDàOR SPOWtS BECKON YVOU. ibis u d ithe Tolu 1 ONOLULOU- panFemi of tePOiMl*. i",
         "114E*WegTItN OM-MFT S, À . . t , liéSo Goodl\" \"It j' NatrY' ,IFoo-Mik-but transformed,,into \"-* aityq déliciouu digh l\"fit to set befoie. the XKin'g.\" MADE W)M'MILK 'Dlgtthe ohildren, wMt it. The wliet it eagerly, -ee-wheni they refuse plain milk. À -nd- it,-will nourish them4..nd heIp them grow strong. Make Junket Ice CreapW forthem. Md',bi GoomTU sd Druggbts .ver7where. UqfdS. iGjour doger's name, for 3j*p3ck 1.BéWt and tSmes(.nough for àl dhos) or l» for full package. Chr. Hansen's Canadian-Laboratory 'Dept. E, Toronto, Canada \"INevxh\" ia Junket prepared wilh ougar and in 4, i*ors. Made in a jiffy. Try a package - 10c. CLAR K'S PORK \u0026 BEANS WiII Save the Meats And Give Juat as Much Satisfaction and Nourishment W. CLARK, Limited :Montreal CANADA FOOD DOARD-licoeaNwnber 14-216 M , Japauee ROSES' BON KEI-Otro s the lan and flowers. Plant seed now and transplant outside as soon as frost is out of «round. *You will have beautf fui ROSES from May to Novenibor. Large pecket cf secd and illus. catalog. 10 Cta. O'LVIN SALES CO., Dept.- 35 P. 0. a« 56 Winnipeg,. Stnn.L What were they te giVe? Theumel The #it Wsto be the grrr. They wero to -Offertjheîr very heert's blood , if one M\u0026y seosay, tamankifld. ,They were to pour out. for thern the contente Of their Do you ever reflect how sin2gula it is that in what Heonry Drummend cailed the' programme Of Cris ' y ther is1 the promise that the poor sha haveth goopdel preachod unta thei? \"BEhold\" crieo your materialist \"what a mockery le here!' donhe r skold'be givenfeod1 an~d clothos aanmoney. The poor should1 ho promioed a sharo of the property ofi those who ar e tter off than zthy.\" Ye tethe onâe stands, the osi for the1 poor an itin haratersti ofhristian-1 ty. Je did not offer the poor the1 gospel because it was the leait andi pôôreet of ail gifte, buit. because it was the best of ail gifts. The temptation of the poor was Wo beieve that if -only they had enouh and W spare they would be happyJeImm nover dshonored them byi deeoiving them with that belief. TheY1 were not mere animais ta ho satisfied1 with food and sheltor though they hadj been too long treated as if they were. They were living seuls, starving, indeed,1 but without faith; homelese, inideed, buti it was because they had net found home, in God. They had aspirations, their1 hearta knew the instinct of worship. Above ail they were burdened with guilt;1 they knew the torture of an accusing1 conscience; they needed te find redemp-i tien, and pardon and peace. To the poor theGospl is preached. \"Give to h in that asketh!\" What? Give for alins that which le witliin; thy knowledge ef the love antd poweK God. Give ta the peor the Goepl. There is 'ne single retürded eaying of Jesus that this man's roef want.e mending, or that man's house needed dfrinage. He neyer said that the sweated werkman should got more wages, or that the serf eheuld ho free. Therefore, eays some one, Ho was indifferent! Net at alil! There was one tbing, and one enly, that could gain ail the\"seonde, and rnany more- the reee otin of the cpirit of maxn, 80 that oeould lvehie neighbor as him- slf! Get that and there is ne dificulty about the amelioration of the condition of tho peor and the oppreseed. PovertY and oppreseion will cease ta bc. Tho strong will help the woak, and the rich will ho brother ta the poor. If we could realiy get hold of this principle arigbt, 1 feol that it would meet maya difficulty on the part of came who sanabof from Chritianity and Christ altagether. Christianity bas always suf- fered frorn false bopes and false expecta- tiens. Some people quarrel with the Biblobecause tis not the latest textbook on science; sorne people tbink the as- tronomy le obsolete, and se they have no use for the Bible; came poople expect ta find the New Testament a bandbook te political economy. If Christ would show tbem how ta turn baîf covereigns inta sovoreigns there would ho business in it. Some' people tbink the New Testament chould decide the policy cf a *ohtial ar y, hvereas imem bers f a l parties a ppealite it. Wby did net Christ Jesus lay down the exact lines tbat civilîzation was te follow? Wby did He net sketch the Utapia He was te inaugurate ce that tho blundering efforts of aur statesmen sbould net miss the mark? Wby, indeod! The supreme neede cf London are nat legisiation. I de not underrate the necessity for social changes, but first and foremoet is the necessity for a spiritual change. We want better citizens, larger- hearted, broader-mindcd men and wornen, wvbo will give their love and thought, their sympatbv-above ail, tbeir faith, te our cities. Can you net imagine a poor man or woman appealing teýa- social reformer and saying, \"It would bu înueli te ne te ho in casier circurnst.ances. I sbould like a btter bouse te live in; aise te bu fre cf the endiess strugglc ta niake bath ends meet. But I amn a human hoing; my needs do net end there. I want, above al things,-new heart for imy work; 1 want encouragement in niy triais; I wan't faith ta lift me abave iny teniiptatieps; 1I want ta get out cf the nican and sdr(li(1 spirit, as weII as the inean andl sordid environ- nient; nay, I1ivant an eutieek beyond tlîis~ wvorld with its penuiry and pain; 1 want hope; 1 waiit the presence f, the Eternal witb nie; the rich, for al I know', nîay need lit less than 1; but I1iîecd the love of Cd, mand %viat 'aI vot (Io\u003e forIne? W'iai faiit.h can yen gîie te nie, what hope for this life, anîd the life te conie? And the social reformer replies, perbapé sady, \"It is no use coming ta me' for, that; 1 have nothing of that Bort to give 'y'ou. 1 can perbaps give you a new hojs,\"but 1lcannot give yôu aneW heart. 1insy add to your, temporal rioheé--I cannQt add te your eternal.\" And the poor soujg pes away troublod and wistful. Where à the man or woman to be foumd who can give for alme that whih je withn? It ae just. hore that -Christ stem' in.~ Her does not offer a new political ewclly. He taiks littie of a social programm»e, though 1 ueo that He. knows that thatilhU and j»uet foflow. \"«Ail these thingeshahlu tea ie nte, you.\" \"Your Heavenly Father knowoth that ye have need of ail theso thig.\" But He begine with the' big ot neods. You are sinful andy ou can Me happy until your sins are waeed away. You are full of doubts and mis- givings, and yeu. cannot have a liglit heart until you know God and Je5s Christ, whom God bas sont. Whatyo suprernoly need is aime of that whiQhiâ within. \"I have not giveet ou ûoi y for I have left you poor, nakod of houséé and lands, 1 have taken yeu away frein them. But 1 have given you love; I have brpken my heart for distribution te mankind. 1 have poured out the red wine of my eympathy and rny redeemng love. Drink ye a of it.\" Theso be thine aims, 0 Christ,' dis- tributed StiR to the world that nee no rnany thmngs, but needs nothing as it noodg Thee! Yea, and theso be thine aims, 0 Church of Jesus; did'st thon only know thy glorious opportunity. These and ne mere temporal and material gifta. Faith, hope, love, pardon, purity, ',eaoe The poor have the Gospel preached unto thorn. Give, I pray you; give, I coin- mand myself, to every one that asketh of thee-but give for aims thoso things which are within.- Which LoeIl A speaker at the Northfield Conference, urging a choice of high aims for Young me, caid that when in London ho wishe ta visit the Crystal Palace. At the station hie etepped up ta what hie supposed was the booking office and put down some English coin. The man i mide said, \"What will you take?\" The touriet said, \"I don't drink. 1 arn a prohibitionist.\" \"Oh,\" said thc ticket-seller, \"I see you are an American, so 1 must explain: There are two ways of getting to the Palace; onc is by the high grade railroad that takee y ou right into the Palace; the other is by the low grade metals, that leaves you down at the foot of the bull, and you climb a bal-mile. Now what. level wiIl yeu take?\" \"l'Il take the high level ,\" was tho quick rejoinder. High ideals should hoe hosen, and cluitg Wo in the physical, mental and moral lifc of Young men. Above the Cloude A traveiler in the West ivas high up on one of the mountains one day when ho Saw a storm raging in the narrow valley' below hirn. Clouds went sweeping and roliing by beneatb bis fcct, but where hoe stood all was calm, and overbcad was the Sun- chine. Then hce noticcd two eaglos circling about in the clear upper air. Thoy had doubtes been lower down the mountain, but bad corne up above the storrn. \"41t gave me,\" said the one who iit- nessed it, \"a clearer undorctanding of the famiiar words 'They that wait for Jehovah shall renew their strength; they shall mount Up with wings as oagles.' My work, my daily jife, my companion- ships werc and must bc down among the homes of men-down wher% an'aeties, disappointments ,and many a Storm of sorraw wukl cn e,ý but there was no real need for the soul ta bc submcrged and beaten down by these things; it had a refuge above t hem. \"Quiet trust ini God wil in vory truth enable it ta mount up with wings, as did the cagles, into clearer light and a calmer Latmosphcre. A Christian who is over- *borne by cares and worries, buffeted bY' every storni that cames, is onc who bas *not leaned the strength that God offers 3him, has not learned the power of faith Lthat wvilI lift hin! inte quietnes and con-' I fidence. The tbougbt of that Storm i î the valley, and those great birds flYing fabove it, has ewen a help to me miany 8 ttimie since wvhen I have found myseif rgrowing oppressed atid overburdened bY elif's tasks and c.ari- \" knowfl conce ing incident mmn for an chidren at D MisAMac] in the appre sohoola and mntermted in it ig properly occasicu of t) that nmde thi *littie tots Wl Tales ef H( It should song the sini le suppeeed mechanical miost realiet: MacBeth coi \"After the on a chair, a to walk aIl Many elyly eyalive. umtil one liti front of me, aide, i'inked mothtely !e brigtthis roally a doil. hoped tis co aud the schox An interes b o e wli critical muai going after Z gannai bc able o tf modem muai technique of cf the newer They will re the familier i for company nerveus teni emotienaily, to the music simple veritit Winl presUMI exprlencs i pitc.h that i ibbleths ' and even s jippearta th musical werl preseeit, BDfi ef the hearer Even the genial empl( of boredexi occupations ture. Mus Most cf, th, work, and casional dra enoe said: thoir morne were a grav there are soi fer with a gd Spmlding Albert Sp professional Lieutenant Service sony the New 'Yi War.\" lMi in regard t in general tI Lieut. Spal in part: \"It is Mny mare prom and in fact now than re, the 1 ploasure Wl would rep Life, front during th*~ made cf st .~ g\u003e Nu n SCIENCE DORS HEAR'WONDERS HEAR FORTHE DISTINCTLY DEAF THE PORT-O-PHONE AGENCY P O. 'B0os 56 Vpt.42 Winnipeg",
         "THE WESTERN -HOME MONTHLY SU ~~ ~ ,u unUWID5DDWUIWDM M s s You. ,but add $OUI Who. il?. aOfin. i the, mis- ight Oumi fro e; I on ta red dWa Peeds thine 1 only rhe gifta. Zace unto com- sketh Spalding on a' feto ul Abert Spalding, forunerly a wel-known professional violiniat,-sud who is now a Lieutenant in the .Amkercan Aviation Service serviflg, is inteetingy quoteci in the New York Sun on ',Music sud the War.\" Whenc asked ta express hits views i regard ta musical Itan sd the effet i general that the warwill have on music, Lieut. Spalding had the following ta say ini part.-m3 \"It s m belief that music will take a more prominent place in People's lives, and in fact is, taking a more vital place naw than ever before. Gugliclnia Fer- rera, the historian, once said 'Art is a pleasure *ithout a need?. - I -wonder if- he would repeat that statement ta-day. Life, from a materia stancipaint, bas during these past four yerscorne ta b made oi sterner stuf than it was in the inconsequential day. wbich preceded the vSr. \"People have sacrificed and su#Yred ta the utmost extent. Material pleasures have had ta Lne gvnu n yo Disratiosluuris udmanifold in- terets have narrowed themselves down and become merged into one great spiritual, mental and physical effort- winuing the war for' democracy. \"nhe psychol1gicsl 'result of this wMl be to prepareanfifit people more for the great- consolation an~d mental uplift that art, sud especially munie eau, yv. For the pleasures of the QocilJ Le eubstituted the pleasures of le minci, by necessity at firt sud by choice ater- ward. Books will Le reaci, pictures looked. at sud music listeneci ta with greater attention, interestt sud concentration than ever before.\"y Eh. Want a Don MisFlorence MacBeëth,, the well- known concert soprano, teýll the folow- ing incident wbich occurred -whén she sa for au audience. of 2,500 scho5l cbidrefl at Duluth-. MWs MacBeth believes that.education in the appreciation shoùlc begn in «tie achools and- that-the cbldren- eau be intemeted inuS the better clai of music-if it is properly- presenteci to them.- On the occasian of the Duluth councert \"the thingr that made the greatest imression on the littie tots was theDolSg from The Tales of Hoffmanu, which I.- gave.,mi It shoulci be explained that ini this eoing the singer represents a doil, which is supposeci to sing andi articulate by a mechanical contrivance. The effect is Miostrealistic when weil done- Miss MacBeth continues: \"fAfter the concert I was a8ked te stsnd on a chair, and the children were sllowed to walk ail around and examine me. Mauy lyly touched my dress with their umtil one littie feilow plauted bineilf in front of me, and putting his head on one side, vinked knowingy at me. 1I u- medately returneci the biFh sign which brcught this e .aculation, 'Aw, you ain't reallyra doil. You're a girl.\" Ità to bc hoped this co-operation between the artists and the school authorities wil spread. Aftr tun wu An interesting thing after the war wli be ta see what happens to the Plain un- critical music lover who st.srts concert going after abstention, of. two or tbree yenrs omreno -doubt, who were just aeinju, after considerable practice, to bc able ta- foilow the subtler windings of modern music will have bast sme of their technique of heaing, and wiil find much of the newer music a closed door ta them. They will revert with a sigh of relief, to, the familiar good things. They wiil have for company ail the men, who, after the nervous tension of the war, will relax emnotionaily, and wiil fiy for consolation to the music that bas witbin it the etemnal simple verities, On the otherband, there wiil presumably Le many whom their experiences wi11 have keyeýd-up tasuch a pitch that in music, as in politica, aId ibboleths Wâll Le the merest sawdust, and even simple accepted trutha wil appear-ta them as shibboletbs. But here again wiil it Le seen the war wiIl leave the musl world very much where it is at preserit, se far as the tastes and appetites of the hearers are concerned. Reduzning 7FaturO Even the most fascinating and con- genial empi.loyments have their moments of boredom, wbile the Most dismal occupations have some redeeming fea- tures. Music teachers should make the Most of the pleasant fetures of their work, and avoid impatience at its oc- casional drawbacks As Douglas Jerrold once said.: The ugijet Of trades have their moments of pleasure. Now if I were a grave digger or even a hangman, there are some VPkoi whom I. could work for wth a gôoddieal of enomeut.\" Wh, isthe 3D9a sopoeIfle I If a glanoe is taken over a concert roomn ,uring the sat number of the programme, a strange spectacle of nodding heada, or éIeepy eyes wiil meet the gaze. 'What is the reason? It is not that the music is nore soothing, for as a mule the lait movements are vigorous sud roflsing Ie it not becouse the sat, movement fille an emotionsi niche, as it were, satisfies a ervni but au. oramental piece of deoatv work of but littie importance? The audience bas been treateci with AI- Scherzo, Adagio- ta the humorous, so sud sentimental-sai the Ist move- nent is the requiem, nothing remains but the nodding heaci, the weary eyelid, the end of ali sleep. Now this is puM y a physical weakness is noasiount ofetrivinstudyr,or universat interest eau overcomne it foit is the nat- tural result of tireci nerves lulleci ta reat by a series of similar sensations.- The last nove is but loweming the curtain. _Poor Finale bas a tbankless taak. it is certain, of course, that the intrinsic value of the composition cannot Le affected. in it9elf, though the hearers are often painfully affected. Therefore it is incumLent upon the composrin bis last rnovement ta take the greatest pains ta avoid monotany; making paiefo0 la retai the wsuderin attention of hie beamers at this partcular moment. No %pecial efforts are ever requireci in bis firet movement, they would-Le out Of Place, but the conventional.\"steady run home\" of the Finale seeme ta Lec a serious mistake that catis for a.dmastic remedy. Sevemai ways will no doubt occur ta the expert of meeting this difflculty, but as a suggestion, the sepeibilitiS of the audience rnay Le appealeci ta as in the Symphonie Pathetique, or by a short series of in- tellectual exercises in the formn of vari- ations, though in these two methods but Nery modemate success may Le metwith. The mçst vigomous .wi.in UAiegm must Le absudoneci, htiwever,f or unles it is most camefully deait with drowsaness is bounci ta Le the only esult. Beethoven seeme ta have graspied the situation, for in bis C Minoir Symphony, he suddny arrests the vigorous March Of the Finle by introducing the melody of the Scherzo; thougli this rude awaken- ingis usail rServeci for the vemy endi of the movement when the attention is most wearied, sud the misebief done. No, the ear wants sometbmng entirely new * a new tune in a new time, at the endi of tue movement, like Beethovens Quin- tette Op. 95, though one may Le inclineci ta think it tao late in the day for intro- ducing new matter inta the last 20 bars or 00 of su existing work. At the saine time the device of serving up old material in a new formn as in Brahm's Pianoforte. Quintette might Le indulged in, v!here a subject out o f the tirnt movement In con- junction with that of the Iast, is brought mNor is this dçrogatmy, thougli the composer may think it somewhat dègmc- in\u0026 ta employ a device, thouigli mter al composera~ very seldomü write suything but what interests, or excites theielves, se what has led tbem ta o se in their own case is worthy of being reducec ta saine method or- system ta exite the interest Of the audience -as well. 1Truc, it may Le tbat the art of keeping an audience awake isnot the glory of the Temple of Music, but it certainlY seemal ta bc the foundatiati on which that Temple restsand without which it could not exîst. ,Verb. Sap. . H. H. Kinzett. I'. ~ WHETHER you want du ra bl1e LONGCLOTHS, sheer NAINSOOKS, fine ~ MADAPOLAMS, the very best ~ FLANNELETT ES, SHEET IN.GS, made-up PILLOW CASES ~ and SHIEETS ask for and set \"HOROCKSES\" HORROCKSES name on tesleg For information as ta the neareit store uwre ro. apcue py t agent John F. Ritchie. r,,Si. Catherine .trut West Montwu ronce, ;the poseci saie l you drink. e you Thec iah\"; ~that other Be you cbmba I you as the clu icé ai up on ie aw elow roiug stood e sun- imchng mtint, o it- ai the it for î; tey ng the ed bya",
         "THE WESTERN HOME MONTHL.Y i . NÇIPDavi Llod (eorge sWutt.B fore eWestern Euie Moitbly by H.'D. Ri not be surpsued in anj \"LgÇbh te White i Macetr On Jauar eldest son CE WilliamGO W\"labnational achool Cotton City. His fat rh ysi\u003cýay strong man, on0 ft r is two o mo bis lialt failed sud th that he niut leave thc famlly then vent te coi Wales, at a placmeeu There they took a farm more toied on it. But continue, for the father bis bealth sud bis dea monthsa mter bis renm avoide4- ajiG our vicinu m ue ss .rjA\" vere iiod pomble,\" Evmrbody nPw knows »that it v as the surrender of Bulgau« due tote success of tbe Saonicà expedition, tbat started tbe quick\"rt that ended in the German Bo whe 1vrite tis article and you read it, I amn writing sud you are reading, about ic man te vbom the venld oves su unrepayable debt of gratitude. Maybo yorson àisamie ta-day beeause Lloyd Gerg as at thc bclm in old London. And no person in tbe wvend would be lpoe of that fact tban Mn. Geg hmffor he is a man of thse popl, dffpite Uic unpara4led eminence te vhÏch ho bas attaincd. The story of thse British premier'a life is a ateny that can- David Lloyd The ahove t'a reqarded graph of the British secured. It * as taken when as. minister of w hi\u0026 country intb united reveais hat courage ai nerailed hlm andvi ' mnuch te the Empire ani CANADIAN NORT WUNTER TOURIST PAR' VANCOUVER, VICTC NÀOCrTFHC COAST ID» CALIFOIR Our Agents wil assist yau with your trip, quote lowest fares, secure berti other accommodation-route you o' Canadian Northern-the Iowest altitudE line crossing the Rock je s. CANADIAN NO] THE ROUTE OF EXCELLENCE The Wetern Home M\\oiîtlîlY . .WJsIIuhIlJIIWIIII 'vi a at a chieter.TMûs puinful bapngmat caree was bis visit to Brigadurmg .uM% a great chup àmthe faily o mun -adthe Boer War, wbmm rowdies kUP the Mr\u0026. George bad to look around for a meeting as a \"«patriotic\" protest againat ru.It wu~ then she -turned to her Mr. LloydGeOe' =mm5e1 (It will be brohe, ihrd Lloyd, the vilKremfembered 'how srnl the subject of annscobier f Lanysumdy, t whmz th lis artil a ppsdte the Boer War). Britiuh Empire owes ani mealculable delbt. on 'i ocson one man was kiiled and tale of erc This poor cobbler brougbt the widow and manymud and-Mr. George escaped in ,um\" The eto\u003ey her two sons and installed them m ineisa rpo cen's luniformn. i) bu traveljed the cottage, a littie twostorey residence, with I was a pawky Scotchman, Campbell lies, in tic a shoeinaker's worksbop at the side. Here Banmerman, who gave- the rismng young, it was that the futur'e premier of Brtam W\"l parliamentarian bis opportunity. WelM sent bis boyhood, amid the glorious i the goverinent. Ini 1906, when 'the gowsbom mWelah jnounitains and the sea. (And te- Liberal overnnient was returned with- au. nnnday bis country home ms at Ciccieth, only oerwh=-min majority, Lloyd George y l7th, 18 h one mile from iei boyhOds home). wae madle Président of the Board of T\"ad. 1re m st i As a boyloyd Gerge was very much Though there had been doubte expiésaed ffe m baEs s the mamn as other boys not at al a about bis capacity, it was soon evient ber itw8Sna \"model\" boy, but MÎgý-spirited and that as an administratr le waa a succe». an qi w not misobievous. The one sigu of bis future The Board of f'rade became wbat we oeil lwere bornita ke docter aldbim greatnes was tbat he soaked up knowl- on this sie a \"live\" departmnent, the mSt city stréets. The eg as a spong does water snd was unconventional of ail government depart- Untr life i outh alay at theica of bis clas. Wbcn bis mente. It had been tbrottled in its ed avrodet. sehooldays were over, the question of effectiveness prier te the incursion of Mn. i and for a yesr or qestions te parents agitated the minds of Lloyd George by the reign of General ,tis life vas not to hienotber and bis devoted uncle, \"what Red Tape. In 1908 Mn. Asquith madle sbou DvdbcmV fe uh Lloyd George bis Chanceilor of 'the ad n10ot ~ considration, it-was flnaily dccidcd that Exehequer, wbich office lhe held until the noth follo' Man- the boy sould bc a lawyer. That meant outbreak of the van, and durig hich bie an education and that in turn meant provoked by bis famous Budget the figbt money. Now came in the fine spirit of te a finish with the House of Lords.. that uncle of bis. By scrimping and What hie has donc ginoe the war as: saving the uncle managed te pay the Chancellor of the *xcbequer Minister of boy's way and bis sef-sacrifice eniabled Munitions, and Premier Ui virtual David te stant on bis way te greatness. dictater, not one haif bas yct been teld. More than that. That heroic uncle, an What we do know is sufficient te establish. uneducated man, set bimacif te learn him in the position assigied te bim by Latin and French in order that bie might Lord Frencb, who calla bxm, \"the saviour coach bis budding genius of a nepbew. of the Empire.\" Botb uncle and nephew succded in the There is the story of the man of the hollr. purpose before tbem and Lloyd George A fascmnatiiig story, showmng the power eue. at 21 ycars of age became a full-fledged masterful intensely carnest, hard working solicitor. individual may exert on the life of the Froni that time the young Welsh venldini an heur of dramatic and pro- lawyer neyer looked back. Vcry early in foundly reacbing issues. Why hmB ho bis career thiat audacity and unexpected- achieved such greatness and excrted sncb ness wbich bave marked bim out, became influence. Because of that strange, subtle manifest. At twcnty-flve hie won local clusive quality we cal1 personality, whicb, fame througb bis dalig in boldly attack- he possesses te a marked der. The mg a nuresd lergy i the cause of civil first tbing in bis mental and spiritual and rcigous liberty. By tbe time bie make-up fltting bim for inspiring leader- mis twenty-seven bie was nominated as *bp is bis undou.bted courage, bis in- Liberal candidate for Carnavon Burgbs trepild fearlessness. Even bis worst en- and beat tbe squire of bis native village ies bave neyer doubted bis possession at Uic polils. At Westminster bie, soon of that virtue. The whole stony of bis sbowed that be was not mntending te tread cameer cmpbasises it. It takes courage ta Uic beaten patb, and struck out for him- tackle the greatest man of on's time and self by opposig bis chief, Right Hon. that Lloyd George did as a beardies W. E. Glaatne. Tbis soemed \"rather youngstcr when he tackled Gladstone. like a fox terrier standing up te a lion.\" The manifestation of bis courage appeaed But Lloyd George refuscd te 1be cowed. carly in life, for even as a boy at sachool he It was later, bowevcr, wben tbe, Con- led a revol it t the teacbing of the a George. servative governmeflt was ipawer, that Anglican catecbism sud, led by th*i self Lloyd George gat bis cbance. Vey few constituted leader, the whole sehool 1[as the finest Photo- debater in the House dared te 3eard walked out at catechism time. That vas Pim te Mnistr Joseph Chamberlain, but Lloyd George a good stant. Later, when he bearded a iunitions he arouseLd knew no fear and before long pnoved to an whole bench-full of powenful local ma.g- 1action. The photo amazed House tbat tbe great Birmingham nates and won bis cas, lhe shovea bis which have meant so leii ach n fte mettie and hie stili proves.that bis audacity A its Allies. mot tiknfg incidentsaini bis political and courage are not sleeping. o h Then Mr. George is an onator, one o i finest onatars im Europe. I bave heard most of the greatest British statesmen sud 'n E~ N i~ Ai L A r platform speakers and Mr. Lloyd George 'H E R R A LA is the peer of theni ail for effectivenessaim a popular gatheriîng. (Perbaps under TI EEQ U IP M ENT ongenial circumstances Lord Rosebery is a greater speaker). Mr. George is cloquent, a fine maker of phrases, powýer- __________________________ fui and convincing. And woe betide the man wbo interrupts. There is a stery told of bow on one occasion tbe preut premier was speaking about Home Rule EA ST ERN and had said that lie believed in Home' Rule, for England, Scotland, Ireland and* Wales. \"Whay not for bell\" called eut a' ES C NADAman who bad been interrupting for soue CA N A D Atime. This time hie had gone too fan and quick as a flash came the speaker's reply, own country.\" Co~llapse of interrupter, )RIAC)TOUR S 'aByen may imagine. R Apersonal caateiMcs efn. htlei NIA ithextnsio prvilge ncannily intuitive, makes decisions in- .INI Wih exenson piviege volving tremendous issues in double4tuck on sixty day round trip time, has an aimost American approiich- .winter tikt. ~ability, is a mixture of tendernewan sd ruthlessness bordering on the cruel whena IlS and .principle is at stake, knows the value of ver ue nqure f or aent the press and uses it skilfully, is ver ,ver the nquie ofour gent human and likeable, quite a domesticated ,e, of any and he wilI cheerfully creature, homeioving and fond of nature, furnsh ulipartculrs. a man of action when bis interest is furnsh ullpartculrs. aroused, yet one who flnds it easy te 13e idie, -a m-,n who gets thinga done withoiit diliy-dallying, one bor ta, command and _____________________________________________ be oheyed. I short, lie is a mani for r~ \"I ' n lu 17D ÀA ir E .IT A V jthe treienîlouq times in which ve live. HA SUPERIOR j.creature in 'Auguat and, *Duld at a Z e ould e' aères Of gald lÈrvest. A bene and *h tomed to the j bouse abc iMost hidden Well! SI] ê~prairie, li~ er Iugý off with a \u0026 -\u0026-t viene1 nlved there, eosted lier a i\"Are yen board the te «\"Wc bave replied the damp fingeri \"But imti board any r At that 1 ale this lac 01 don't sec \"Tbat'si au, roughly- extra work; not going t I've bad eu( Miss Mar té stay in even as a gi neyer mind. a1 igl it; if Thse man dwelling, ai Martin, *tire Glancing bel plunge lier she Nwondiereî country ais' vards thse e the door of and, as IfisE ga troop, of stood starii 111 can't replied the 1 than she Il children, an te thé seeni He ives ai yen car e fo \"No, tha: Whso, havinj tenion of t rather star table. She walking mi camte to tIi Here, a r, vited lier ii explî.minedi liaia (for said: '*l'nisoni and I1lias teacher:- hi 1herie to-ilg Iyou round and fiind a lie iere iii Shie calledi golden-lbain iute tihe ro she said t( yeu if vol Mrs. WilIi and hy theî 'a (laiinty, on a spoth The ne atarted ou .new t cache flnding a the liouse of the scho ~ lean-to- teaelers. 1D Pl'",
         "THE WESTERN HOME MONTI4LY ORAMARIN too watThe ah By Mrs. Nestor Noei durimg Up the avamat wilbe ject of . War). ed and iped in inpbefl Yug, rtunity. eà: the withan pèèèed C;vmdent luceués. we eaul e Most depart- in aits of Mr. EeneraI i made Of 'the til the hich he e fight Lords. war as: ister Of virtual n told.: stabliah hm by sayour ie hour. wer one. working tof the d pro- h he ed such ~subtie ', which, e. The is in- ort en- 155ion y of bis urge to ie and 15aress adtone. 6ppeared hiool he SOf the heir siff shool lat wus mrded a ,wea làs audacity ne of the re heard mni and 1 George renss In s umder eorge 15 etde the a *tory preent me Rule in Home' land and* led out a' for somne r f ar and r's replY, p for his lerrupter, cGZrg's ihat he is iions in- ble4luick Ipprch- ness and e when a vale of is very. resticated )f nature, riterest i5 e itout nand and i man for me live. ù. mention lonely Siding, looking anxi- ously abolit lier. The train was not out of sight, and for a few moments she seemed #~tterlya a losa a# sue sat down on lier ailnk. Neyer In al liber life bad suie blee1iin suelis. place as this. City-bred, elaed juat accepted a position as hher in t is prairie district, and e fully expected Borne one to meet lier. euas she looked around, there was not âgreature in sight.' It was the month ofi Agut and, fortunately, the daylight ~la last a long tinte. As fer as the ~e coula reacli, Dora saw endless \u0026etches of prairie, witli acres'and e' aères of golden grain almost ripe for the lÈrvest. A few willows interspersed, bere and there, and, as site got accus- tomed to the place, she managed té espy j house about one mnile's distance, al- ,ïost hidden by the trees. Wel! Slie dia not want'to sleep on ê~prairie, that was certain, so, trust- hier luggage to Providence, she set off with a small handbag towards the -\u0026-ot wbere sue bled seen a liouse. Ar- r ve there, a busy-looking wonan ac- coted lier and esked lier errand. \"'Are you the people who generally ' board the teaclier ?\" asked Miss Martin. «\"We have bad a couple of tlîem lîcre,\" replied the woman, brusquely, wiping damp fingers on lier epron as she spoke. \u003cBut Plu tired of it. I don't want to board any more.\" At titat mioment a man approached. «Is this lady the teaclier ?\" lie asked. 01 don't sec why we can't let lier stay.\" \"That's my business,\" said the womn- au, roughly. I\"It's I who'll ]lave ail the extra work; isn't it? 1 tel you, F'i not going te board any more teachers. I've haid enough of it.\" Miss Martin feit suie would npt care té stay in such a hostile atmospbere, even as a guest; Bo0site said, gently, \"0 neyer mind. 1 exp t 1'1l find a lodging, 811 rigbit; if yul lndly direct me.\" The man expia ined the way to a. dwelling, about a mile off. and Miss Martin*tired as elle was, walked away. Glancing belîind lier sue saw the woman plunge lier hands into the waslîer, and elle wondered if people inatins part of the country aiways did their iaundry to- wards the eveningi A rugi, disheveiled woman opened the door of the next lîouse sile reaclied, and, as Ifiss Martin explained lier wants, a troop of dirty, barefooted cli ldrea stood steriiig up at lier. 'I caî't take a teaclier, Plu sorry,\" replied the woman, wvlo was mucli kinder tlîan sue looked. \"I've a liousefui of chljdren, and no room. Youi'd better go to thé secretary of the sclîoîd district. H1e lives one mile from fher(,. Wouid you car e for a cup of tea first !\" \"No, tliank you,\" said Miss Martin, wblo, lîaving cauglt a glimpse of the in- terior of the bouse, feit site would ratiier sterve titan eat anytlîing- off tlîat table. Site turnied wearily àtway, aiid, weiking mttcb slover thaîi t irst, aSue cainec to the secretary's bouse. Here, a ratiier qiit-looking ,rwomnaflini- vited lier in, and whcn Miss Martin hâa expkf-ined wlîat sile wa'nted. Mrs. WVil- lianis (for such wes the wonanis name) said: '*I'm sorry to say I'rn haif an invalid, and 1 lavin't tbe lîcaltît to board teacher: bujt if you like , uclin Bsiel) here to-lglit and iny lîus;and iili take you roundt( to tile neiglilors to-iiborroW Iand find a boarding-place for you. Jk'i lie liere ini heif an hiotir for stupper.'e Suie clled \"Doris,\" and a pretty fittle goiden-haired clild of aboit six cail into the room. -This is iny onlv ecild,' she said to the teacher. ':Si,..'l talk to you if Vou~il excuse fli.\" 'So saving, Mrs. Williams went into the kitàlien, and bh' the tiîne lier husbîînd returned, 'a daiinty, clean-iooking mient Wvas spread on a spotless oiiclotlî-covered table. The next . morniig M Williams started out to fiîîd a lodging for the .new t cacher; and lie at last succeede« Io 'Üading a temporary homle for her ai the lîouse of Mir. Jones, the ebairmar of the sehool board, on condition that thb * Ieiglbors start ini at once and builad i lean-to\" on to the schooi bouse for al] teaeliers. - ,. i Miss Martin was a prett.y womnan of about tliirty. Her hair was dark and wonderfuiiy tbick, and aile lied Very steady, blue cyes. Site looked so quiet and gente-not et ail as if elle would be liard to please; \"but the trutît of the matter was tîtat the asat tivo teachers lîad been ratlher exacting and oveirbear- ing, and tlîis mude the fermiers' wives afraid to îindertlhke the job of boarding otiiers. Mrs.. Jones hadl one llttle child under scitool age, and slle did not like having a stranger in bier place, above ail a teaclier, because, as sile said: \"Ile scliool cblidren miglit get measies or any otber iiiness, and tiien the teaclier would lie sure to bring thie infection hlonte.\" Titis reason, of course, ee onflded to lier busband ia secret, and slle urged hlm to sec that the building et the sehlool was put up immediateiy, which lie did. So Dora Martin, after two '%eehs' time, tlîinking little of the want of hios- pitaiity ellehal received, settled to s. spinster's life, far f ront uliileasant leîidledies, in lier ýlean-to,\" and, by ber wonderful tact, patience and kindnes, started te Witt golden opinions front, at least., the parents inli er district. But the pupils were not so easily Won. Num- bering oily from ten to a dozen, they were rougît and wild. The bovs were alwvays playing tricks on Miss 'Martin, and the girls giggled thîrougli sliooi- tinte and paid no beed to the lessons. Slîouid Dora ever reacli tlîeir bearte, Bite wondered? Slîe wislied ale could; but lîow?1 There was one girl of about ten, eal- ed Ellen. Site scemed to rival lte boys in xaugltiness; for, Bot oniy was elle up to ail tîhe mischief thet brewed, but se told liss into 'tbe bargain, and was tlioroughiy unreliable. Tiis cbild was Irish and an orpa. Siteliait just conte to stay withî Mrs. Jones, Who, bie- ing lier aunt and lier only living relative, lied adopted lier. boping la tinte to over- coine . the influience of a bid borne and to itîke ber niece as gentle as lier own littie girl, Eva. But the wild Irish lasu did Bot improve, and Mrs. Jones was inclined ho put it down to the teecher. *\"She can't manage lier pupils eit ail,\"9 compleined Mrs. Joncs to bier blîsband one day. 'II declare, Ellen gets worse every day.\" -~Have a littie patience,\" aîiswered lier hushand. -Mise Martin liasîî't beenl here lonîg. Give lier a chiance.\"' ,Miss Martin, to my tlîinking,\" re- plied tuie ife, \"doean't care a fig for thle chlldren. 1 guesa tbe reason aie ecaie ont here wes to find a huslîand. M'tel' good slîe'Il do as a farmer's wife. Tlîey do say Tom Kelly's crazy about lier ai- reedy.\" Mrû. Jones was tiîinking Miss Martin woild mnake any nia a «,()(d wifîý; lut bie was Wise in bis guneration, s0 lit- slut lîimseif ni) belîind bis îatper and let ,tle niissis\" have the lest word. The îîext, day Ellea was uliiusuaily nauglîty, anîd Miss Mertin kept lier in et reccss. The clîild, ifltad of overloo- ing lier lessons was busy fumbling on thke ground. Dora Martin did not see -,VI at slle liedt, as sile lerseif was en- gaged aht te blackhoard; but tite teacher turiied rouind sudfdenly at a lond sereain front Ellen to itd itue cliild envelped n lu a flanie of lighIt. Qîlivk as tiiotiglit, Dora ruBed to- e wîirds a p,,ead pulling down lier ownt v coat, covered Ellen with it and rolled [l ber on the ground- lu a few minutes Ithe fiemes were extinguisbed; but 'lot sbefore botb teeclier and pupil lied suf- efered considersbly. ID )isnîlissing tbhe clldren for the reat '0 Of thte aflernoon, Miss Martin toid the ~,eldest boy to go for a doctor, wliilst Biee Lcarried the child into ber own roont a, nd, bastily disrobing lier, elle rulbed d ail the affected parts witlî vaseline aiud somn, sweet ou wlicb shle waîi fortunete se in havi ng by lier. ke Wblen tlîe doctor came lie said that v Dora lied savedgtbe giril'a ife by ber k'u prompt action, but elle, herself, wvould ýn pot be able te use ber left hand for e Le long fimie.9svstM .Joe e During the doctor' vist Mn. Joae, [icaille riislinig in to se witlidhp pened. Site could- not scold lier niece TORONTO LONDON QUEEC MTAWA HALIFAX MONTREAL AND ALL EASTERN CANADIAN, POUMt The CouanGlo.u n»M.oRull*mye ifbm Uim\" Mvo.tn\"d d US' TeuM Sleepine Cars and unuoelled Diine Car Soue. W. J. QUINLAN, D)iztrict Pag*ngr Agent. Wilbitipig, bMin. Oseral P\u0026qm.er PAaen Winnlpag. Ma. AUM rE FACT THAT AN ARTICLE 18 ADVERTISED IN THE WESTERN HOME MONTHLY MANS THAT T 19EXACTLY WHAT TI 15 EPRE- SENTED TO BE. 4 * \u003c SPECIAL PRVIm r TCIET ON .SALE DECEMBER lst to 3lst",
         "THE WESTERN HOYý4E-- MONTHLY SQJ,1.TAS supple mou\" vwail oveinu loc - e Ibo am tra.n Depeia. hlmsi en\"u 8 »Ml 8..nIrock For Lingerie For'H ats Talce of the trhmng when soiIed and dtp up and clown ini a bowl full of Lux suds-rich, copious. coeamy. Nover rub. Press out the. water. Rinse tarefuIIy and stretch to dry. Your fabrice wilI be fresh, cdean and sheer as when new. The Lux way means econ- omy in fine thinge - it washes theni splendidly. A LEVEmm R OTUERSLINITD. T.n.t. LUX f«r pisyl.p wth mnatches, beesuse, as *Le Martjpoinedoùt, the ohild bad beéa pnUed e bh. o site thanked theteaheras estule could and bcggcd her, though, it. muet be admitted rather \u003eo1dly, te retura with lier ta lier bouse. \"So13hoot had better be suspended for a t -ew weeks,\" said the doetor. «'I will arrange it wtith the trustees. And- 1 strongly advise you ta avait yourself of ,Mms Joues' ofer. Thus yoii witt not be \u0026rone, whieh is always neo bad for any- one in pain; and, brave ais you are, Miss Martin* I know what you suffer, and a buru is a burn-tbere's no getting away from that fact!, Poor Dora.i She could not think what ta say, kniowiug wc'll as sho did that Mrs. Joues was very reluctaut at board- Ikg a teacher. White shte stood hesitat- kng, shes beard the sound of a buggy oubside, and almoat at once a big, stout, good-natured Irish woman rushrod in. \"Miss Martin,\" she said, in hier dom- inant manner, \"bere I amn. Just yau stcp into my rig outside, whist I gather your belanginga. You're comiug la my place without mare ado.\" \"Oh, but, Mrs. Fitzgeratd-\"J expostu- latcd Dora. The woman p aid no attention. Site rushed the teacher's f ew possessions into a bag, rotted things that woutd not fit, ita a bundie, wrapped the~ odd books in nowspapcr, and soon bad the buggy fillcd and the \"lean-ta\" campletety empty. Mm. Joncs tooked rclieved as she weut home with honr troublesome nieco (now very subdued aud cnying). \"I bad ta ask her here,\" she expta.iucd to ber husband, when talking about the teacher. \"But Pi' glad she didn't se- copt. My bauds are fuît ouough with a sick chutd on thein.\" \"There'd have been no childi,\" ob- senved the husbaud, drity, \"if the teachen bhadn't saved it. at the risk of bier own tife. ,Ah, wotl, I gucas she's att right wihMn. Fitzgerald.\" Mr. Fitzgerald welcomcd poor Dora wlth ait an Irishman's hospitatity: \"'My misais and 'I wene away at the timo you came,\" hoe totd lber. \"Other- wise you'd neyer have speut the flrst night, tramping all over the country for a lodgiug.. And, front this day ou, as I totd my missis, yoxn stay right here. And no returniug ta that dull 'lean-to' at the scboot. We've two chitdreu, and one persan more in the bouse wiit neyer count. You agree with me, don't, you, Mail?\" lie asked, turning ta bhis wife. \"You bot your life,\"- answered the -woman, with more force titan ologance. \"How would we like it if aur -owu chul- dren had ta rustle a living and no one would give themt shelter? As I said be- fore, a district which can't make a crea- ture at, home somnewhere, ffas no rigbt ta bave a teacher. Now, Miss Martin, we're not veny welt off, and the place is none too well furniished, but what, we bave is yours, and you just consider .yoursolf as at home here as if, the bouse was your own. That Mrs. Jones ought ta bc ashamed of hersoif,\" she added, turning ta bier biusband. \"I heard bier invite Miss Martin, in that stand- offish mannen of hiens-just the way ta inake a persan say no.\"' Miss Martin laughied, oven though lier paonhbands were hunting badly under their bandages. \"At anv rate,\" she observed, 11 can'i say yau invited mea that way. You just carried me off by force. Oh, low shall 1 ever thank you Y\" \"By saying no more about it,\" said Mrs. Fitzgerald. \"But by coîning ta table and sltowing me you can do jus- tice to aur pon fare.\" * But the ]tain and eggs, pancakes and synup, hot potatoes, naspbernies and creani, did not cofistitute, what miss Martin called \"pIoor fane,\" and site did amtple justice to it, not only tîtat day, but for the rest of liter stay wvit1î tli kindly, Irish famnily, and it was front that house, thîît a few montis laten, slte îtiarried Touti Kelly. Antd, as for lier hititerto unmnanage- ale pupils-well-frnnîthe day tlîat Dora savvd littie Elletn's lîfe, the» rouit, Untnilv boy~s 'ieNved thein teaciter ini the ligit *of a litroitte, and, bx' a st rang loyalti' often seen in 1boys, thev Siuled itencefortht witlt lier. înaki .ng tlie reniain- der of bier stay at the scîtool a pleasant oue, And on liter wedding day thîey pre. Sented lier wvith a liandsomte presvent: \"Front a sehiool where lier kind- ness would be even nemembered.'l Witt A CALL FOR CANADIAN UNITY Sir William Hlearst, Prime Minister of Ont. rn N the confidence and tbsnkfulness of victorYj-in that natural and joyous rebound that lias foliowed Our being relieved of the weight that bad been pressing on our anxious hearta durmng these fur ominous years of war-we are, perbape inclined ta, forget the perils and horrors we have escaped. Camparatively speakingz, it wu only yesterday that the shadow of Prussian militarismn caat its gloami over the smilin farins and peaoeful homes of pur fair Canada. Nothing stood between the Hun andthe ruin of our Empire, our civilization, and our liberties, except the brave men who souglit ta istem the flood of savagery in France and Flanders. Tbsnk God, that living barrier held im againat the fearf ut onsiauglit. - in these happier days it is weil for Canaians toremind.themselves seriously and often of the leavy price that was paid in order that Canada iniglit live and miglit rematl Britishi. In p. very resi and solemn sense the glorlous heritage of the ricli and beautiful country, whicli is Ours t\"âY lias been bought for us with the life blood of the bravest and best of Canada's soldier sons5. To-day Canada stands on the tbreshlod of a new and, 1 beliove, a better and a more gtorious ers, of progress and developmont than we have ever known. We must beware lest the glamor of the inmmense material possibiities that seom ta lie aliead blind aur eyes ta, the uecessity of cu4tivating those nobler and toftier virtues which atone will make us worthy of aur heroic dead. Neyer was tljpre a greater neod than to-day for Canadian men and women ta have thoir Îouls aflame witli the loftiest patriotism. Many prob- terne and difficultios confront aur country. If these probleme are ta be satisfactority solved, and these difficulties .urmounted, a strong national consciousness is essentiat. Lot patriotism wipe out every division that hinders Canadian development. Let us, whatever be aur mother race, serve this aur country of Canada with something of the devotion of the brave souks wlio have \u003cied for lier. Fearlesaly lot us discountenance every a.gdid selfish thing that woutd sully the fair naine of Canada, which aur hernie doad have written in lettons of gotd on the serait of famne of the nations of the earth. Surely the heavy sacrifices made by the horoes who have made the name of Canada iminortal demand that nothing shall be countenanced in this country that is alien ta, the letter and spirit of the Britishi constitution, the BitishFlag, and Britishi sentiment? The hope of the future of aur country lies in the patriotic co-oporation of ail classes, inspired by the consciousness of the greatness and dignity of Canada's destiny as a nation, and seeking not personal or sectional advantago, but rathéit the welfare and advancemont of aur beloved country. Sir Robert Falconer, President University of Toronto M R the first time in five years we are able to greet one anothen in the aid way and wisli anc anothen a Menry Christmnas and a Happy New Year. The black nigltof war lias gone and its' liorror is now but a memory. Out of ik, lowever, stili corne sorrowî for the thousands of the friondi af those wbo have fallon or wbo have been wounded and have suffored some disability. Thoglitheedg o thse ornws ii be'om ba ken s the years p as, the wll lwys emtnwit tis enraiontaremndusof what we Cvo gonethrugh.At he ame ime hes sorowswillho epred with pnide becuseoftheliroim f 'hih teyareth contrpat.The sorrow and thesarifceandth linosm reailpemanntposesion wich niake us as Candias bote peple ad wic wil ft s t fce hetasks of humanity Wit anler org. ostak r owtom u eoeus. We need the same onengy, the anme pluck, the same patience ta prform. tliese tssks as aur people exhibited during the war. We naw must recognize, as we neyer did before, that right is rigbt, and that if a nation goos an constantly in the wrong way for yoars, even though it builde up an imposingfabric, that fabric rests upon unsound foundations, and in time it must came tumbling down, even thougli as in this hast war it required heavy blows ta aventurn the (Jermian structure. It is ta hoe hoped that we Canadians have tearncê, the bisson that the prosperity of any people must be based upon nîgliteousuesea. E W. Beattie, K.C. President C.P.R. UHE leas Canadians talk about Est and West, tlie botter. Ever since Confederation we have been anc Dominion, and fnom' Nova Scotia and New Brunswick to British Columbia and the Yuk~on the interests of the whole people have been really idontical wbetber those intenesta are nominaily those c)f the fanmer, of the transportation company, cf the merchant arn cf the manu- facturer. The war bas made us '.more than ever anc. Tbe Canadiani soldier in Franceoro Flandens is flgbting not for a Province or for an interest, but in onder that Canada rnay retain the blossings cf fneedom. Those cof us who bave not been able ta go ta, the Front should remembor this and shoulci also keep before thcm an ideal-not mnerci y to p rave tbemsetvei efficienît ini their partieular work or business and fgh for their awn ex- clusive interests, but ta belp to make Canada the boit country in the world in which any man, woman or child eau live. miha Ini, 1As a b à,àsyet ho success u.ta penn Il.lof bis fg ~ny imply Sot appreciat4 laancialysi *\u0026verinly to Mns, and on 'Iment. tiH was not *iink I amn s Q*l two sOUE Us ten-year-o] le had lbat l *oi young, mne ta snioot] sud ta help hi ing of everydi *At the ag linderstood,' a Mun had reahi .......... 1 e t. s I I e i I I fulfilment Of a tired man- jidrments tt of he hrtcc: tined abave a basements à from the finit binds in the sulent places, moiat mas uuderbrusi;] set and the above allihe the Great Iâ concenned hi faced, langui the childho limita of the i Was ta5sS bain tossed s an a half-wi the stnuggle Ro had o about mon whoim the strong as th himself with fonesaw the tion. No M ta understar ships. lie ha condescendin lave or even So ho pari circle. His nulionaire, transatjin his place. A cnough, and away secret stea.th!î, ta ti",
         "THE WEsTrERN HOME MoNTrHLY \u003er rail Saint Written for The Western Bomne Monthly By H. Mortimer Batten ME was a nervous, highly-strung happy knack of epeaking bis UImnd, snd who imagined the As a busines anestas not a i A a dbsi Le asn e w t a n , et Le amassed a fortune. Rie was jsuccess because Le madIe no sllow- '~mfor the weaknesees of is feilow-men; \"= hsee could not tolerate at any pniee rriayfoiblds of humsnity; because dneyer learnt, and neyer would tpermit tbe everyday shortcom- ofis fellow-creatures. 11e matIe y smply on account of Lis sterling itics, wbich were known only by is tfiends, and which even they did Wt appreciate f ully. 11e was a sucesw juancially simply because Le stuck ur- *\u0026vering y t. the prescribed path of busi- Mnra, andI on account of is sound judg- 'atnt. ., e was not a popular man; in fact, I *iink 1 am safe in saying that Le Lad c*l two sound friends on God's eartlh- hlm ten-yesr-oltI dsugliter antI ber canar-y. lb had bat Lbis wife wheu both of tlacm «nr young, and so there Lad been no mse t. smooth down the jagged corners sud t. help iin to a t.lcrant understand- ing of cveryday 11e. *At the age of thirty-three tLis mis- undertood, and misunderetanding, little Mau Lad realizod enough for the possible iallyie antI ia little daughter went qityaway in the early bours of the morning lest the neigLbors should try to make a fuse about it. It goe witbout eaying .that s0 astute a business mnan had is plansecut-and-dried. There was Borne land bordering a lake wbich was one of the imany lakes dotted with countlces fairy islande, fat froin the noise and tumuit of the aouthern world. At present titis land was.the property of the great railway companies of the north, antI they advertised it as \"beyond the spoilt ares.\" lRe went t. seeit saw ,and was overwhelned. The wondriul silence, the sunsets over the water the atnno- speeof pesce and the ragrace of blaspokeof une dreain at any rate realized. So Le bought the vast lake Inargin at an exôritant price, snd tl.en, t. is dismay, discovered that slready there wus a settler there. il 1 Corbit Welle Lad lived on the border of Loon Lake for five y eas.11e Lad no esrthly rigitt to live there, but Lie \u003cid not Came. The railway companies Lad tbret- ened t. eject in, but, knowiug they would neyer trouble actually t. do so, Le continued t. emoke vast quantities of \"Blue Jacket\" aud t. live in peace. 11e wass not an ambitions, nor even a sys- tematie man; Le was subjected t. ail the )nt. atural :é the theseE et the 9king, thing M id our ery in P anat iously it byve orious i been tldier better 3 ever iities thoseà eroc n and prob- to be ttional L thatM serve M 3 Boula selfish M 1 Lave naine n thisà m, the 'ation- lty of atagei yof Ler inm andI a ad itâE Come tfallen Lbity. e asa, e have i prîde 1w and us as nanity e need tasks as we itantly mbCg rertuflj Ever Ifrom - relly of the manu- nadian terest, a of us da and nselves wfl ex- in the . 1 fulffilment of is drean. 1He was hv tîten a tired man-tired of the constant mis- juidgmente tbat Lad beset is life, tiredi of the shortcomings of the business world; tired above ail of the Luge, electrieally lit basements in which Le Lad carried on froin the firt. Hie loved the sunehine, the birds in the tree, antI the damp aud sulent places, fragrant with the scent of mosttrmos ansd of the flowers in the underbrush; Le loved the crimeon of sun- set and the grey of the morning, snd above al L e lovcd the wide horizons of the Great Lakes. AntI is highest ideals concerned is littie girl. She was apale- faced, languid littie creature, typical of the chiltIhootI reared wthin the confined limita of the suburbs, and i igest ideal wus to sec her golden sud brown, Ler hait tossed about lier forehead, mountcd on a Lalf-wild cayuse, sud rcjoicang in thte struggle for msastery. Hie had other ideals. Hec had read about men wlîo have partuers, antI in whoin the bonds of comnradeship are Strong as the love of life. Hie pictured himself with sucli a partuer, but bitterly foresaw tlhe impossibilit.y of titis realiza- tion. No mnu, ithert., had corne near to understanding im, andI what f riend- aips lie Lad known werc of the cool eondescending type, without the t.uch of love or even fariliarity. So Le part.ok himself froin the active circle. His business he soltI to a young iillionaire, andI no one knew of the transaction tilI they found anotiier in is place. As for hie home, it was simple enougb, and aîl that it cotained Le gave away secretly, and with ahane-f aced ste.ilthî, to the poor of the neighborLood. weaknesses of carnate flesb, but Le waB as ope,, as the skies, sud generous as the sunashine. On the whole Le waà sober except when, on occasional visite t. town, the atmosphere of eociety blew ini the oposte direction, sd e became appal- rigly drunk. Five years ago Corbit Wells Lad scrap- pe up\" winter shelter on the shores of L .aKe. 11He Lad donc well with ie traps, wiltI fowl Lad become plentiful in the spring, and later, by mneans of hait- nets andI lines, le was able each day to despatxli a goodly catch of live fisL to thte southern cities. Next winter Le again did well with hie trapping, and in the spring the wild fowl came north in count- leus millions. As the season grew slsck Le pulled tIown is ehelter antI built a coinfortable cabin, and, proud of is work. took pains t. keep it decent. 'He construet- ed s garden, bought rose trees froin Tor- ont., madIe S gravel walk antI a floating landing stage. GorbitWelis Lad neverpossesed a partrier but long Lad lie dresait of one. H-e hankered under the opinion that, with a Upartner, Le could \"make things go.\" Each montLh le visited the group of straggliug shanties witla itb store and blind pig joint they calletI the city; each month Le gave al L is spare nickels to the children on the sidewalks, was bled by is friends, antI generally exhibited is inability as a man of business. Hie bank manager antI bis clergyman discuseed wh m the advisabiity f taking unt. Imcf s wife who could mnage affaire aud mildly itimated that, unies. Le puIlle im9elf together, hie would find Lnself without the wherewithal to buy false . 1 ..llulflllllmlltlli:nlllllllllmlmm»,Converging teeth and crutches. And Corbit, drernng still of that great psirtnerahip, whieh Le adno paticLar esson t tink 'he would eerele, fully agreed a ith tLem, and let bis golden opportunities drift by. The newrs feli like a boit front the Mlue. The railway company Lad sold the pro- 'rty to a wealthy southerner, wlo was building a mansion on the south sut te of the lake, and whlo pcssessed a stîcng aversion to company of any kind. The littie mn uwhoLad cmrne 'withbIe cLild from the southeru aty waaI1have forgotten to mention, a red-haired, red- bearded man of meagre, countenance and inild blue eyes. On that firet joýrous day of sropeciLe saw Corbit a cabin, withtssteakof amoke rising strgight skywards, and lie was annoyed. When h le Iearned that Corbit sxnoked cigars for which lie Lad owed the blacksniith, quite un ecessarily five dollars for two years, an that lie Lad even been under the influence of liquor (evidently two per cent beer), the city mian decided that Corbit must go.1 Corbit received on official letter t. that effect, pondered over it, decided to take no notice of it for the present, and flnaily loat it. Somne miles fromn the woodsnisn's cabin wa.3 a \"sait lick,\" adjacent to whicL wasi always to be scen a herd of deer. Ai spring and summer Corbit laed devoted Lis time t. taming these deer. H1e Lad an ides in tine lie might, Le able to induce the pretty ereatures t. eat out of Lis hand, and many and costly were the \"deer-dopes\" lie tried in anticipation of this consummnation. But always, on Lis arrivai the deer would knot int. a Lerd whcn Lie was Lalf a mile distant, remain thue ti liLe wss within eighty yards, then scatter. That day, on approacbing the \"sait lick,\" Lie wss astounded t. eee Lis tame deer alresdy herded, while they were Lauing down tLe south shore of the laite instead of t.wards hum. They ueemed uneay and reétive, and, even as Lie won- dered a rifle sLot rang out. The Lerd siniply eplit up like an H. E. sheli, but beLind tLemn they lef t three of their number. One was flnished, another tried to ise\u003e and its kneeand fell a an the thîrdstood still for the space of te seconds, shuddering and ogn, then stumbled away. Corbit remsined Lidden. At his huart, wMs murder. Clear it was that moire \"sportsman\" of the type lie knew no well1, Lad fired int. the brown of the Lerd. -Bdlt the \"sportsman\" did not apea, and Corbit wonderint and angry, flnil stMole up and clubedt e two dying ones whoae besutiful lives Lsd been Ïhattered out of them t. no benefit of mn or bemat. The cty man Lad always loved the J)irdseandbeata of the lakes and foreots, though Lie Lad seen precious little of thein. The sight of tLat great wild region set his pulses*tingling with the anticipation \u003c\u003ef thte cLase, and thait afternoon, otarting out in tbe Lotel dory, Le Lad taken a sporting rifle with Lim. Seeing tLe deer fromn afar, instantly that mad thrill of discovery, which every hunter knowe so weli, lespt int. Lis heart and t.ok possession of Lim. 1He waa no longer a quiet-eyed little city man, but aswild beaet on the prowl- beset in whome soul was no desire but t. kill and t. des- troy. With tthe little girl trumbling at Las Leele le lealpt asLore, and, bidding ber he sulent, together they \"stalked \" full in the open, thc watching Lerd whilcL orbit, ail unwittingly, Lad fuily trained for sncb a fate. TLe reader knows what Lsppened. He Las seen--and so did the city muan. For fully a minute Lie waited, while the amoke' died front bas rifle, and Lie LianScf crouched lower-lower in the undergrowtb. Wa.s this tbe end of the cLase-titis the crowniug glory? Threp heautiful creatures 1tortured out of existeuce-atumbling and bIood' amidst the wild flowers they Lad Tie city mnu owered sway. Over and 1above ail 8tood the law. Neyer in Lis life Lad Lie broken tLe law, but now hie rea- lized that the lsw forbade the shooting Of these lovely tbaugs uniess one pomSmsed ai license. ]-e possess no licenw,, andI fearful andI excited Le crept bsck to Lis dingey, terrified that Lie Lsd been meen. But in tbe night tossing on a reutema p illow, Lie decidr thàt Lie must buy a liceuse andI ronfess to the forest rangers. Hie who Lad neyer (lone a dishonorable 1thing tlîroughout the precarious proceo ()f building up a fort une, could flot tolerat e Staples a1ways i Stock ,Crocks, Jugs, Flower Pots, Glass, Table, Berry and Water Sets, Lan. terns, Lamps and Lamp Sundries Cnasimdy' Limitid,' WINNIPEG These lines are procurable from ail the leading Jewelry, Hard- ware and Departmental Stores throughout Western Canada. Nomnade of the Shetlands Cassidy Importers and Manufacturers Royal Crow n Derby, China Elite Limoges Dinnerware Japaniese Fancy' China Elite Cut Glass*",
         "THE WESTERN HOME MONTHLY tih thlt of duaudingho thie Isiel of lLe gaxah It was thetolo mmarnmg. Cbit, viii\u003e ae ind\u0026a au caity a 409' 01 i iediTri t mtin Lis ':busOii sd a cotton vet st lthe door of hI mblu. It vua late autumu, but the. umildboust did not -mm sta -trouble bim sMi\u0026i At bi lbow wus a glassof non- doshuho vise, bwe. out of huckbe- = gDwt hd lie inthe.hope af IsL SeO DaSZMo but Le Lad monboom a\".ta keep it long enough. At thé * ba g ln P;gstgbelaw, a __ __ e bo hilsdoey.Hé was a usd-hid, rd-erddlittie imau af ,e counltenace, \u0026Bd vithi hxmle brought a girl-chld, whoee facewus r its er1yacquired btan. Corbit. eýermb--me sared rudely. The little iman moumled aowly, pauming trois lime ta lime ta pander, appametly, on t1w beauty of the view. \"Gobod morning, Mr. We\u0026l.', \"8momnîsg. Have a drink?\"y \"Thanko,ý no. 1Ido not drink.\" Il vwu on Corbt'a lips ta ssy, \"Go to - tient\" but Le restmiained bimnSei. \"0f courus,\" Pursued th ii. loinu \"liaiD o partcular liurry for you ta tMr. Wells. At your own convexiiexice. Eh y ow uaconvenience.' =obtagulped down ahuge drauglit ot hie home brwed liuor. 'Igo to-mor- mou\" ha snapped, s.a ibi lips. He had tel leutesIintention of doing 80. \"'No liurry,\" repealed the littie imsu. ThS ookig ondbim 5t the go1g80ii ezpsnae of lake, isasd, and joolmd 1 heye added: \"«Nioe Place tiIs Andplety otfgame, bool Deer lu abun- dance. I1sa a hle herd yesterday. 1-1-P» Carbit utared. The, utile mn bowed. The cLld, having leaut 1h. rudiments of avifity frais a housekeeper, wext up and offeod lier baud. Besides, she bad rather tdaéna liking ta tIbIs alf-dres., bronzed woodanan, ho au far bad takennot the le\"a notice of lber. Corbit stsred at the sinall white hand --mthle au\"i fragile face smiling up aI hirm. Soeehow it remiuded inn of a flower that Lad sprung froin amidat lhe under- bush,-sud only jusl caugt the. sunahine oi day. He took the amuIl hand, and, uncoMseous of 1h. fact liaI lie was e- tannît, lie answered: \"Yes, some top fred inta th. brown of my lame herd, aud 1 guess 1 should't have ta search far for him. As for you, air,\" and he toak aff bis bat with old world decorm, \"I wish you good day!\" The. big mnuoaIthe woods watched, ubile 1h. tua suutered back la Ibeir boat. He noticed liat bath of them werc wearing lite preservers af the kizid made ta strap ta the siouldersthbougi tbey woro thein sîrapped clunily about their waists. Il brougil a new lin. af thougit ta Corbit'a mind, sud perhapslie amali ul\u003ewhle baud i. had ecently held Lad no littlo to do withiti. \"MII\" le shouted, \"baak out for squalls! Loona went south yestemduy. Sie'll sure blow bard and cold the next ten boums.\" The. utIle maxi turned, and, bowir.g pursued ils way. Combit watcbed them tili they were far ouI, tien it occurred to in that lic would Lave biscuits for lunch, and he %vent inta the. cabin. He lit the slave, but acarcely was il goiag wien, as a firàt signal af ululer, tie amake blew back in a choking pufsud fflled thie room. Corbit was in tie act af swarming up ta add thie extension t thie ciimney pipe ulien i. betiaught hiasseif af tie dory. 11e glanced acroslie lake, and saw tiat a dozen different catspaws played ducka and drakes withitis surface. Next instant, standing on tip-loe la peer above tie lamaracks, he aaw tic dory--saw -the, mn wi1h tie oars was in difficulties and likely tA b. swarnped at any marnent. Corbit tld himself that thie oulfit could \"igo hang,\" but nevertieless it was notice- able liaI lie dropped lie ciimney exten- sion iu double quick lime, and, like aj î3tarlled bear, made for tie creek. Corbit leapt upon his own slender birchbark, anc hand on itier gunwale,, sending lier ricochetîing f ar out into the lake by tie impetuLs af bis rush. In thie narth-west black elauds had collected, the wind %vas frc.sbening, and there w.sas taste of snow ini tie air. Uîîder suc! conditions Corbit would never normalh11 Lave headed for open water. but th tauci of a srnall soft hand ini bis w:is stili tresi in bis mnemory, and be reea-lled hav. ing notieed ti dustnient of thc lifc bell, wiich meant certain death. Bc kneit inttie steru of bhs cauo, A bows high out of the waler. When bce camei up witlithe otii erst chi1d was floating1 on thie surface thirty paces away, buoyed up amîdampo, but Uir iiesd under water TU mmn Lad managed uomelow ta id himasitofI is bell, aud, Laving lbatthle child, was smaking futle endeavors atE diving. It might bave been idiculoust Lad il ual been Iragie, for ail the turnei bis head was under water, aud bis handa groped for lie'bottoin af the lake, eighlyi teet away, a portion af is persan was1 above the surface.4 Corbit made for lhe child, got steru on,1 sud by means of a delicale balancing feat lifted her aboard . He shouted ta the maxi tbat the. cbid was sale, and ordered hlm ta ciuç ta tliêcapsized dary, which the. man did. Tien for oncq Corbil.overestiniated Lis abilities. He ancied he could paddle strongly. enougli ta taw the caozddor againal the wind. H1e made fast wti lhe tethemlng rape, but only ta find hlnsel in danger af swamping. Then he eut the rope, and cried talthe maxi wha was slill dlingiug ta the dory ta came acroas. \"If you try ta dlimh aboard l'Il brain you with a paddle!\" cried Combil. There was no answer but a glanoe of infinite cantempt met his ow-n. \"You paddle- F'R push ,\" muttered lhe cily man between clenched teeth. They tried it-watching lhe shore.. For a ie hy iniagined lhey were gamInngg lien- the gale se.med la take possession af the rail craft. \"She's freshening up same!1\" cried Carbit, roaring ta make himself hourd. \"She's \"Try uow,\" ssid mani thin lthe watem, aud b. fingera loosened their gip upon the gunwale. In a moment Le wau gone. Away in the blind pig joint of that 1roup of shantieswbich Corbit cailed ,th. City,\" a xiumber of mnen drank and san sudctÛled each allier by naines of endearmeut, which weme ofteu unspeak- abie. Yet they were dlean sud great men, these. One was a Hudson Bay factor, who, with the treeze-up, would parlake hinmelftot the untrodden regions with God's stars as Lis guides. Theme were biow-holes and wolves sud malIen ioe on the way. Another was a foreat ranger; a Ibird a trapper who hunted a regian no other white mani ever penetrated, andd 80 on down the ist-men of th. silent places, pri nces af the universe. They said: 'Yes the littie quittem's bougltihm out, but f~ guesa Corbit wilI fix hlm O.K.\" Away in a New Yamrk cily, jusl off the dust and turmoil of a famaus avenue, a gro p f t men sat talking and w nder- ing: \"L ti so, aid they. \"H e thinks hecnsheof civilizalian and take ta th. wildl We'll see hlm back li les than a year.\" The litîle man in the canae peered over the edge, plunged bis hand under water, and held. \":Il's ual y au wha has ta go,\" he cried; £dit' me. This i my show!\" \"'Don'l be a foal,\" muttered Carbit îhickly and weakly. \"The kid-the kid -I can'ý look after her. She's yaurs. Gad knows she's yours!\" But as yet the struggle had scarcely Vie Kindergarten Class of a Western i ndian Schiool. going to hlow ten thousand devils before1 wc gel asiore!\" The little mnigoaned. \"l'm only dcad weigt,\" hoe said presently. 'vc got cramps lun my legs.\" 'lTial sol\" billowed Corbît. Be know they %vere absolutely and completely up against il.. Bis eyes were on the cbild in thc slow! y filling cana., and al lie wild, dare-dcvilmy af bis nature, wiicb long ago had led bîm ouI inla Ibis advcnturaus region awoke within hin. \"Take a spd,\" lic ordered. \"Tmy ta keep hiem nase in, and l'Il lielp yau.\" Tien, of aIl unheard of things, hoe stood uprigit lu inte rockinig eanoe-slood up- ighand leapt, lainchimg himselb mincn direction, andl tic cana., nase foemost, against tic wlud. He came up alongside tiec ity man, and clutcied tic guuw-ale \"Clii abord-lIl help you!\" lie ordered. \"You paddle--VIl pusi.\" -. Tic little nman starcd athiim. \"No!\" hoe answercd. *.fl aini'l up ta you. This is îIW show. Cii aboard yourselî.\" Corbit 's w-et eves opcucd ide in sur- 1prise. \"Il ain't yvtî and nie!\"'lho bellowcd. \"if's tic kid! C;et :d'oard quickV'' For twcnhy minutes tbey foughit, m-hile tie frecziîîg wl,îd gathered in strength, andthti water :around tie edgc of tie eanoe took on that metallic click suggest- ive of the formation of cat-ice. Corbit wvas hatigiiig a dead m-ighit be- hinid. Tic littie mnu sank over lus paddle. \"' lal in,\" lie said. 4'Gitess this is the e1(!, Tirien. witlî a uifle nioqnu. he recalled the child at ils feet. raised lier inhils iais caressed hier, kissed lier forcliead. begun, and iow il ended la beyond human conception, W. know only liaI lie littl. man pol Carbit aboard, snd liat some iow, il must have been boums inter, liey lunded on tie opposite shore af lie lake, a dozen miles distant, anid put up ah one af Corbi's sielters noar ta lie \"sait- lick.\" We know only liaI aI Ibis point Iresi nîcat was awailing tbem, and liaI, ah ail ovents, tiey pulled lirougi, wilci la thieonly tlbmg liaI matten4 lu tie north. A week later Corbit held out a sick man's baud, looked m tictheeyes aI bis little cityîmiend, and said-\"Partner!\" And\u0026 lite itcîy man, shoaping over iim, cried aloud-\"O Partner! Partner! I amn glad-3,es-glad!\" And searciing Corbil's face, tie city man knew tint ho was understood, while lie big woodsman passed bis coarse fingers tirough a ciild's hair and mut- tered: \"Guesasbch'll learn la be a pastry cook, parîner. We'll find ber no end useful-you aud me.\" Do Children Understand By Mms. Nestor Noci flow many times do we ask ourselves tuis qulestion: Do the chidron really understand? I tlîink 'that, given a ehtild of average intelligence, ho undersztands a great dcal Imore thian we give hlm crKdit for. And this is one reaisoîî wliv nothers should tnlk more to thieir chilîdren tian hhev do. [t u s 8 easy for a mother to give a few, curt orders and then leave the children to their play. Soon a slap foilows the. orders, and perbaps a few blows, because: \"Hobby is s0 disobedient.\" Weli, 1, for one, neyer did nor neyer wili believe in mororal punishinents. If the mother.- took the time and the trouble to explaixi to Hobby why he must not do so and sa, the boy would, Probably, turn out quit. docilek, Children ame not machines. Their littie braina are always worldng, inteffigently. Nor la what we cail their \"naughtiness\" really euch. It la very often merely a desire to find out something in this world of wonders, where they find them- selves. If there were no inquisitiveness,, there would be no search for knowledge, no new discoveries. If the youný boy \",wghta to see the wheels go round, why nal give hlm an old dlock or an aid watch and et himsee and satlsfy hirnaelf 1 Some parents talk too freely on certain subjects in lhe hearing of their children, because they asslume, very wongly that the littie ones do not udrtnd. A child may grasp a thing, in part.. just tbrough listening 'te the \"grown-upe.\" And a partial knowledge may do great harm; for there is real truth in the saying: \"A litle knawledge la a dangerous lbiug?' Thereforew should be very careful howwet mki the presence of aur chil.. dren when we cansider the turne right ta, enligliten them on ai matters, bLeu and tien only, should they hear the whole truth, properly explained by a mother who knaws how ta p t Mbt simple, easy language just what i l right hem chidren shouid know. If a mother thinks hem child neyer understanda 'inything, just let her try to remember that child's brigit sayings, from lie age of tbree and upwards. A stupid child has no \"bright saylngs,\" y.1 mest mothers quote wilh pride what Mary and Robby said aI a very tender age. It la strange bow praud we were of aur child's first* gleam of intelligence; haw we were, aurselves, the fimst ta paint aut ta \"Daddy,\" 40aW \"Rab y underatands,\" and how, when tie little mite reached the age af twa and a haif, we said with truc maternai pride: \"Mary underslands eveything now.\" But lh. years went an, and Mary passed f rom babyhaad ta child- haad, and later ta glrlboad, and w. remarked slightingiy, as we taiked ta aur neighbars: \"O, it's ail rigil, Mary daesn't understand anything!\" Are w. bas praud of aur affspring as they grow up, thal we are ever ready ta assume, sa carelessly, that they arelacking in ordinary intelligence? know how muci ber chijdren underslund. This. she will nover know, union sie mixes with them, and plays witb hemn. Pemiaps that la wby an o0ly child lu allen more intelligent than one in a large bamily. The only cbild is spoken to more allen until il becomes a real cern- panion. But pople with large familles ougit ta find lime ta have \"roueala\" witi their ciildren, even if il ho only for hall an hour oaci evening before bedtime. Tics. \"Home Tulks\" will romain sacred ta tie memory of lie children, lu allezr ycars. wben tbey liemseives, have grown up and assumed lie esponsibility af parenhood. We, parents, have no right tathbrut childmen inte lie world aud tien let lion shifth for tiemselves. W. are careful enaugi of their physical well-being; but tieme are limes wien we Say.:44Uy it's ail igil. She'll learn that wien she MOff ta sciool,\" and we tirow aIl responsibiliY an lie teacier. Yel, we must knaw tiaI tieme are lossons whici only a matier eau teach, lier, are greal ltruths of lif. which il siould ho a motbem's sacmed duly te impamt, ierself, ta hem child. And if a child dos not undersltand, tien il la lie motier wio should watci for lie \"DaWW\" and be ready, at lie correcet moment, to help ber ciild's understanding and ta lesd il in lie rigil pali. O, moliers! Be very careful iow you talk lun lie preaenoe af your ciildren; for they do undcrsllfld far, far more than you think they do; and you would ho sorry ail your lives if you found tint misciief had been done' just througi vour cameless way afI ling in front of them. If you cannot guide lie conversation arigit, better bave lhe roorni-hi vour chilidren, and you 'WM1 ,ýcnd lie lime more iolily and more profltagbly tian you w-ould bave donc by indulging in 1dle gossip! 55. , .- 6 -. a 44 *1 In 4 The Domi TI Fami CHI] Wha tio-i differe' but an of an But T the i the foi extrý for g ils p~ si TUE Gli TI plen \u003c irereni ig ltei NA'-1E A We-.tcma 'i",
         "THE WESTERN 1I-,OME MONTHLY ~de#Aakiy9a~l ~ The Booký In 4 Langages ive a few, e childreii )Ilows the , because: r0j1 1, for Smother. to explaixi heir littie efigently. ightiness\"; merely a ýdthtl* sitiveness, nowledge, roung boy id,' Why Wl watch ef 1 on certain r children, ýn1, that part. just mwn-upe.\" rdo great Lhe saying: )Us tinig.'y ry careful f our chil- Lime right Lters, then hear the ned by a ~ tinto wt it is hld neyer er try to yings, from A stupid ,yet moet ;ender ae vre of our ence; how ) point out lertands \" te realhe a said. with iderstands rs went on, od to child- 1, and we lked to our ,it, Mr A=ew they grow ta assume, lackmng in possible, to Lmderstand. unless she with them. ly child is e in a largo spoken te rge famille 'real taika\" bo only for re bedtime. nain sacred m, in afteoz have growfl nsibility of t to thrust en let them are careful -being; but n: \"l, it's en she COff ponsibilitY must know ly a mother uths of life sacred duty . And if a on it is the bhe \"DaWfl\" moment, te and to lesd thers! Be he presçfloe understanfd îk they do; our lives if been dond, Y of talkwg annot guide er leaVe the rid you w*i ,and n'ore ive done by Of THE CHILDREN'S ENCYCLOPEDIA 10,000 EDUCATIONAL PICTURES 350 Color Plats: Answers Every Question a Child Can Ask Why is ice slippery? Why is the sea neyer stili? Can a plant see? ~What are eyebrows for? Why does niilk turn Our? Why is snow white? Which is the. bird- with the. longest tail? *Do the stars realfly twinkle? What makes the color of the. sunset? What makes knots i wood? What makes an echo? What makes sbadows? Why is it warm ini summer? What is camouflage? This Girl- Knows, Do You? S g1E has had THE BOOK 0F KNOWLEDGE in her home for a yEâ7r, and she can tell you interestingly and correctly about ail the fainiliar things which she sees around her. She has made \"a long start in the race for knowledge.\" Her teacher wIU tell you that when she wants a quick and intelligent answer from her class, this girl always answers firt. IT PUTS THE CHILDREN OVER THE TOP..v The Child's Greatest Right What is \u0026ha chaSds greateat right to-day? It la the right ta a practical educa- tion-an educktion that caaý be used-not a cramming of the mind with a lot.of different facts about a lot of different things which have no relation tao ach other, but an EDUCATION WHICH WILL STAND THE TEST 0F LIFE. This kind of an education must begin in the greatest achool in the world. THE HOME. But THE HOME must be well equipped for the most important of ail its duties-, the making of a 190 per cent. ilseful citizçn. THE BOOK 0F KNOWLEDGE lays the foundatiotla of a practical educaticfl for life. THE END 0F THE WAR will present even greater problems than we have had to face during 'the past few years. Realizing this, our educatorS are searchiîig for new methods, better niethods, of training the b)oys and girls that they may cope witjx the extraordinary conditions which are bound to corne. Only recently, Presidenit Wilson said: \"I would, therefore, urge that the schools adjust thernselves as wisely as possible to the new conditions to the end that no boy or girl shall bave less oDpportunitj for education because of the war and that the Nation may be strengthened as it can only be through the right education of a(, its people.\" SATISFY VOUR DESURE TO KNO' iTHE FREE COUPON 1 THE GROLIER SOCIETY,I I The Tribune Building, Winnipeg. Picase miail descriptive book, containilig a little talk on the IfrHerent departments in THE BOOK 0F KNOWLEDGE, and explain- ing tle use and meaning of the work for the mind of a child. NAME ...................................................... I ADDRES........ .................................. IW BY MAILING FREE COUPON TO-DAY THE 80-PAGE -:REE BOOK CONTAINS THE FOLID.WING SUBJECTS: Chicftains of a Vanishing Race 'Frontii;piece in Tbree Color); The. Sun and Mas Family; The Eartb andi Meon i12 Space; WVhat Our 8kmi i Like; How the Nail (Irows on the Finger; Ilow the Teeth Grow; The Nerves of SmelI; The. Marvel of Hlearing; Jack's Wonderfnil Iou\u003e\"; The Lords of the'Wild Kingdom; A Concrete Ship in the Water; The WVonderiti! Birth of the Wheat; flow We OIg Up, Sun. shine; Making the Des'ert Blosso.; Canada the Wonderland; The Republlcm of South America; Why Do W'e Count in Tens; The Story of the Dayos; Joan et Arc Crowning the Kin,-; Two Spies of the Revolution; An leasy Way to Make a Tel.- phono; IHow to Crochet a Shawl; Boy Scouts of Arnerica; Set of Sijnple Tricke; The Boy Carpenter's Box of Tools, and Others. TrHE GROLUER SOCUETY TME TRIBUNE ]BUILDING wINNmG w, We.-teriifHome Moithly, Dec. g The 16 Great Departments of Knowledge Dominion of Canada The United States AUl Other Countries Natural History Our Own Life Plant Life The Earth Familiar Things Books of Wonder Famous Books Men and Women Stories and Legends Poetry and Rhymes Golden Deeds School Lessons Manual Training I *The Key to Succoss THE BOOK OP KNOWLEDGE i- a ne- method of edtcaton la the home. Oves l@,@$@ delightful educational pîcturea and brief but inteàaelytr ee«tug astdhs « I\" the chidren evcrything they mmcd to know in plain and simple lansuag wbhihth- can understand. It is the first work of reference whlch \u0026 chU o*ver'valyeju reading. The encyclopedias of the day Wore mot miliMeor *the MUn#wthel hard words, long, diall articlei, and tln picturmu. Thor do net attrtOt md boldtb childa interemt. THE BOOK 0F INOWLEDOE deveflpt\"6em\"mdof th@ an as naturally as the unskine devlops 1h. fowmr. I a6 epeiswlhl b h.y 10 uccmam.",
         "THE WESTERN HOME MONTHLY Ini ree.ding atonies te childien, I wonder how many of us ask ourselve. if tbe mat- ter we are reading in suited te their young intelligence? At Chrialmas time, a fond -aunt or uncle senda us books for oui litble ones. These bocks are chosen at random. 0f ten the purchaer pes te the counter and says te a very inexperienced on il \"GIie me aaUd'a ild .tbooe\"an h girl picks eut any expenaive one wbich cornes te band-prefcrably ching ïthe deareat, because cf br conmiinbing the more. The purchaser takes this parcel and moet ikely senda it off at the neareat postoffice-witbout so much as Iockin at it! I bave often known such te be th case, and i one instance, I ne- member tbe mother burning the bocks as mcon as tbey arnived because they were not suited to, ber children. Bocks are pocius thinga, and it seemas awful to um a Chriltrna gift--especially as a very cordial letter la often wribten te bbe sender, tbankinhbin or her for that marne present. Wbt hypocniay it al engenders! But still more precious tban anyr bock wbicb was ever written, are the mmnds cf oui cbildren, and we cannot be toc careful what reading we put witbin ther rcach. 'Any bock wbicb contains pictures la thougbt good enough for a cild. And even these picturs-are they net sorne- tirnes tee ugly for words? Childien may jçet a real taste for drawing and painbing, if none but tbe best illustrations be sbown te them. There la, aise, sueh a tbing as consulting a cild's taste. Some cbildrea are very sensitive and do not like sad tonies; they even cry wben they are read te thein. Weil do we want te give a bock for a Cbristmas present, wben lb la ikely to make a cbld cny, i that moat icycus acason? A boy very seldom cares for bbe sainîe kind cf reading as a girl, and, here again, we should consuit their tastes. And by \"eonaulting their tastes,\" 1 do not mean that we sbould give them whiat tbey often have a morbid fancy for; but 1 mean that we sbould so direct and guide thein tastes when young, tbat they wiil, naturally, like only what la good and truc. Once a mother flnds out that bier child bas a love of reading, she sbould bc very pleased; because a love of reading can bc turned to great good. But, in thýec daya of cbeap literature, a great deal of barm ray'be donc as well, especially wbn te bid growaolder, if the mother dome not watch over ber. When a child reads, sbe ia quiet and good, and we are inclined to say: \"Leave ber alone; sbc's rcading.\" The matter mpst not endthcrc. A mother ougbt always to know wbat ber child is reading. If mothers took the habit of reading to their cbildren more often, and making tbe children read aloud to 'then', then, naturaily, she would talk to thein about their literature, and ail being intereated in the future development of a story, it la much more likel.y that on other occa- sions, mother would be shown Al new books which are brought to the bouse. Wben a girl or a boy sneaks off to tbe barn or to tbe bayloft to read, we ought to know wbat they take with them. I; do not believe that children sbould ever bave any secrets frein their parentà, unlesa it be sometbing about giving thcm surprises and presents. These are wily for fun, and are but temporary secrets. I always bave miagivings wben I sec girls, e;specially, talking together in wbispers. ben tbey have a book between tbem, which the mother bas neyer sen, she'd better go quickiy and joi the conversa- tion; for some girls have a kaack of find- ing hidden, nasty nîcanings wbere none were intended. Once a chidd bas a taste for bad literature, it la very difficult to overcome this tendency. lb would bave been mucb better to have trained its mind rigbb, froin bbe start. I do not believe that any cbild bas natural, bad tastes. It may bave perverted tastes, but bad oneer,-never! So it la up to ail the mothers to sec that only good literature la put witbin reach of the children. The English language la rich, with the grandest, most perfect literature., Even ini atonies for very young children there is a great deal to choose from, and we can have our choice if wc will, and pick out tbe best. It is a littie trouble, I wil admit; but everytbing wortlfdoing at ail, is a littie trouble. The resuit la well worth while; for good reading of a really, wholesome sort, makes nicc, dlean, healthj?-minded boys and girls. We ail know what a fine companion a book la, and how, whcn the ram' pours down the window panes, and the outside world looks dark and dreary, we can go to our shelves and take a book and Wx happy for hours. What matters it about the outside? Here we are in a wonld of our own, perbaps amongst tropical fruits and flowers in the brilliant sun! Or per- haps., we are away, sailmng on the deep, blue sea, and we can almost sineil the sait watert Books can transport us so that we forget ail else. Does this not show what an influence they bave on our mînda? And, if it be so, with us grown-ups when we read imagrnary tales, must it not be so a -hundred times more witb children? You can't say: \"0, it's only a book. It can't do thein any hari. They know it isn't real.\" Tbat's where we are often wrong. A story le very real to a young child. The author in a book has a grave responsibility; for be can imbue others witb bis tboughts and ideas. As Marie Corelli makes one cf her characters say: \"«A book lives.\" But the mother's re- sponsibiity la the gravest- and as long as ber children keep Young, sue should follow thein in their rcading-,dirccting, inspir- ing and condemning. \"Dreams, books, are each a world; and books, we know, Arc a subatantial world, both pure and good; Round these, wît.h tendnils strong as flesb and blood, Our pastime and our bappiness wil growv.1 TEE PROTEST By Grace G. Bostwick ItIs not this flghting, land on land, It's not tbe lifted band 'gainet band, Nor yet the brave men's ufferings That to the soul black horror brings. It's not the womcen for they know Soine purpose in it, even thougb So melly tom from those most dear By war that rages far and near. But ah, the cildren-innoeets1'ç Wbo know not wby nor wbere norwhne But stricken thus, witb wee eycs i-e, Stare on, bewildercd, terrified! The hahes that crave mvain mnot her.trns- Their liaven safe froin ah alaris;, But freezing, id arved---so soft. and wee! Great God, how cia it be? HEer Hmnda Anna Spencer Twitcbel Not white, non soft lier bands, tiot tap- ering- Uncancd-for, rough, with red wonk-coars- ened skia; No geins they boast, but long by tne 1)wore thu As pledge of wifebood; just one plain band ring Their sole adorament thnougb the ycars bas been. Such willing hands, alert for anytbing. 0f service-for the daily tasks that hring Nor thanks non praise-the saine dul round witbin The bouse, of toil and grind the grim years send; Sudi îpatient, tender hands, so swift to ease, So stnong to minister in hours that try The tortured soul.-Ab, it is hands like these, Faithful and l)urden-bearing te I be end. Wc miss--God hielp us!-wben thcy folded lie. I ONY N INE SUBSCRIPTIONS SECURE DINNER SET ILLUSTRATED BELOW THERE WILL BE A BIG DEMAND. GET VOURS NOW By Mrs. Nestor Noel I BooA I The Dinner Set Contains: 6 Cups and Saucers 6 Bread and Butter Plates 6 Tea Plates 6 Dinner Plates 6 Soup Plates You can obtain (bis magnificent Combination Dinner and Tea Set by sending us in aine new sub- ciptions te The Western Home Monthly at $1.00 apiece. I J 6 Fruit Dishes i 1Oinch Platter 1 Open Vegetable Dish 1 Bowl 1 Crcam Jug YOU ARE SURE TO BE GREATLY PLEASED. This is absolutely tbhen'est liberal Dinner Set off er ever made and we hope you will bc the first in your neighborhood to take advantage of it. We never knew a woman who had toc many dishes. Our splendid plan certainly should appeal te you. If you care to make enquiry at your store. you will find that the very lowest pý:ice you can buy a combination dinner and tea set is about $1200. and the quality wvould flot bcr ncarly as good as what wc are ofiering. You are probably wondering how we can make you such a liberal offer and send you tbis fine Dinner and Tes Set for so small a favor on your part. This is the explanation. We bought several sets of dishes at the lowest price anyone can get for buying in immense quantities and are glad te give you the benefit of the big bargain. 'By ail means take advantage of this unusual opportunity before the supply is ail gene. FOR FURTHER PARTICULARS ADDRESS THE WESTERN HOME MONTHLY Remember The Combination Dinner and Tea Sc' consists of 46 pieces and is mnade of the best English semi-porcelain. Thc design je one of the most popular par- terns we have ever seen. The 6loraW decoration is printed under the glaze in a rich flow color, coft and velvety in torie. WINNIPEG ~oe -,t .' c - Mn#mStco iie s toChIicd e n Those whc observation i shat a conE S maresa time, are wea ad in son' ambition an( sud the teat It will also bi deripto mdntha--thol god kept in witbout exe: excptions, a a mare 80 Usi Tberefore, w] cases that 1 regular exerc lesat advisab te exert a progeny. Il is such thatI out ithe fi time, mares exercise; but connot be d wecks atatil be allowedo turned out course, is 1 stable) they in tbemost i to as much . until they ai stable. The weli fed and work. The sbould not 1 A littie Coi differently. in size. TI witbout n( must be supi and as nutr] of the blood that tbe anil see that th( ber owa tisa' of the growi montbs of Hence wes quires more pregnant mî ame work. greater care ection of fe flrst-class q chanrtcter ia WA~ De4i scenl W. J. IL --i wmmý ý --- - - mmmw",
         "THE WESTERN HOME MONTrHLY a * The Horse IIIIIîIIIIInIm Winter Caro of Prognapt Mares Those who have had experience and Obervation in horse breeding bave noticed that a considerable percentage of the uring colts, especiaily those born befora \u0026i mares have been on pasture for some time, are weakly, often net able testand, and in some cases wthout sufficient ambition and 11e to nurse when held ug and the teat jntroduced inte, the mouth It wil also bc observed that colts of this decitienre usuaily those of dams that have M\"n paxnpered during the winter mdnts-the that have been weUl fed ,Md kept in the stable most of the time iwithout exorcise. 0f course, thore are excptions, and it is net uncommen for a mare se used te produce a vigorous foal. Thorefere, while it is not necessary in A *cases that breeding mares sheuld 'have regular exercise durîng pregnancy, it is at least advisable, and has a streýng tendency te exert a beneficial action upon the progeny. In countries where the climate às such that herses can, wth cemnfert, run eut in the'fields at least during the day lime, mares wiil take sufficient voluntary exercise; but in climates such as ours this cannot be done, as often conditions for weeks ata time are -such that they cannet be allowed out in the fields at ail, and if turned eut ini the barnyard (which, ef course, is btter than standing in the stable) they take little exercise, but stand in themost shaded place most of the time te as much as possible be out of the celd until they are agamn allowed to enter the stable. The pregnant mare should be weli fed and given regular exorcise or light work. The idea that a pregnant mare should net bc woil fed is net uncemmen. A littie consideration should teach us differently. The foetus is daily increasîng ini size. This growth does net eccur without nourishment. The nutrinment must be supplied by the blood of the dam, and as nutriment is net a natural product ef the blood, but is supplied by the feed that the animal consumes, we can readily meo that the pregnant mare ha.s net only ber own tissues te nourish, but also those of the grewing foetus, which in the latter months of gestation is ne smail matter. Honce we sec that the in-foal mare re- quires more feed than a geldîng or un- pregnant mare of the samie size doing the samne work. WVhile she requires more feed, greater care should be exercised in the sel- ection of feed, ail of which should ho of flr-st-class quality, of an easily digosteci chiaracter and fed at regular intervals. Ail possible care to avoid digestive de- rangement should be observed. Good hay and oats are the feeds te be reied upon te produoe nourishment, and these should be fed in quantities proportionate to the size of the animal and the labor perfermed. In addition, she should be given a few raw roots daily, and a feed of bran with a cupful of iinseed meal at least twioe w eky Sh should ase be alowed al thego ae she wiil drink at least theetme rdiy; stiil better if it can ba arranged se that she can hve water at wiil. She should have daily exercise. If there ba regular light work at which she is kept busy for a few hours every day it is better, but if net she should be driven a few miles daily. The work of exercise should be light. Work that necessitates excessive muscular or respiratory efforts should be avoided; se also should plungz- mng tbrough deep snow, etc., be avoided if possible. Excessive muscular exercise, plunging, etc., cause violent. contractions of the abdominal and other muscles, and this tends te preduce abortion. Greater care than usual should be taken to not suibject the mare te even moderate exer- cise shortly after a f ull meal. Saddle work, especially during the latter months of gestation, should be avoided, as the mareîhs sufficient to carry without a man on her back; but where saddle work is given the use of apurs should not be pemtted, as pricking an animal on the aidesior flanks with spurs causes more or lesa violent contraction of the abdom- inal muscles, which is dangerous te the foetus. Ail nervous excitement should be avoided,.-as aise, should sights that frighten her; also offensive odors. The odor of freshly-drawfl bleed tends te pro- duce abortion in mares that are not accus- tomed te the odor, hence she shouid not be allowed near a slaughter house, etc. AUl operatiens should, if possible be postponed until after foaling, and aIse, the administration of medicmnes which tend te abortion, as drastie purgatives. When necessary te give a purgative te a prepant mare It is well te gîve raw lmnsecd o)i in preference te aloes, as while it does not act se promptly its action is milder eand does not cause the griping and con- traction of both voluntary and involun- tary Muscles. Towards the end of gestation stili great- er care should be excrcised, and while exorcise up te the verY last is advisable, nient's tuherculin test work. Heaua- nounced that the test would continuel operative. Hie knew that whatever 1913 farm opinion had been, 1917 judgment was that the compulory test was by far the bet way te handle a dangrous cattie disease. Compeation on a percentage ba, with standards for both ame and pure- bred cattie, bas been paid from the firat There is quite à~ body of opinion that thia aide of the work- could be improved by substitution of a head tax on tested aunmai for the creation of a fund out of which full compensation would be paid the owners of reactors. Ini effeot uuh IN acharne would ha simply an insamo plan. The owner of condanmed cown in allowed, when he wislfs, to rean them in approved quarantina quartera, and te feed the milk, if aterilimed, to fattening cows and swine on the prems. md, hand, ng9 rings. 10w dear r wvhence; es wvile, ir arins- id wee! , not tap- iork-coars- g by tine one plain the ycars nything. that hriug sarne dil the grini swift te that try ands like )I1e end. they folded catal og notice Send loc. in saver .or atamPs for our Up - to-Date FALL AND WINTER 19181919 CATALOQ containing 550 deaignul of Ladis, Misses', and Children'5 Patterxis, a CONCISE AND COMPREN EN. SIVE ARTICLE ON DRMeSS MAKING, ALSO SOME Ik POINTS FOR THE INEEDLE: illustrating 30 Of ithe various, simple titches), ail valuable hints to the home dreumaker. WTi? tolmg h Home\" i-Washer b\u003e' thehgho « evyjt saim sit equa tbooughau: Ters n zaxngJdeheate fabnes. cuber bCkbking wZasldy nywheihe'eMxwl Hm Wsshr; jui tiheloiuesi auddieeatShdlWokt au MAXWELS IUMMTE, Dqit. V St IMry, Ont. 4 A Sunny clime for Winter lime Grand Trusnk Pacifie is the Popular Route to WASHINGTrON OREGON CALIFORNIA VAN COUVER VICTORIA via Prince Rupert Delightful combination rail anîd water trip. Minimum fanes. Meals and berth included on steamships. Magnificent mountain scenery en route.1 Consuit any Grand Trunk Pacific Agent for f ull particulans.' W. J. QTINLAII W E DUPEIOW, Di,ýtirt assener AentGencra Pas8eng»r Agent, Djr.ric Pasengr AgntWînp.yg.Man. I~ ~ ~~ Ilmpg M The compuisory tuberculin test for !UII!F1\u0026 JI dairy cattle is in itas sxth ycar in BritishPlis C Columbia. When first instituted it creat- Umm /' C4\"u cd a disturbance in the dirying districts Z\" e mm whîch led te numerous public meetings, as UEU UgI- M slopped over into the coîtst newspaperap7-e and mnade enenhies o!f ngfrcn 9 Some of the most successful dairy fariera s am uice.,. *MR I U, Umui' wero againgt it, in some cases men who Mention piper and get our 111lutratd aovltjr, had favcîrcd it until thcv saw what basses seed and book cataloguas. it would inflict on farîners. 1 reeal a hot farmers' meeting at Ncw Westminster, the Frascr Valley trading center, i * ag l SvdM iel Deoemhcr, 11913, at which John Oliver, Tee'O ds xre y ssionsMy if\"th of Delta, aftcrwards ininister cf agricul- Thse woigre o ie ins lhundre ao ture and provinial premier, led, the the lettcrs I have reccived during the peut attack on the Iîîw, and Prve Ellison, cf year. Man\u003e' wcre froni womncn who had Vcrnon, thcn ministcr cf agriculture, was suflcrcd agonie\u0026 frosi falfing of the Wosb; po-worlc.,s %with his oratory te placate the (lairymen. Little wondcr T he Gevern- . ment \"vots\" wcro dcaling ruin right and Ieft. WVhole herds wcre practically wiped out in a numbcr cf cases. '[ho reactora over the whle province rau te 8 ( per cent. Iow noar the vet came in those dth pbi a largo d e knoun it dsthe blcinanularede ordern-ceanc il is net cf any particular account, for the law titurk. The crucial fight was un the Fraser Valley, and when the testera le! t that district hehind the battie was . In 1918 thcre ki prohably nothing that othcrs froni woînen who had escaped danger. theBriishColmbi diryng ndutry* us surgic 1 peations. as the tumors andl th ue r o Br t h Coum eia da ngcnd t rn f has d been removed by the action of pru0 f th n t e d an \u003c fdt\u003c fl f range Lily; and other. who had su lfered the bords. From i 81% in 191.3, the percen- rom i suppressedl menstruation. leucorrhoez, tage f rector ste d o clined te, 3 1% aInful periods, etc. For aU these and the tageo! eactrs tCadly ther troubles known in generau as Women'st pcr cent. in 1917. It is tunderstood that Disorders, Orange Lily furnishes a positive the 1919 perrentage Nvil l bc evon lbas. scicntific. ncver-failing cure. It se applied Brts(lAmi air edhaeom direct to the sufcring organe, and its opera. rt ie h ('o l edgni rt he rd ave com in A ion i% certain and beneficial. As a trial te b acnowedge Ih \u003clanea inailactuali\u003e' proves is meit. 1 herehy offer to Canada. Infectionf thîroughi importattions s end, absolutely free, a box worth 45c, suffi. is prevented hv reffiiations which entail a cient for ten (lays' treatment, to e-ver\u003e' sufer, turlrculn tet boh heore nd after ing woman who will write for il. Price, $1.30 tuberulin 'st oîh hforeper box, containing one month's treatmeat. ont r.A'rs with 3 stamps---- WhÉen John Oliver waa, made inii\u003ete-r MRS. LYDSAW. LADO Windsr, Ot. agriultue h hadan oporunit of Sod y Eaton's Dug Dept. and Iading o! agiutreh a n petn Iy\u003cÇ ruggigsa verywbec. dealing as be saw fit with the depart- - r I \"s This cup wua awarded for bkghest .co0ring creamery butter at Toronto exhibition to J.-.1\u003e Donald, Russeil, Manitoba. Mr. Donald's wm- rangs for the season ineiuded the folowing: Edmnonton, lot, and 5th; Regina, 2nd and 6th; Toronto, let. 2nd. 5th and 6th primes. iiver euP for highest soorîng butter, second for highest aver- age score; London 2nd. M1r. Donald ils a young. scotchman who spent three winters at the Marutoba Agricultural Cot ege speializing in dairying. it shnulé! ho given more carefully, anid less of it when she hecomes somoewhnt clumsy and inactive on acceunt of size and weight; but many of the most suc- cessful cases we have known have been when the mare has been unhitched when showing labor pains. After the birth of the foal the mare should net be worked for at loast two woeks, and if she can be aliowed idieness tînt11 woaning time ail the better. Many farinera who breed one or more mares have sufficient herses te de their work and driving without using the pregnant marcs, and, as a censeqiionce they live in pcrfcct idiencas. We repeat that this is a mistake, and that whie aIl herses are the btter of a certain amount of regular exercise it is better te ailow tho e elig and unpregnant mares te lîve in idieneas than the breeding mares. TUBERCULIN TEST INi BRITISE COLUMBIA iost n your 10 had 1 pUNK - lýU 1 a Sc' de of Thc r pa- flora. g laze elvety 'i i 't",
         "THE WESTERN HOME MONTHLY E. W. DARBEY Taxidermy W.rk of Ail Kinis RAW PURS, HIDES and $10OGAME HEAD$ your= uns du ndoe dup ,tO Sots, Robes, Rui, ec. 233 Main St. Winnipeg Ho MORE BREAD OF TFH1E DENTS.T CHA1I Ou oit le cmpieM M m cr ou dB ma wueflcwtb *ma. 7.0 O.Sai Diwe w. .....7.00 VW.e. CovS........7.00 Fuai uie WOMe~ '0 uoeoo.h........... 1hav » Uv tr Who DR. R01BUNSON Dosniues ANADcAt RHEUMATISM CONQUERED, I- m tat cn conuer rbeumr ltii wtli a .m91 .11.. wakelngbat.'Ma or nthCULnother of the uaa treament recmmeded or Of c r !reumatlu,. )oW't @but vour eyu as Ia ay \"lmpouibIo.\" But put me 10 the test. Voit may bave trieS everythtnz you evcr heard of and have spent your money rght. andS le! t. m say -wetl and good: Jet me prove my dlaims without expense to yoU.' Loêt me iend you vithout charRe, a trial treatment et DEL ANO'5 RHEUI%I ATIC \u003c'ONQU ERCi. i arn wing iW take tibe chance andsurely the test. wil teli. o senS me vont name and the test trefitmelt wil be sent vou at once. Whcn t senS you thi. I 1wiII write ),on rore fulty, and wiliIshow yuu that my treatment , ont. oui\u003e'for Ibnixisltng chernat s, but shouid aiso eleanse thie sY8teni of Urie Arli and giv'e g et bfllltt lu idney troublem anbbelp the general This RWecal ofSer twil not be beld oWen lndeflniteiy. It wiII ho neceesary for you to make your application quickiy. As soon s tht, clicovery becomet; better înown, i shall cease sending fret trcatmeflts Aind shail then charge the îrice for ibis disroveri wbteb wil bc' ln 1ro ortto l 0istegreat vaue. So t a e aivnt of the ofier before It i o a e eiember the tegt Costa you absoluteiy nothiflg. 1,. iB. Deiano. 328-S Delaflo Bldg., Syracuse, N.Y'. NOT-Orders for Delano'a Rheummatic Con- queror wili be Ouled frott their Canadien Labora- ories without duty. They Know NotFrom Whence They Not one of f lese smail éhildren bas new father, mother or home. They are but a handful of the warorpbans of Belgium. The eldest is iglit and the others arc six and under. Only two can tel whenoe tbey camne and te wbom tbey, belonged, the others, sbould y ou ask -t-em- -here their father and mother are or where their home was, would only shake their heads and remaîn mute. Alil remembranoe of the paSt lias gone and perhiaps if s as well. But the oflier two, the girl of eighf and the boy of six have foid officiais of flic Belgian Relief Commission who arc now carmng for fbcm in a smaîl village in the safety zone bebind the Allicd lunes, of what happencd whcn the Boche came. Tbcy are sirnple½child¶sh narratives, the full comprehension of whicli happily they do not understand. In the little hamlet in wvhich Marie Campagne lived in northern Bclgium there ie to-day but a beap of ashes te mark the spot. The Boche came one day and affer months of near starvation, ail the food of the village was taken to feed the German soldiers, the Boche lef f but before e ing le burned ail the bouses and 'killed a lot of people,\" so Marie Cam- pagne says in ber own words. Marie was at flic other end of the village one day when she saw the bouse on fic and she ran borne. Outside in flhc roadway was ber baby hrother-dc(Iad, and just inside tbe front door was ber mother also dead. Sbe wvas left alone in tbe big world for ber father had oniy a ycar 1-)ý4ore been killed at the frontf. Marie ivas mucli too frigbtened to cry. Other people 'werc running away frorn the village so Marie tan too and rinany long days, she wifh the others, w4ndered about flic roads, and soie of the other people vbo bad man- aged te save a few crusts of bread sbared their store witb ber. Then one day they reaclied a village in which were strange soldiers whio, when they spoke to lier and the older people, tbey couid not under- stand. 'Uben followcd a long train journey and Marie witb a lot of other chîldren were taken away and given food fo cat and a little w~hite eût te slccp in. And now, althougli alone, sbe is lianpy in ber new borne Tbe littie fellow of six, Bene Dubuc, is lus narne. bas a rnuch simpler story to tell. Onue day \"mother ivent ouf and didn't corne be. Shelîs wcre bîrsting in the village anid Bene wbo bad been left ini the cellar, stayed there and affet long, long heours was resced by soldiers \"nof Boches\" and taken to a \"big scîool\" wliere lie is now hîappy and well fed. Rene's father teo, lie ill say \"wvas killed\" but where lic docs îuot kmow. These littl~e war orpuamis tif Bclgium who caunenver mow know flic fond catre of a moflier or flue bappiness of home are bcing cared for by nurses and soldiers and are Undcr the direc(t, patronage of the belgian Relief Comnmission. Thlure are tbousamîd luke tierni, little mites wh'o have beeti rescecd froni deathl or starvafiouu li the inurest slip (if flic lanil of fate which bas laid waste to Beigîmîni fliese past four years*. These childrcn are now public charges Belgiumn cannlot bel p tbem, no one there bas any money and stili lems bave tbeY food. You wbo tuck cblîdren into their beds at niglity tbink of these Belgian orpbans with nu home, no parents, ne relatives and no futr. Help the BeLgan Relief Fund i caring fro them by sendn your- contribution to your local relief committee or direct te the Centrai Cern- mittee, 59 St. Peter Street, Montreai. By Nancy Avcr3 There tbcy sat, a patient little group, as the doctor came uto bis office from bis round of evening cails.- He knew tbeir probable crrand and sigbed the whilc he spoke cheerily te thcrn and called each by name. \"And now wbat's the matter, John?\" be asked kindly, aff et the mother and father with the two youngest babies bad followed him into the mner office. \"The same old story,\" the man answered shamefacedly. \"Mary just feels- as tliough she can't go flirougl iti again. Here's flic baby only a year old and Robbie just two, not strong a bit and hanging to bier skirts ail day. And Lillie and Carl ouf there in flic office, too small yef to belp theunselves much. You sec how if le, Doc-can'f you help us ouf some way? I know if ain'ft iglif-it'.3 a shame to bothàr you like this-but we jusf don'f kno w a to do-\" \"That will do, John,\" said.flic doctor. \"I know bew if is. I-know liow if is.\" He lcaned back in hie chair and rubbed bis hand across bis cye. 1He was desperately tircd. The nigbf before lie bad been up ail nigbt on an emcrgency case. There had been no chance for resf A day. Hie weary brain and body called for siep- and ycf-bere wcre folks in trouble. \"His folks,\" lie called bis patients lov- ingly. Every one of those little towv heads he luad helped into flic world. Four finies lie lîad coaxed and conjured back to life and f0 hier babies f bat patient lit tic mother who sat crying softly drying hier eyes iif flic hem of the white dress of flic baby in ber anms, and lie had been repaid a thou- sandfold b)y seeing bher devotion to bier fainily. And licre flicy were in trouble again, and bad cornie to him for lielp-and lie couldn'f belp t hem. H1e couldn't-tbaf wvas ail. Hc lcaned forvard suddenly and picking Up the fretful fwo-ycar-old, beld if fcndcrly in bis arms.t \"I guess l'Il have to tell you a story,\" hc said, luskily., \"Soie forty y'ears ago in the barren huis of an Eastern state, on a little stoni.v farnuibtere iived a man and wvonan s ute d in cireîmu.t ances just about ike yoit, John. anti vour wife here. Anid tumes were liard, ind intncv s('a\u003cce andit the babies kcpt coining jîîst the anie. immt il soomi t here were four .And prett y soon there wvas to bce iother and thie inother rcbelled and cried about it ani thle father becanie almîost diseourageti. But tiîcv struggied on amni the baby n unlme finie camin mbthliworld. It %vas always illillu IIIIIIIIII IIII IIIIIIIIIIIIIMIIE Il Ili Il 11; 1; Il 1111!!; 1 Il ýIi IVIII il Ili L 'ryt -'i~ r t-' that thrills bave mast known li nes \"'Mid pîcas May roi Be if ever like bor $orne onE worlci of Io atrife shut c are treatedt more corrcc In order t a happy hoi and evcry i best to cor happiness of \"The world From our oi And that d( Although \u0026i of the sam. flic same bo and irritablE derneanour: cause we liv eaeh Cther so familiar- guard our tc Let us pi hold and te Came a struggle for life on that littie farm but it wvas an honest struggle and the càiidren grew straight and strong and robust though,, they lived rnostly on beans and potatoes. \"Well, the years roiled on as they do and the litie brood went out into thé world and -won their way. One holds a Position of trust i an Eastern city-a man witb high ideals and a mighty influence for rigbt. Another, a daughter, gave bier life on the foreign field te hclp hier heathen sîsters; one is a minister and thousands have feit his touch upon their lives, and one is the mnot her of a beautiful fanxily of children. The fifth, the one that wasn't wanted- je I.\"y The doctor paused a moment and brusbcd bis hand across hisecye. \"I inay xîot fil as big a p lace ini the world as the rest,\" hie said softly, \"but every day 1 do my best. My dear old mother lives with me, and every day she tels me she thanks God for eing me to hier and prays to be forgiven for those rebellous thoughta of her bard and struggling youth. 11 \"John,\" the doctor put ncw life and vgor into is voice, \"brace up, my lad. Little woman, take courage and bear your burden with a smile and a song. Wbo knows but wbat the fifth will be your beart's desire, your stay, and belp some- tirne, yUr comfort wb en you need it most?\"ý1 The littie wife dried bier cye and pressed the sleeping baby close to bier breast. The busband straightened bis s9tooping shoul- ders and put bis armn around bier awk- wardlybut lovingly. tankt you, Doc,\" lie said huskily. \"We'll get along some way, woxn't we, Mary? And Nve'll live to be proud of every one of 'cm, God bîes 'em.\" The BHman Totich \"When did your reformation begin?\" a gentleman asked a Christian man who had formerly been a great criminal. \"Witb my talk wif h the Earl\" (Sbaftes- bury, noted for his devotion to discharged crirninals). \"Wbat did the Earl say?\" \"It was not 50 rnuch anything bie said, but hie took rny hand in bis and said, 'Jack, you'll be a man yet?.'If was the toucb of bis hand clcctrified by bis love.\" A gentleman visiting a glass manufac- tory saw a mnah n oulding clay into the great pots which later were to be used mn shapmng the glass. Noticing that all the rnoulding was donc b y band, bie said to the workrnan: \"Why do you not use a tool to aid you in shaping the dlay?\" The artisan replicd: \"There is no tool can do this kind of work. Wc bave tricd a number of tools, but somchow it needs the hurnan touch.\" And if is true of other tbings beside glass tbaftbchy n-ed thec human toucli. Help 'Tour Biother By Fred Scott Shepard Hlelp your brother ivben you can, For hie is your fellow-rnan; Y6u are members of one clan- Help your brother! Is ne weak-bcside birn stand, When hie needs a helping hand; Fail hi not when there's demand- Hclp your brother! Are you favored more tbaîi lie? This should addcd reason bc For your aid-Gîve heartiy- Help your brother! Cive liii noncy, Ulne or civer- That's perhaps why wc are here: Thus rnav we afar, anear Help our brother! mhe Sowers Moist earth, and sunlit skies, and spring! And a glad sower wvcnt one da% Forwarçl and back across the land, And good seed cast away. TUhe furrows buried if froni sigbt, Thie harrowed field lay hrown anîd hart'; But the wisc sower knew that time Would bring a harvest, therc. Sof grass, and i sniing skýies, anîd spring! AInd szid lîerts slowl1y went their waY Iîîto a field N ifh tcrraced siopes, Their (lear love there to lay. Tlie i)rowvfl carth covered if froinisigit- 'l'ie precious secd so sweet, so fair- But. soie tine, some finie, the dear God Will rcap His harvest there. -Emma A. Lentes. son bas net \"fthe wrong lie might be. at that ie hii books, alfhm were put am ately flie ne called into ensues for tE. whicli, affter have been ti Fra glad b appearance finie if is th( peace of fi gefs into a eider sister moment the is announcet reýpect and for thelie fii pleasant fin As she goei \"What a beý and pleasar othler?\" Y( because of in ftle hon respect fo to show fo Then, penli: troubles of sîîîiply addr Wliceier Vi ' , I i s e : But ti Is the c when t Ulicre are c,' -hron , , spien o'\u003eIl !lier fi 1 rear \u0026ý r, andi ru 1,l the1",
         "THE WESTERN HOME MONTHLY m~îîîis îîîîîiinuutîîr~ T e H oeI\u003cE)1I*C iiiiiiiiiiîiniiiiiiNM Written for The Western Home Monthly By C. M. Watson Isome, the word \"horne\" is considered due. This is the credit she almost a meaningless termi, gets, \"Ma, this ment is not done.\" \"You but to the great majority it did not boil the potatoes long enoug.\" is one of the sweetest words in \"Thsjeis tough.\" Ail of which asser- the English language, one tions hLae not the least' foundation. 3us with delight. How often What pleases some mill ot please others, Sof us repeated those weil- and each contribute their share of \"kick- sby Paynes and really f cit that ing.\" Is it any wonder that' the poor isures and palaces though we mother becomes discouraged? Instead, Dam,' suppose~ one had said, \"M%,a, this meat is .so humble, there's no place beautiful,\" or anether, \"I have enjoyed )me.\" my dinner very much, tbank you,\" or e has described home as 4' the young son had said, \"Ma, this pie is ove shut in, and a world of fine, may 1 have another piece, please?\" eut,\" but \"Homeis wbere we What a difference would have been best and grumble mest\" is a noticed ini the fainily circle, and above al et definition. hew the kindly face of the mother would to have that heaven ion earth, have brightened by the words of ap- me, it is imperative that each preciation. «Fust try it and watch.\" member of the family do bis And new lt us accept the invitation atribute largely towards the and go with one of the eider cildren f the home. (who are so good ini gruinbling at home), 1 has nothing to bestow; to a friend's house to dinner., How polîte 'wn selves our joys must flow, and respectful they are to tose areund ear hut-our home.\" tbem! Do they grumble at the food? Oh, no! They would not dare to trans- srespect between the members gress ail laws of etiquette and courtcsy. ae is frequently noticed, yet Now here comes the main question: ýoy or girl wbo can bc so cross \"Is a stranger or friend mrore wcrthy of e at home can have a perfect respect or courtesy than their own away fromn home. But be- motber? ' No! A thousand timnes no! ve in the saine house and see But because she is their mother, tbey se . 0 frequeatly, and become hier se often, and they know bier so well, - with them, we negleet to, tbey forget, tbey neglect to give bier the ongues and our actions. littie acts of respect tbat they accord the eep into an ordinary bouse- stranger. These are only littie things, aill what we see. The young littie acta of carelessness, littie nots of M» but it robust ans and y do and word and position ian witb bor right. e on the Ssisters; iave feit ie is the ,hildren. ,anted- ýnt and \"i may d as the Iay 1 do ves with me she id prays .houghtâ life and my lad. ear your ;. Who be your p seme- need it 1 pressed st. The g shoul- er awk- huskily. )1't we, of every begin?\" ian who ,riminal. Saftes- 3charged nl say?\", be said, nd said, wvas the love.\" nanufac- into the he used that al be said ot use a dlay?\" ne tool wve trisd it needs besicles )uch. son has net slept very weil and gets upt \"the wrong way.\" H1e is net se tî»dy as1 lie might be, se it is net te be wonderedj at that lie bas lest his cap, bis ceat or bis books, although hie is \"positive\" theyi were put away in their place. Immedi-( ately the reserves of the household are1 cailed into action and a battie royal9 ensues for the recovery of the lest article,1 which, after much jangling, is found te have been thrown inta a corner. \"Well,i in glad he's gene,\" foliows the dis-c appearance of the young culprit. This1 time it is the young boy who disturbs thei peace of the home. Then Sster Soui gets inte a sharp argument with hier1 eider sister or mother, but just at thisi moment the door-beli rings and a visiter1 is announced. She is received with great1 respect ani kindness. Ail angry feelings1 for the time being are forgotten, and a1 pleasant time is spent with the calier.4 As sbe gees away slie says te herseif, \"Wbat a beautiful borne. llow agreeable1 and pleasant those sisters are te each otber?\" Yet all this pleasantry was because of the appearance of a stranger in the home. Tbese sîsters gave the respect te a stranger wichl they failed to show te members of thier own family. Then, perbaps it is father, but as the troubles of father are many we will siuiply address te him the words of Ella Wlhceler Wilcox: It is easy enougii t e e pleasant But the man wortl w hile I., the one wbo cenasmiilet When everytbîng gees dead wreng.\" Ulere are in sorne homes -whIat Nyou may eýý '-hronic kiekers.\" The mot ber has alcsplenty of -work te (do whicb take w' .l lber tine, especially in the rnorfiflg. S. liteppres vvhat she consders a good \u0026j lr, and when the family are seated ru : the table she receives the thanks omission rather than commission, but tbey ail help te whiten the mother's hair, and te bring, that earewern look. We cannot always have our mother with us, but \"we always bave the memory cf how we treated ber.\" Those who have had the benefit and wise counsel of a Christian mother wiil, perhaps, ecbo the thought,' and maybe feel \"a sligbt vibration.\" 'Whea the mother is taken away we place beautiful wreatbs on ber coffin, expressions of love. Yet how mucb better wouid it be te give ber \"the roses of love\" wbiie she can appreciate them, net in actual flowers, but ia the many little acts of kindness and thougbtfulness which makes the sunset of ber 11e more beautiful than the sunrise. She delights te, make the home pleasant and attractive for ber children, and she cannot receive tee much praise and respect for ber labors of love. A boy or young man is aiways the better for a girl's society, and a sister is the best comrade in the world. If a yeung man could always remember te treat bis sister writb the same respect that he treats semeone else's sister, he would feel amply repaid. The si'ster takes more interest in ber brother than be is aware of, and dlights te make the home attractive for botb him and bis friends. A youing man wilI flot go far astray when he thinks of bis home. And the sulent influence of a loving unselfish si.ster and mother will follow him wherever he gees. Their memorv, is a safeguard in times of temptation. Mueh is said about wornan franchise and their rights. Wornen, ne doutb have their rigbts, and the greatest. rigbts in the world, but thev are the training of the bovs and girls in the borne to be noel menu and w oliln ini thougbt, in word anîd ini (lCC(. Let children learui from their home life t'\u003e walk, the r'glàt wa-v. IL The New-ýDay Price Tags,1 Should Show Calories Per Pouànd 9I Z6 ClMs undj 365Calries, that thriils bave mast known li nes \"'Mid pies May ro Be it ever like ho Some on worlcl of b strife shuti are treatedt more correc In erder a happy ho and every best to co happiness o: \"The werld From our c And that d Although di of the sair the same b( and irritabli demeanour cause we Iii each Cther s0 familiar guard our t Let us p hold and t( Quaker Qats The Extra-Flavory Fla kes U»e Quaker Oats, because it We get but ten pounda fhmma ineans superlative flavor at nlo bîshel. It means the cream of extra price. the oats and the maximum enjoy- It is flaked fromn queen graine only-just the rich, plump oats. ment. 35c and 15c Per Package-Except in Far Weat TI'. Quaer Oms Qmpam PETERBOROUGH, Canada (205f»\u003e SASKATOON, Canada Quaker Oats Bread 1 1 icilpéïQuaker (\u003e80\u003c (uncoraked\u003e 2 teampoolS malt ! ý eup, augar 2 rupt, boling water 1 cake yeaNt !j cup Iukewarm water b cupfi Cour Nii'c together Quaker (tatx. s-it and sugar. Pour uver two cups of hoiling wauter. Let sr and urtil lukewarmn. Ther\u003e add yPeu.et whIch lia4 been dLiiiclveýd ila ' cup lukewarmn water, then add 5 cupts o!f lotr. lcnead sglihtly, met ln a Aarm plat-e. let. riW Until lihOt (abiout 2 lwirs\u003e. hnea\u003cl t horoughly, t,,rn yt,!ct wa oaIOUî 4 nd part Ia pans. Let rise again and a! eabout rÀ) minutes. I r ea ~ue1 sy~~sol tic made a t nlght. with the liquitire yeuit, and a part of tire white Clour. This recipe makeg two loaves. Quaker Ons Muffins Scup Quaker Otta (unconked\u003e. ) i cu..pefluer. ieu% acalded gnllk. 1 e«x. 4 level tmwaponbakins po)w er. 2 tatbIifpoonn melted butter. 4 teaapoon suit. 3 tableoipoons Itugcar. Turn seaided mlk ton Quaker Oatn. l5 et and fIve minuites; q:aul imgar. malt and inelted butter: \u003ctit lu ilour and Ihakirîg jsîaciu.r: mlx thtirciuaby and add egg Weil beateil. lake lit buttered gem pans. Quaker Oats Cookies NIIx dry 2 rupa Quaker \u003c\u003e515 urt*w.ul,3 .1CUit Clour. I te-apmr eltinamon i1titapoun smalt. Nfila 1 tp sugar, 1 cup lard. Put I1 ev el t4-zkmpoon Roda ln fa amali cup uofsuur ilik.M dt thi îto ta uer and lard,. then add I\u003cr, lun- grre-ilfnt. roll 0mbiii, u t n arem and bake. lai n- 2 cup-make au excelenît addition. i à s The Vital Point in' Food Cost The caiory is the energy unit by wvhich governrnenits and ex- perts measure food. It is a major factor to con- sider in comhating cost of living. Figure what you get per dollar as compared with e Quaker Oats., In these foods, for example: Cost Per 1,.000 CaIorie Quaker' Oate.............S\u0026cents meata Average ........do * 71b ru«.....s...40 e Cann.d Salmon ....... Ue Cszmed Con .. .....30 et Potatoeu ..... ...... l 4 Cann.d Pes .............U44\" Mos't meat foods cost you 7 to 10 times Quaker Oats for the same calory units. And some foods cost you 20 times as much. Mien Quaker Oats is better balanced than these costly foods. It is richer in miner- ais. It is more nearly a. com- picte food. 'l'le oat is probab1y the great- est food thaï grows. Use Quaker Oats to reduce your meat cost. Every doliar's worth used in that way saves $7 on the average. Then mix it with your flour foods. T'he more you use the more you save, and the better you are fted. This great food in 'these times gains a multiplied im- portance. 0ur lady of the snowshoes. ispring! :1 spring! eir waY iar God entes. CkfO cedore les Per Potifid",
         "THE WESTERN HOME MONTHLY * îaan,îi~aaWhat Shal Wle Cali t1he Baby amnu Written for The Western Home Monthly by Olive L Reamy lmu pladt\u0026m icarng for #Agir SauVa charms in ,impIan\u003cwy-theq.ua7s gsau Nature hevdf in- 80j\" ýQ Iýeep a ovely SIýi ~vwi1h soap b4at rnSe oJ Nature 8ays:: \"Don't bamper Mny work bY P' using haphazard methods and saps.\" And ail Nature asks la a littie coMMOn- seuse coaperation in the cure of the akin ahc is daily trying te give you. Nature laya great stress on rissing. She aya: \"The soap must ailnse 0§.\" Se, if you want to choose and keep a clear, beautiful, natural skin, you will want te choose, also, a method and a .oaP, to take proper cure of that skin. Pure Fairy sSp la made for seint. Fairy SSp la made te creain refreahinÉly in and out cf pores, as Nature aska. And when it has performned its pefect clemning-LoT it rimses. J: rnses of penfectly - afier iýs perfect cleansing. That ia why Fairy Soap la a soap thac Nature herseif loves-for thecacre of healthy, nitural skins. MM. :IFAIRBANKZ~ uumo. MiOMME FAIRY 4.S OAP ffave you a littie Tairy in yjour homel A Big Special.1 The Western Home Moiithly FOR ONE VEAR The Weekly Free Press Prairie Fariner FOR ONE VEAR, AND The Parisienne Embroidm,.ry Outfit $1.25 HE1TI PARISIENNE EMBROIDERY OTEIT is one IIof the inost cotuplete and up)-to--date \"ollevtionS of its kind. It conis\"ts of 154 transfer designs, 186 letters, and i nstruction tbook îllu-trated in colors. The Western Home Monthly, Winnipeg I euvio'iîe $1.25, for wldiii pleaiase iaaîe 'lite Fruo Pruss Praîta l faoîiîr atie ear. 'licternI tonte Nonthlly for otie vear. :îîd 'lite PairisicaiM' EanbroidcrN 0w fit. Nte.... .......................... . .-.-------- -. -----j t' .2-~ y the -,,vay, have yeun lamed hiin yet? asked the first cailer p of the young mother. \"Zamned him!\" exclaimed the Souig motlher. \"VIMhy, we've only just begun. It has taken us a week to go as far sk You sec,\" she went on, \"'we are taking the dictienary as a. starter. ZWe meante leave ne known naine un- considered and anoestors persiat in com- in nte complicate matters. W'e de- bated a long time last eveaing over James. Fred*s fatiier was named James and se was one of my grandfathers, but teh naine is tee -plain, we hall te give it up. Really, it is a jey te be able te do something for our boy with- out consultiitg the doctor, the nurse or any of the rest of the meddlers.\" The first calier smiled and held up a protesting hand. \"Don't anatheinatize the nwddlers, xny \u003clear, for V've a suspicion that I shall jein titat class. I certainly shîalI uniess you show more regard for human cars and tongues than most persona do when be- stowing naines on their offspring.\" The yeung mother looked puzzled. \"W'hat have cars and tengues te do with naming childrea ?\" abe asked. \"Nothing, my dear, positively nothing, if one may judge by the naines one hiears, but they should have a whole lot te do vith it. Don't tell me that yen neyer rebelled againat your maiden naine, Mabel Bolton!\" \"Rebel! Why, ne; I likcd it se manch that I was tempted te turn suffragist, or socialist or something of that sert, se I'd have an excuse fer net changing it when 1 married. What's wreng with it, pray 0tell?\"4 \"The eaine that is wreng with my naine, Esthcr Torrey. Suppose inow that yeu had been called Esther Bolton and I, Mabel Torrey. Don't your ears and tongue thank yen when yeu make the exehange? Just speak the naines your- self and notice the differenue when you don't have bel bol and ter tor in juxta- position.\" The yeuag mother spoke the naines in their original comibinations and then in the suggested transposed forin. \"Wliy, that is better, isn't it? I neyer thought of it, thiotigh.\"Y \"No, that's the trouble, but it's timne people began thinking, and yeu iniglit as well bie a pioncer in the art, se please begin now.\" \"But 1 don't know, how. Will Fred- erick do? This dictionary business is only an amiusenient, vou know. Yve ivtant ail tlhc tiîne te eall ny son for bis father.\" \"Ask vour cars. llow does Frederick Ilookýr.soiid (? Isn't it rather a-orkcr? Bolton Jiooker w ould do better, but that liais fatIts.\" \"Boltonî Hooker! Wiîv, Estiier,%vliîat's the iatter -wîtl tlîat ?\" asked the young niotiier protestinîfly. \"I doti't secin able to grasp vour idea at aIl.\" \"WVe11, ite par ticular fault in tbat coîinîîatioiî is nionotoniv. tile repetitin ini the seconnineii of tlt- vowvels in the lirst. lThe long- o aînd the oo require niîerifthe -alie position of the organs of spîeech anîd the obscure o and e of the second syliabies are approxiinaiteiy the sainle. Besides titat. botht naines ]lave to syllales ý%vith tuie acent on thec first. Bealiy, vouir plain Janmes Ilooker is iiiiueli bitter aiiie. yonnig inotiier. 1 IhCL-iii to sec. buit 1 lit-% er katew vonit ad siivii wisdoiaii in vour wad. M\\1iie'dîd vou gît it?' t I.it lia., j114gRýlo%\\n li] îgtobser- Naition. it Nwai a faner' aýi.t tir-t andI tileiî 1 biîilt .1ai tîîîaatioîî of piioneties to ulp- p\u003eort it.- -Wil. it' \\ RI l'n ilito a w hole lnch 4R îîi tlt iipated 'îe a-cl 111tir i i attl tata' ait tttce. \\imtXii aa. thl et i tae~ a I.t' ta 'o tiet, fallliieý ini tiiis aae'iiieii'l wita-'w tîtwivtil Nettie il laiatlikv \\~ i ai aa. -ba1ý ruti1otoi l \\T'V aid tal'. I lt - me ends with a. vowel and the second begina with a aimilar vowel aound, al- waya a fanît. Margaret Baton is nearly s bad with its near proximity cf t's; and Louise Baton has not only the repe- tition of a tense vowel against it, but it bas two accented syllablea together. The only good name ini the family belongs te the boy. Oliver Baton is a delight te the cars. There is no repetition and the se- centailare properly placed.\" \"I don't understand what you mean hy a tense vowel,\" said Mrs. Rocker, eagerly pusigthe clues offered by her friend. \"'Speak long e,\" was the reply, \"and ob- serve the position of your tongue and lips. Can't yeu feel that they become more or less tense?\" \"Yes, I can new,\" answered Mra. Hlooker. \"'No,, speak slowly long a and long i. That's right. You see thateach ends with the same approach of the tongue to the roof of the mouth that you have in e. Long u begins with that position and inerges into the oo soùnd, which purses the lips. Try them several times te get my nafifg.\"e Mrs. Hooker cave the names of thie A hardy littie Indian maid. vowels nentioned slowly and carefulY. \"Yes, I sec,\" site said. \"4Now speak on, us, and awe and notice bow the'lips and tongue relax.\" \"ýYes,' tiiat's se. Oh, titis is fascinating, Esthier. Please go on.\" \"Mio lias moved into the bouse Inext te the Eatons? I nioticed that it was occupied.\" \"A familv hi' the naine of Corden. Thev have twvo bidren, Ethel and Perci- val.\" Miss Torrey uttered the naines tlioliihtfullv before proaeuncing her ver- dict of. 'Botlî good, but the boy's rame is better because of the accent. Where the ,urtianie lias two syllabies, a one or two-svllal)le Chîristian namne gives a nmore pleýa-'iiig- comîbination. Next cene Rutha, ?auriel, and Reginald Green, the fir.t to good and the last bad.\" \"Wli v. 1 should think Ruth faultY. Tiiere are two one-syllable naines te- geýtiier.\" \"Tiîen lot ie give vou, a lesson on con- aoiaiît-'. Givthu Souînd. not the Damie, \u003cf the letttîr 1p. tiat is, start te say put, luit stop after the p. Yes, and now ,give tie \"omti of b. Do voit observe that the 0111v dil ieeie lies in the use, or nona- la-*. (of titi 'vocal cords? We will call the soalmul'its strong and the non- i o)cal.iîi wak. Iiere is the saine difTer- eite betwea en t arid d, k, andliard «, 8 hed, bu ntteral\u003c phenetu( There s inone i f ter, jus' picture. g and Muriel j e-ff ort oi ing eitl trary, l1 d, and 1 with thi Must mi tering t \"Oh, reaiiy. Herman Louise syllable \"No,: the m 1 the remn weak. mnutek Moulto a high Roger prefer ick Mo \"cOh, than vieve, The ii v's anW «\"Yes eveit V elauSe i bov's good.\" \"Rig (ontin \"Tht JIoseph faîîlty. fir-st, t \"TIîi \"'We ;înd tfi atant s Eligen ./ ALL FOR 1 - firi",
         "THE WESTERN HOME MONTHLY 25urdiciVe mandj, sndeth in thiù n d then. ,L., m, n, and r are vocal- ized, but they are Dowing and easy of utterance; liquide they are termed in phonetics. These lat combined with vowels and non-vocalized consonants make our softest and most agreeable names, but such names lack strength. There shouldbhoat least one strong sound ione name ôr the other to give charac- ter, just as a bigh light gives life to a picture. Green, for ezample, has bard g and tbe tenne e. Both Ruth. and Muriel are easily spoken. Only one rosi effort of the tongue in requirod ini sposk- ing either name. Reginald, on the con- trary, bas two strong consonants, g sud d, and the d is partieularly unhiondable with the hard g of Green, so the tongue must miake three distinct efforts ini ut- tering the nameY» \"Oh, I'm beginning to understand, really. Ut me try. There are Louise, Herman and Roger Moulton. I suppose Louise is faulty because two accentod syllablos corne together.\" \"No, it's very good, because the s and the m blond perfetiy snd the whole of the remainder of the word is relaxed and weak. There is only one effort. It is mnuth easier to spesk thaa Hermau across the street and consider Grace, Elinor, and Donald M.Nael)otiald, Scotch, of course. IVhats your opinion of tlhese ?\" \"Grace is fair, Elinor is bad because three unacented syllables separate the accented ones, Ellen would b be otoer, -wouldn't*it ?-and-well, nw ears and tongue don't mmnd the boy's name.\" \"No, nor mine,\" said M-Niss Torrey. \"it bas rhythm, which seens té give it a purpose, and it contains no harsh con- sonants or tons. vowcls, while it stili bas strength ini the d's.\" \"Then 1 should think we sbould b. able to sean long names as we do poetry, or to sing tbemn easily.\" \"Yes, that is just what 1 mean.\" \"But that hasn't settled the question of my boy's name\" said Mrs. Hooker, ieturning to ber first interest. \"No, 'and Fm not going to take the in- itiative there. IM be hoei referendum,» answered ber friendlsughingiy. Then, EIstening, she exclaimed, \"0 dear, 1 think 1 hear the nurse! I've overstyd my time. Lot me escape ber wrathl Good- bye, my love, goodbye.\" \u0026 The first caller fled precipitstely bo- fore the approaching footsteps, Iesving the young mother exulting over thie ac-' quisition of miles wbieh the doctor, tihe nurse and the rest of the meddiers aould not gainsay. The baby iwanflnally called Benjamin after bis maternai grandfather-Slid WM Torrey approved. GoErai. GoEMM Sandy and John were sitting ini a eSr when a pretty girl got in and siled at the. former. He raised bhs hat \"Do you knQw ber?\" asked the. Englié- \"oh, yes, very weei,\"thie Scot mqpid. I\"WelI shall w. go and ait over baside ber, ana then Yo\" oan introduco e»\" aaked his companon. \",Wtut a bit,\" returned the. csny Soot. \"She banna ;aid br fa\"e yet.\" Wbetber the corn b. of olti or nMW growth Itt yieYi to HoUlow,¶1' COMU Clir Mmplest and beat cmurem ot b Trying to pleas little brother. Moulton, vitie its repested mu, snd it ha3 a bigh liglit, wbich the latter ha's not. Roger Moulton is good, tbough I shouid prefer the variety of accent that Roder- ick Moulton would givo.\" \"oh, Esther, this la a lot more fun than the ditionary! How about Gene- vieve, Dorotby sand Theodore Evns The first is very bad, 1 know, with its v 's and 's.\" \"'Yes, it couldnt ho much worse.\" \"The second isn't bad, in my opinion, even with the two vowols togother, be- cause one glides iute the other; and the bov's name seema to me particularly good.\" \"Right again. Ixe proud of my pupil. Continue, please.\" \"There are John Fox and the twins, .IosePph and Josephiné. The last two are fauty. Im certain, but 1 rather like the fir-st, thougb I hardIy know why.\" \"TIîink.\" \"Well, 1 suppose the J gives character ;Ind the relaxed vowel with Nveak conso- nants suits ai lazy tongue.\" \"Ves; think how nuch less agreeabe Eugene Fox would ho. Now lets go Th gom t. .A TuCKI-AD \u0026BARAN iFR014 EATON S CATALO GUE MAIL COUPON TO-DAY etmr EAmornd 'm :ifPQ ils bookl s fullI 0f bargalfls- logue bn reay (abo. :Ut ,d on«a, tffl. WillIb. ..adY \" ...................... mail in a few vm.ks. Dont E T N C -m .0. .............a........ ,lu It. S.nd !n your cO S P. o -day. ' INNIPEG CANADA m T Prv. . .... -......1............... .,~ e first econd d, ai- iarly f t'a; repe- but it -The Igs to ýo the ie se- an by Lgerly rid.h -and ecomo Mis. ong i. q witb Lo the mn e. à and purses to get f the .fuly. notice mating, e inext it was ordon. Perci- Dames er ver- ;ame Where one or ves a L corne n, the faulty. es te- on coL- Bamle, y put, ,W give at the r non-1 al the non- differ- rd «,, s Ir to- LL",
         "'t -'t \"t t THE WESTERN HOME MONTHLY About the Farmiîîîîîîîîîînîîîîîî m Gornbault'a Caustia Balsam 3~. Woa.Ids 6a..at.sf a.d \u0026u'.ut v.teqaar.y R.uaea(V 1118 IMITA7OR# DUT NO OOMFETITORSI B __ ISàFEt SPEEDT AD POSITV i\"ng. IvalablsaaaC Wo \u0026N DLSEXtlqh RGBONE. Sw EENY, I:NY TMOR LANIENESS RI SPAVJN OART OtCACKS. MCATCHMS REOV!S lUNCHES ce STAM WDTENDONS. !MFOR AIITONE TO USE. rW guaatSS thM oon. tabi..oOfl t Cou«\" Iai tam wil produce more aetua resuits than Whoi boulie of any liniment or spu via mixture ever made Every bottie soid la warranted te cive nmtisfactloS Write for testimonial»l uhowing what themoet \u003eOMS DgabrmmnBy 0f St. Price..901.50 p;r tii. Bldh by druggiuto4 or ent bDy exprese, CharageValoi wilà, Lu» dretiofli for lais O. 5obqwr.u hs.er*A~CLEVELAND.O. OTINGOBT 000D E91oT. V3W Irr. A\"4 C Ail Kfefu heMotinds ofe Godraoe.i oteeycueoflm nhus rr\u003elw;i; gaellFoasgrnds it. Te ainspouaat tatreNw kCar. the gainto bthe rnris e W\"th tw vea throuh. T e uesev oldthe graibuakes octa r Thde V dt.e ganpasstoteginngpltsa Cleans gaind cand No KintterofatGrain 1 en rud lx aly en fee uf, tas through cleTe ad gound, fne carso th e grain d.tegidrimaewt oseva Voreso ndibo nd atesfonse ood elwrkThe hase found iatchest to prostcksourncstonesbtlatering ourS. V thrademakTon ail ole ehs. Look fraint tcuyouty. sA \"Can i--tiouhgrainpdos ses to khe rnb slteas power suh as is urn t, scb y a M gul K renEnine. card or lcttr t e, easrtcslt bac ins iMdbcov u'Àng yo f, i infortoycndau bo he neor cmacie asRtereQa aretrCman fCnda iie forind t e t to rd.st.; Regin, Ssk.; S aat o rS . V A\"Chaiii)ion\"g ipedoi.tsb; orkS arutse power such as ~i I fJotniedb Mogi u eee.; tawOU4ine.hC.1l The F\u0026=m Horse ta HIB IMuter By Elizabeth Clarke Hardy Oh, master dear, the blistering sun Beats down upon mv head, As round and round flie furrowed field, With weary steps I tread; You ride behind me on tl'e plow- I'm glad that you cagnride; And willingly 1 toi1 for you With patience and with pride. The dust drifts up in stifling clouds And chokes and blinds me sore, My collar chafes my sweltering neck As it bas done before; And long and sultry are the hours Since 1 have had a drink, How parched and dry my throat must be, Dear master, only fhink! 1 saw you §eek a shady place And drink a cooling draught, 1 beard the water trickle down As f romn the sfrcamn you quaffed. If I could only plunge my nose In water sweet and cool, If I could quench my burning tbirst A moment at the pool! far better for ftle team to f ake an extra hour f0 make the long frip instead of hurryiag heyond a eomfortable gait. Extra speed always requires an extrava- gant expenditure of energy. Don't Lot Herses Get Sare Shaulders Horses' shoulders must be watched closely every aight and morning, so that if one of f hem should get a swellifig or a bunch under flic coliar if nmust be treated right away, so if, does't get any worse. Cooing f lie smwelling down m it h eold wafcr is probably the best fhing 1 have ever tried, and next morning f ake the collar and lay it on somefhing hard, a wagon wheel is a good f.hing or an anvil if you have one, and wif h a hammer hit several blows on flie places of flic horse collar riglît where flhc swelling formed, so as fo disu flic collar and relieve the swollen part of the shoulder.- If a sweat pad is used on such a horse make a littlc rip \u003cight over the sore part and pull out some of the filling, enough f0 not press on the swollen or Hisb school pupils receiving a science lesson on the production of honcy. Oh, master dear, we serve you weIl, BUt oh, if you would think, Whcn offenfimes yout quench your thirsf, IIow inueli we need a drink; And if a moment, now and then, You'd rest us in flic shade, We'd feel for ail our paftient foi That we werc richly pai(l. -From Our Dumb Animais. Steady Work with Team Caunts Mast The driver who is patient. and pleasait andI aiIows lus teai inteiiC fturn anid to imove wlîci told aceoniplisbe iC îueh ini a day, if lic keeps going. It is flic stcýs fatl.t kilI timc. Fi\"ve to ten mintfes' resf wastcs ftic timiî a tcaîiî would take fo fravcl across onec side of a square 40-acre field. Whein twt) binders are eiîttixig on t Saine land the one e lclîid en hardIv catch 11p if once set iîack bv a fcw mnts dclav. Few moin realize 1mw fast f ina' flics when flic tcaiii stanids sfill or liow far a tcaiîi travels iii a short space of finie. Picnty of sîi:îp isMa igoo(l attribtfe in a fariîî lant1. piîvidcd lic kccîs if uxîder colît roi. (0)îîc's tellnlper îîceds aspcîa 1 guard kcpt ovcr if. Slow,siire, stcady inaît ion is Nvliat 1periforniis- iýir w,\\it liceleast Nwasfc Of ciicrgy. and tl wcl u-i lcî th ose iîotindît ie l it li i stil 5stiirtliiiig l' h t. Pcaiencel'O ili lal ii-iia tî l te -' atitîi nt Il \\ ali n iii il \\Vi li I' iî u, iit:[1,1 i' tIll, T't' ti \" titit it ii iI h 4,, sore par this for horses m many aE always in hot they wil After th evening your hai which st and was you big neyer U. sore sho W]2 By Pri Winf e phases o intich he ,aid, hi inuich pi in order t ion up exi\u003eected It is go into to point t hc ior the subj The c of ivinte andl by hardy, pullets t the cold ycar. T hîav'e e f roim thi and igivi tliive a It tai 1theravet vaie C dit iouis pIiiitla laviîg t ilian thi 1hie hest egg proi The 1 in olho to tlier Ftock fo: jiever 1) biis, an ivitiîth. muis oi I lie Sait îgc and1 'Thle , At the c meit an A1 go( dîryt. I luamat i 40r fao .-Iiif i THIRTEENTH ANNUAL Soil Products Exhibition AND Farm Congress WINNIPEG February l7th to 22nd, 1919 miuPrvnca Exh ihit which was awardcd tht' SWEEPSTAKES TROPHY AT KANSAS CITY, Mo., as liig flic most attraictive exhîltît, w*1Ilu lit'on ofthc fcafurcs uf fh liiz aîs càlbtion. $ 45000.00 ln Prizes is offered, and some of the Competitions are open to the world. For Prize Lists write to The Extension Service Department of Agriculture Winnipeg - r -~ - m m",
         "-.1*' iw c. ,,* THE WESTERN HOME MONTHLY sore part of the shouider. I bave done this for 15 years, and neyer have any horses with a sorc shoulder, and work as many as 14 head in seeding time, but 1 aiways watch their shoulders, especially in hot weather, that is the tirne when they will get cold by doing extra work. After the horses are unharnessed in the evening just strip their shonîders with your hand, and if there is anythirg there which should not be there, get cold water and wash it good and dlean. It viii pay you big for such a littie extra work. I never used grease of any kind to put on sore shoulders. WINTERR EGG PRODUCTION By Prof. W'. A. Brown Department of Agriculture, Ottawa, Canada Winter egg production is one of the phases of the poutry indnistry on which inuch has beeti wrtten and1 much heen sdbut one, neverthcless, in wwbich mnuch practical work remnins to b. donc in order to bring the standard of produnc- t ion up to what might reasonably be expected. It is flot the purpose of this article to go into the suhject in detail, but rather to point out and dîuix empbasize souîre of the more important features underiying the sulject as, a wliole. The chicf essential in the production of ivinter eggs is to possess good stock, and by goo(i stock is meant, strong, hardy, he-althy, vigorous. pure bred puilets that have rencbed rnaturitv before thle coid weathier cornes in the fait of the year. This impiies that these birds miust drink. This causes the interior of a tightly eiosed poultry house to become very humid,' and in coid weather the walls and ceiing become frosted. This also bas a direct bearing on the frosting of the birds themseives. Dampness must be eradicated. Two mnethods are in commnon use. (a) the use of the straw loft; tis consists in piacing a thick laver of straw- on potes or roughi lumber plneed at intervais on the coliar beams. This plan, of course, is better adapted to square or bip roofed houses than to shed roof bouses. (b) The use of the cotton or open front houses. Mangiv people are of the opinion that the cotton front houses are coider than those having many windows. This is an erroneous idea. It bas been proven without donbt, that glass is a more excelent conductor of beat than cioth. Thin cotton or burilp allows the moisture in the bouse to pass througb, and brings about an equalization of outside and inside humidity, and w hile no doubt the temperature in an open or cotton front bouse rnay be iower, than in a ctosed bouse, it is common knowledge that any medium wilt freeze more quickly in a damp cotd atmosphere than in one which nîay be colder but drier. The second consideration in a good bouse is ventilation. Pouitry in order to thiive and, retain the vitaiity essentiat to the production of winter eggs must have an abundance of fresh air. The third consideration in a good winter laying bouse is that it be wel liited and permit of plcîty of sunshine within. Windows sbould do this, but in the average farmi pouttry bouse, they are s0 dirty,, so covcred with cohwcb:, that but ittle briglit ight penetrates the A fine group of3 have been batcbced early', kept separate tromn the ot(i stock \u003curing t he summer, andl gîven every p)ossible opportuiiity te, t hrive andi grow. It takes fronm five to six montbs for thle average puilet of the generai purpose variet ies Io mature. UntIer suit ahie con- dit ions tbev ili grow at tlle rate of a pounid a montb, andt ius t\u003c) bave pullets laying the batter part of Noveinber it is zecessaryv to have tbem liatched not iter Iian the tîventietti of lav. From the iniddle of \\p-it tte emidd(lc of 'ay is t he best timie to lateh stock for winter egg prodmiet ion. Thie puilets sii\u003cind be carefully seieted and îaced ini lhir îînter \u003curters early ini (ct ol er. I t t akes t licii, as a rule, a inonth or more to lieconie ftitlv accustomed to tieir new surroundîngs. in ctassifying Ftock for xint er piroduict ion puttet s shoul\u003c1 iever be ptared ili Ilesane jatis withl liens, and thliite-liat i ci I î ilehts inipens with tlitîe umore iiiat urd. F'or l\u003e\u003c'st l'e- M l ts ouîtv t t ici-t slttd go t ogi thler ini tlie sanie pen t Iat are of the sainie suce, aige andt mat urit v. 'l'le second c-sent ial in the production of %%-nîter e-gs is a goo\u003ettpount ry ' loii'e. e At t lie presetit t iite tlere is moi re agree- Ii ici ilntong potltt rvm ii iontthle irini 'iles fuct type k sî 1inii a t ate of eviîllit iîd. A gouîcl w jter LaiN-ig liiiîse hittlie ilr v. I)ainitis ni auxforin. , itle Il 1 anat ing troli olit s l d oiresor tri i tij.seriousi-t uiplaiis the vitatity 0f lie -ock andt direcitlv ae p~jroducLt ion. wkare inatoinîi(ja11lv ifferqzit friî lit-r farîîî LlliIiizlit, iniiait thev exhlel ilitlie 1tîî in ithe iîiriî 01 vxi . a rprin oi f the nater tliLll lie\\ young Holsteina. (iejtlis wittiin. The cotton front oit a binged frame, opened on ail brighit days, overcomes this difficuity and affords the( birds the opportnnity to flifle their feat bers and dust thenselves in the dry eartb atnd litter on the floor. A. fouitiih ighly imîportant consiilera- tiun is t bat. the house hx- cican anI sarii- tai-v. Poultry may lay in a dirtv bouise, p1)vide(t other conditions are r-ighlt, but it is evident from the present conudit ion of the product. tîat a campaign of saîti- talion and cleantiness is ne\u003ecessatry in thie pou!try bunsiness. Fowls 'lelighit iii a cdean, dry, we-lighted, wcil-vent ilat cd house, andt il pays to cater to thecir desires in thlis respect. Ottier fetîtres to bc considered ini the production of winter eggs are good fccd (Wett fed), good management and plenty of suitalîle exercise. L.xperience lias shown that as great egg pri utîion can he sectired by a jui ioiusuis ie of thle simuple home grîîwin fecils asliv the purchase anid use of mnati of tdie Iîitr priced feeds; pro- vii ed t hat thle foîvis bave the mecessary vitatity and naturity. The bard grains, wbeat, corn, ont s, lu\u003ckwheatt, andtItheir lîv-jro\u003cliit s, bave lîen and fo douilt wileuont iue tii I) l t ii'i- plle poilu rx' fiods. 'fiet mu:i Ix. ii(il i-iîigv or to\u003cgeilier as butiri. ii thue fait thlia varietv is important sholîiii .Nicat foodin iisonip foirn i i'i'fsr v. Bie vsrap, fi-lu 'orap, iieat itial, r:iw% miiat, grueli \u003cutliiie \u003cor iiilkLre l ai of itiix,î'periîîîemt bas - ,li i tliat li(ii, i'givi, miiieia îatr r eiuth lan I oit t rilk, or i-ur skinilk Abolish iTruss Forever Do Away Witla Steel and Rubber Bands That Chafe and Piuch Tati know by your own experience the trust le a mere makeshift - a rais. prop againat a coiipiag weii-nd thatt la undermsining yaur heaith. Why. then. continue ta wear lt? Stuart-* PLAPAO *PADS are different tram the trust, bt'ing rndicine applicîtora, made oeif-adheive purposeig bo prevent siippiuil andt t holti the distendest musce.s ocureiy In place. No airaps. buittit.. or spriuîgs f EE aitached; no dgglngIn\" or grindinI presaure. MtSn oN s .v.t-pIatble -Casy i Ate -nxpabv.Cons inuisez day andi niht ireatimînt at home. No d.i1ay tram work. Bundreda of people bave Wune betore an foir er quaUflied io scknowled2ze osihu, andi sw.r. luit the Pepao.P\u0026d« CUred 1helr rupture-tome of thein ost aggravated casesaof long siandioz. -It La reaxoniableefilet they ahouiti do the aUme for you. Give tiiem a chance. '41, 0 RWr« am7g\"T THE RUTUREID Mot FRE te utreLsstoe o .roeteu for il. now or evers DothIng ta ha returneti. o IMWrite lodai-uOW. Atidreat. riaPaO CO. BICk 696 SL LOUIS, O Whai iiaI, Plsrocg h c\" i3",
         "~1 t, GtRidFA 0f That A Frc Trial Treatmcnt S~ H6t\\~t, 1 t t~~~~ Yv 1,. N t 1't* - 19I .i t e,' 'v t, THE WESTERN HOME MONTHLY mU îîXV::1ýý,ýiý,;:lil ork for Busy Fingers' \"': Illad Band.-Usedr-rY ntil WOrSi cd nti'No. 3 l ttcor telluloid ecedies. Cast on 10 stit chcs and knit '22 rowvs (il ridges), ilhen itîcreazze i stiteli in the fifth sî n eh from v avh endl of evcrY steond ro\\v tintil 22 rw more have heen knit t d, iving :j2 5t itthe,; ou t1wneei IÇit plain for 96 rows ý4S rindges), narrow second trow utntril Il) t t ivhs reiniain, iake 5! 22 rows eveni, bllnil faîd join tIo east-ofl 5!st it chcs. Ilead Band Woollen Gloves N\u0026: 1 211 Our voqru 5! ~3~ropemot,5 Bcd Soek forti t\u003cel ~ atrl stitehes of instcp ail on one needie, pick 5 )olr kit t ilg orstcd tandtia No a Itoio up 13 stitehes down other side of heel on (--ç( ittk. Chaint M, joi, vt lii at\u003ctt,\u003e thlie 1iird needie and knit 8 stitches from s1at, h ttît ake 1 dotbe itî' n aýIitile first \"eMlle on to the third needie. sivfo.2 rounlds. W lotil laid 11:11 t lie Koit to %ithlin;3 st itchcs of end of irst dobe od shtîlld li 6-, \u003c vlc; \\ t. 11 ielle, k. 2 t og., k. 1, kniit plain across the Now tor îroi l :îîîd nîîd in FI~Neond nccdle, and on the third needie drvltawav:s pivkimr 1t)îp)nli lie I et I1, slip 1, k. 1, pass thle slippcd stitth t int, în l lesotk s 17 juiches lote ver, knit 1\u003c)end. lnit, i round plain, Nairrow -1 t ies :ît reutilarin1itvt\\ais iii a 0(1 rejîcat froîn * tint il there are 14 r u oînol tt iltit hes reiuiaiti. I oh s eseahont the trst and thîrd needies, I\\iiit p)lini for 51 -' inches. then for the eioht trîigi le Itigli thîilî--.\\ lot' \u003coit iuie as foliows: * On the first Dark guav. iglt gav.''iiteedie kiuit Io wthin 3; stitches of the enti, killlim, \\oi,\u003e(,d 111.\\ 2 t ot', k. 1; onii tlie second needie k. 1, livtN\\t a li t t 1ite i' ble ,l l1i1,k .1,pan.. iiv :siîpped stitch over, Il,- oIle : eLi t o t ttli )s tiitch, o nd k.)2a t o i ultie.ck llt.o i -)(,b tl î:ro ii\u003cxcvscndru p' ha 11w s. i i tt it e nt o e d nik, 7iim; vlI l nt '2 lil\u003cuidsplinal elcs.3rcik 5! t. t i i I b .. , il i ic\" il î11lý, fr il -, . , IY lro îgshav e tîi titi t h .i e- i f kie r nitting ton 0 wt«i \u003e st-I l'!' tl i : ii i I iti \" tîîdle a f -P' kic âiikitn v L, Imt 1Iil Wonder Anong th, velopinniits t lias givea ii no(uslyenliit fllOlbdenumi tuiigýsten, wlî ficiators of s niaiiy respeci attributes an perliaps thte Un, whlich is niasters of 1\" tiîorougly Pi ]]lent to fiiid Of mIoIlb\u003cleili tion to its us( 11111 is of VO pigment ofî coration of 1 fixinîg certain gitive shades -xvoolens, for 1hatlier andti of nlo otlier c foritu of ainui ilier ani (lis as arc u\"eýd also for fire- teýxtile fabriet Rifle barreL ie butltl plat of t1le iinuînjti' being umade ot thte Europeail Sone of th( Iiot oiil11V i ollier steel tht el-I lîigh explc înielting pot Iteat of the g vides ordiicq nmade of aniv penetratioii0o in ecessof teria. For crank vauît door, prcssutre boilvi possesses mai tungyste't or v tools used in 1 hardest steels. sheli. cases, if permit revolil faster tlîan is cutters as to pacity of out] tagc 'tiat tîri lieâts the steel is niot ini the eitiîer hi' the quelit etoliliig agi stel pelt'îttralîle 1li' CANADA SC( Western Cat Kate-tîs (UiN hiiiirt'îI tiîti fii.-t . Uecotl, wwt. irst sta'es in t ke kit li.'ii tiiî. wi thte sýi0 silvet liain Pacifie tL Oli'a 1i oni httlialf bits] Il. h.Stec wtt. -ecîtl i oatttr\u003cf i m( \u003etwe,\\aî t of 'h e e ''e t Ai We carry a full line of WIGS, TRANSFORMATIONS, TOUPEES, SWITCHES, POMP ADOURS, CURLS, Etc. and(1fil'al orders 1bv retilI îmail. Send Us Your Combings andi w- W;11inqke t k(len 1;0:110i %\\ 11,its at vît\", triilig CosIi- Il t s foi-Jr i ý1\u003c h t qual f n 11t1.. j1i 'I n I 1 11 lte msi 101 IliC NewYork Hair Store SEAMAN \u0026 PETERSEN 301 Kensington BIIdg. W INN IPEG lu ici 4REE R;",
         "Wonders of Molybdenun R E \u003e. 1Anîong the renarkable iîîduîtri:l de- velopaleilîs to wîîîchi the Euîopvaiî w ar lias giv«en inipetus lias beil.the clair- iously enlarged use of the rare nietals, fjlOlbdefluni ad vaniadiumi, as w eh as tungsten, wdiieIi are al wndrulvbene- ficiators of steel and seeiti to hiave In niauy respects a st range kînsl'îPin latîir attributes and finction2. Of tiiese tlîree,C4 perlîaps the least fainiliar is niolbden- ni,, which is largely used by the. forge-Deas in the first place, w~e secure the Raw Purs direct niasters of Europe. The -îvorlId is beimg fromn the Trapper for csh-in fact, iîe buy more rtav furs TI)iSTT7NXNC SET tioroughliy prospected at the preseiit f10- direct from the Trapper for cash th a i y other firm in mraleitie~l. Large scarf ]]lent to fiuld new commiiercial resources Canada-then we select the.. lest and most suit ible sk fls ifahi onabltw-kt.i iadesign. Of molvb\u003ceiite or wiolfranite. Ili addi- and malze themn up intote fai u-ýts Ilallain Guaranteed u4ti.~JI heads and lails. tiof to its use in steel mnakingl, înol% bdea- Fur Garments-w~hhiiwL Su l te 3 ou d.retly by n i ' .tn arm g'uOt is of value in prodnciiig a bUe Frin Trapper te Mearer \" for c.ish. Thtis does aii-iy 7heflr ie a ri,-/ jeti black ofstiku bauy atu ~-with ail middlemen's profits and you reccive the benefit. gZ !osiatlV and lis pigment i cziebe coration of poreelaiii, as a miordanit laX f 886ai. fi-ing certain delieate and otlierwtise fil- Sl*e gitive slades3 in the deigof Slks a\"(i -ioolens, for imipartinguiqliue colors to GuAR AN E h(atllier an(t iiîber (ltaillable hv the use of no0 otlier color producer, anàin athe i for any eoson yo ie not s'ifid w'- fori of aaonium moivhdate as a stur- Y O ae atsuWt HalIam Fur Garment simply send it back and we ilizer and disinfectantit or Pin.ýles, suchwla nereudYu oiyi u ihu as are u-\u003c'd for railwav carniages, ai wI toc eunyurooe nfi ihu also for fire-proofingg muslit andi otîjir qefion. textile fabrics. Bile barrels, propeller slafts, subnar- ilue 1l1i11 plates, arniior plates for nai îesels ivreand projectiles, ar'e 1a feNN (if t1le Imuitions naterials tIkat are 110w being malle of ilolybeu steel bv ail1 the EUroIUaIll nations. Sone Of the grvat bIo-witzers are malle no uy !s f sl.tu ianavIt i larger and better than ever-sbowing a Ilot0111 buter hailanVwonderfully extensive range of Fur Sets and otl elthe lrlil. snsý fIloi u Garments-we do not think there is a fur ,ih xposvebat uitti te book publislied in Canada equal to this-it f leltineg pot it j s pro contains 48 pages and cover, with over 300 heat t a, ýe andthuillustrations of beautiful furs, phttographcd Prosjecane artiles on reai living people. This shows you how mleo«tl te telOf the furs actually appear. It also gives a lot iloIvb\u003cie1111i q o~ oi( SYIH URBEcu f information about Fur fashions. The pentraionof he îare~t auto plte FR)H INK M.îILRMI45 articles shown here are taken fromn this Fash- in excessoftos lmte of other UhIiceininîzrndrml.:ao ok n ilb ofuth-furniad skiesadje rh cle-, inBokan, l csent con reeeipt of money. teriai. designî. Deep salor cdlarfroi,Ibuit Write now for your copy oI HalIam's 1919 For crank sand shaft forguiugls, batik as sha-zv,. richly lined uitlzh in ok-t iI ae ouoony î-ut or prann agiets, higi poplin and iished vidht-us,-hip g. Fu ahoBok-iwl svYuMrey hal ou er patand fhren iii A garment Ihati weiî illustratci pressure bie lts n.sl la((iii, the remarkable price sa',ip: Addres s infiull as bcZuo' hîg-sedmachine toiils, 11\u003e l\u003cîîî derivedfrom our FUR FASIIJ\u003c \u003eN posssse iniiyailautaes vercitter BOOK. AMUFF jn s,,îarl round tunfgstt'f or vaula(iuml steuls. Maine urscord. tolîs used in lallies for turiîing do\\ It Ie M 724.Coat Delivered.. .8ii-2.ý,0 I LL hardest steels, as ini the ca-e of s rseicssimaeo olîeUhrapntel, M 75. MufDclivred... 12.jo àHABulding permit revolution aI a rate so rfl1i i it B .In faster tlian is Possible wi liicarlion ,t('(l cutters as to nultily mail'N-fold Illie pacily of output, it ttlile adtledada tlge t1iat tlioughI the fricti on - illuer hecats tlhe steel t1 ool redmiess, its teillti is mot l in c the i et bgeei p ire eitlier bv tlhe aiting,\" or by the snlc)ýV- queutol thng. \\auIIt d0oirs ofà wh- ë. demi ni steicrens e i in ~l id4- iti ,0 sOtlîaltlîey lwcolle le-,s aloli 1-5 tlle progre. of tillue. CAAASCORES HIGH AI KANSAS ExPOSITION Western Canada itseored iighî aI tueAE)i iSuii-1-naîi\u003cna-, ].\\ItOr-it toitat IýinttruatiitNl CA1ttlliiig atotakl Of 011i0 huiiilredt anit four prizes. Tliu-e ýiichitie fir-t. second(, tlîird and sweepstakes lu; w1ivatz tlrst secondtlth ird antid tp stksin oats; ir. settdtlr~ ~ 5W sti kes i n b:rlev: ir - t stot fla\\.1.ecr hcerOf Bttr,~ the S.ý50O ilver tctl) oifered 1v the*Lana - l nitPaifie BRailway O %)1atiet\u003c hIt 1Itaîf bus-J lof liard sprnug wiliet. 1. . leelev of lIii' ]-',i\\ er. let . j \u003eua--coilt i tlis compet ition. N itk tr ntid u e tl for iiarlovu ;",
         "THE WESTERN HOME MONTHLY M _________FOR OOKS are good friends to have when the extreme cold and short days both combine to make us spend so much time indoors. We offer any book nientioned below postpaid in return for one year's subscription to The Western Home Monthly. Each book is printed on good paper and contains between two hundred and three hundred pages. Glance through the list of tities and we feel sure that you will discover several that you would like to own. \u0026-claire 6-Elaine y-Rer Hesrt's Desire 48-Rer Ransom 9.-The Marquis 10-A Wasted Love il-The Usurper e12-A Passionate Love 13-My Lady's Pride 14-Woven on Fate's Loosa 15-Rer Humble Lover 16-Farmer Rolt's Daughter 17-Rer Faithful Heart 18-Stella's Fortune 19-culptor's Wooing 20-Adrian Leroy 21*--Roy-il Signet 22-A Coronct of Shamne 23-Love So True 24-Perfect Trust By Alexandre Dumas No. 28-Count of Monte Cristo 30--Corsican l3rot hers 33-Chevalier dé Maison Rouge 35-Fratricide 40-Monte Cristo and Ris Wife 44-Mansaniello 51-Son of Monte Criato 52-Suicides By Sir Henry Rider Haggard No. 59-She By Sir Arthur Conan Doyle No. 60-A Case of Identity 61.-TIe Sign of flic Four 62-A Stiffy in Searlet 63-Beyondfthe (City 64-Thie led-I leaded League 65--A ScaindaliniiiBohleia C6G-Sherioeýk lloines Detectivè Storics By Mary uTne Bolniei No. 67-Tempest and Sunshine 68-English Orphans 69-Old Hagar's Secret 70-Meadowbrook 71-Homestead on the Rilisde 72-Dora Deane là-Cousin Maude 74-Rosamonde 75-Mildred 13Y Mru. E. D. E9. N. Southworth No. 76-Tried For Rer Life 77-Row He Won Rer 78-Ridden Hand 79-Ishmael 80-Self Raised 81--Gypsy's Prophecy 82-Haunted Romestead 83-The Lost Heires By B.Ortha M. Clay NO. 84-A Queen Among Women 85--For Another's Sin 86--The Jealous Husband 88-Thrown on the World 89-Between Two Loves 90-A Mad Love 91--Catherine's Flirtations 92-Like No Other Love 94-The Shadow of a Sin 96-The Shattered Idol 97-Love for a Day 98-Tlie Squire's Daraig 99-Uer Second Love 101-A Woman's Temptation 102-At War With Herself 103-Jesse 10)4-The False Vow 105-A Broken Wedding-Ping 1063-A Bride of Love 107-lis Wife's Judgment 111-Wife in Naine Only 112-Lady Diana's Pride 114-Dora Thorn 115-A Golden Dawn 116-Sir Arthur's Hleiress 117-A Romance of a Young Girl i 18-Lord Lynne's Choice 11l9-A Fiery Ordeal 120-The Shadow~ of the Past Order Booke by. Niàber THE WESTERN HOME MONTHLY, Winnipegj LI1closedt find S$............ for which seuîd me The Western Rlome Moîithly for ..............car, also Book Nx) ......... I..................... .......... I I........................................... .I. .. . . . . . . . . . . . .,. . . . . . . . A Good Model for General eWear. 2594-This is fine for cheviot, velour, serge, mixtures and pile fabrics, such as plush and corduroy. It is also nioe for satin or velvet. The collar maY be rolle\u003c high dr low as illustrated. The pattern is cut in 7 sizes: 34, 36, 38, 40, 42, 44 and 46 inches bust measgure. Size 38 requires 534 yards of 54-inch material. A pattern of this illustration mailed to any address on receipt of 10 cents in silver or stamps. A Simple Style for the Little Girl. 2254-This desig is nice for ail wash goods and suitable for serge, gabardine, cashmere, voile or repp. Te right front overlaps the ýlef t, at the closing. The steeve may bei wrist or elbow length. The pattern is cut ini 5 sizes: 2, 3, 4, 5 and 6 years. Size 4 reire 38 yards of 36- inch material. A pattern of this illustra- tion mailed to any address on receipt of 10 cents in slver or stanips. Sahos adatglteor nd s.Mui, cambrc, flannel or flannelette will do nicely for the night gown, while lawn or nainsuok is suitable for the des Il embroidery, tucking and lace r dgint for decoration. The sack will look will in silk, cashmnere, flannel, or flannelette, and the cap is suitable for lawn, silk or '\u003cal-over\" embroidery. For the dress of flouncing, it will require 13/4 yard of 36- inch material1 with 1 /~ yard of plain material for yoke and aleeves. 0f nain- sook or lawn 36 inches wide it will require 24 yards. The gown wl11 require 2V2 yards of 24 or 27-inch material. The cap, /2 yard of 18-inch material. The sac, requirea 8yard of 27-mnch material. A0 pattern of ths illustration mailed to any addresa on receipt of 10 cents in silver or stamps. Waist-2649. Skirt-2673. For busi- ness and home wear the separate waist and i 94a Info SUNý in uni Paper occaSie on the telling save y3 that's Auk The : Dr.N Prescribec so Id for 1 with sign At your1 'i-ien w Ti 'i '\u003cv juooks Winte, r \"jmvenînts 1 A Good Style for Sehool or Play. 2363i -Waist and trousers may be of the sainei material or the waist may be of madras, cambrie, percale or linen, and the trousers of khaki, serge,1 cheviot or corduroy. The trousers are made with side closing. The pattera is eut in 4 sizes: 3, 4, 5 and 6 years. Size 4 will require 23,j~ yards of 40-inch mnaterial. A pattern of this illustration inailed to any address on reccipt of 10 cents i silver or stamps. A Simple\" but Attractive Model for a Slender Figure. 2664-This gown is made îvith an underportion in one-picce style, over -which the. long blouse is worn. The sîceve inay le in wrist length, or eut shorter, in loose style. A beit or sash confines the, fulness at the waistline. Satini, velveteen. dIuvet VII serge and satin, or silk and jersey cdotlîembîc are nicc for t his also. Thie pattern is eut ini 3 sizes: 16, 18 and '20 vears. Size 16 will reqUire 51j yards of 40-inch niaterial, wîth 1-5 yardl of 27-inch lining. Width of skirt at. lower Ve'ýiS 17,1 yrd. pattern oft t ls illust ratiîonî nailed to anv address on rueip)t of 10 cents ini silver or Soine New Thigs for diîe lkîhv. 1 m skirt are stili popular. The design here shown portrays Ladies' Waist Patterni 2649, and Ladies' Skirt Pattern 2673. The waîst is nice for linen, batiste, naml- sook, lawn, silk, satin, flannel, pique, Or voile. For the skirt one mîight chose sports goods, jersey cloth, serge, plaid or check suitîng, gabardine, velveteen or corduroy. The waist pattern is cut in 7 sizes: 34, 36, 3S, 40, 42, 44 and 46 inches bust measure. It will require 3 Yards Of 36-incli material for a 3S-ich size. The skirt eut in 7 sizes: 22, 24, 26, 28, 30,32 and 34 inches waist measure and requirs 21 . yards of 54-inch mate ial for a 24-inch size. The widthi at its lower edge is a littie over 2 yards. This illustration csali for two separate patterns which wll 1)0 mailed to any address on receipt'of 10 cents for each pattern in silver or staiflPs A Simple Sehool Dress. 2652-RePP, 1)opliti, gabardine, gingham, galtea, chaSl brey, percale and linen are good for thil moe.The sîceve may be in wrist or elhow length. The patternl 15 eut in 4 size-s: 4, 6, 8 and 10 veurs.Sie0 quires 3 vards of 36-ineh nnt era'. pattern of this illustration mailed to SDY address on rcceipt of 10 cents. 13Y Naie Corefli NO. 3--wormwood 4-Vendetta - Br Oharle8 GerVIO 1",
         "TH9 WESTERN HOME MONTHLY 9/(aôam Gloves are always GLADLY received- especially if the name DENT'S la on the gloves-it con- veys the apprecia- tion of the best, and isl the guarantee of fidainty finish, per- fect fit and wearlng quality. - -IS ON DENT'S A Splendid Dress for Sehool or General Wear. 2337-Gingbam, galatea, charn- bray, drill, linen, khàki, serge, gabardine corduroy, velvet and satin ýmay bc used for this style. The fronts are reversible and oveilap at the centre, with the beit sections or sash ends joined to the front edges and holding the fulncss over the sides and back. The pattern is cut in 4 sizes: 8, 10, 12 and 14 years. Size 12 requires 42 yards of 36-inch material, with 2 strips 36 luches long and 5 inches wide, for the sash ends. A pattern of this illustration mailed to any address on re- recipt of 10 cents in sikver or stampe. A Good Service Dress. 2650-This is a good style for gingharn, chambray, gai- atea, drill, percale, and other cotton fabrics. One could also havre it in serge, g abardine, or fiannelette. The right front clse over the lef t. The sleeve iu wrist length, imay be finished f or a closing at the seam, so that it may be turued Up. The pattern is eut in 7 sizes: 34, 36, 38, 40, 42, 44 and 46 iuches bust measure. Size 38 requires 5V8 yards of 44-uch material. A Good Comfortable Apron Model. 2333-This style is nie for percale, lawn. gingham,.charnbray, drill or khaki. The apron is in one piece, with added straps that cross over the back and are buttoned at the waistline. The pattern is eut ini 4 sizes: smali, 32-84; medium, 36-38; large, 40-42, and extra large, 44-4h juches bust measure. Size mnediumn requires 3Y4 yards of 36-inch material. A pattern of this illustration rnailed to any address on receîpt of 10 cents in silver or starnps. 2264-House coat for men. Cut ini 7 suzes: 32, 34, 36, 38, 40, 42 and 44 inches breast measure. Suze 38 requires 3y yards «~ 36-inch material. Price, 10 cents. 1506-Doil's Set of Short Clothes. Cut ini 6 sizes: 14, 16, 18, 20, 22 and 24 iuches inx length. lt wil require 5'~yr o h drawers, 7g-yard for the pettîcoat, and 1 yard for the dress of 36-inch material for a 24-inch suze. Price, 10c. This pattern also cornes in child'a sizes: 1, 2, 3 and 4 years. Price, 10c. Waist-1807. Apron and bag-1844. HAD PIMPLES ALL OVER NUS BODYa The naaty, unsightly littie pimples thst break out on the face and other parts of the body are simply littie irriltating re- minders thftthe bo\u003c\u003elin out of oreand requires purifying. Burdock Blood Bitterashbu heen os the market for the put forty years, aud its reputatiofl isurivailed. a a£ medicmne to drive ail the impurities out of the blood, thus eradicatiilg the pimple ansd Ieaving a bright, clear gomp[eion. Mr. T. W. Steward, 165 Avenue Ro\u0026d Toronto, Ont., write:-\"I wau trouble with pimplea aIl overmy body- 1 hae pn to mention il to a friend who a\u0026- vised me te urne Burdock Blood Bittera. 1 am now using the third bottle, and .i am very pleaaed with the reaulta. 1 have no m[ore irritationansd feel a whole lot botter in every way. Your medielue me tI have fixed me up in geuerai.\" Burdock Blood Bittera ianmssufatoMw *nly by The T. Milburu Co., Limitai, Toronto, Ont. Sme that thieir nume \u0026pearson the wrapphr. For the Informiai Occasion SUNDAY iht suPPder in unexpectedly - EDDY'S Paper Serviettes are quite appropriate. They lend a certain refreshing, pic-nic-y flavor to the occasion, like when you are seated on the grass, and somebody starts telling stories. And besides they save your inen serviettes -and that's an item nowadays. Aak your dealer for a package of Eddy's Paper Serviettes today. VOU'fl find them useful and economical. The E. B. EDDY CO. Llmited HULL, Canada Aluo makers ofithe Fanious Rdd M4atchs and 1,duraied 'Fshrrwarc. C1 Dr. Martel's Femnale Pis Prescribed sud recomoended by Physicien@. sold for haf a Century in Patented Tin Bot itb hsrignature \"Knickrbocker Reniedy Co.' At vour druigist -- -- --- Accept no Othef. M-lien writing avert iser.s, picase mention The Westernl Home Monthly The skirt measures about 2 yards at the foot. A pattern of this illustration mailed to any address on receipt of 10 cents in silver or stan'p s. A Pretty Dress for Mother's Girl. 2665-Here is a frock that will look weill in any material. Plaid suiting, in brown and green tones, was selected, with brown serge for timrming. The pockets may ho omitted. The sîceve in wrist lcngth good for cool weather, while the shorter sîceve is equally attractive and comfort- able. The pattern is cut in 4 sizes: 6, 8, 10 and 12 v'ears. Size 10 requires 34 yards of 44-inch material. A pattern of this illustration mailed to any address on receipt of 10 cents in silver or stamps. A Smnart Frock for M.Nothcr's Girl. 2272-This will make a good sehool dre-ss in plaid or checked suitiflg, ini serge, ginghaîn, galatea, corduroy or linen. The waist closes over a shield in front. Smnart poces trim the skirt. The seeve is in ,,=ho style. The pattern is cut in 4 sizes: S, 10, 12 and 14 years. Size 10 requires 41 ý yar(ls of 36-inch material. A pattern of thiis illustration mailed to any aýldress on receipt of 10 cents. A smart combination. Waist-1807. Cut in 6 sizffl: 34, 36 38, 40, 42 and 44 inches bust measure. It requires 3y4 yards ci 27-incli material for a mnedium sze Apron and bag-1844. Cut, in one sizo: medium. t requires 2V yards of 27-nch material for the apron, with 7/ yard for the bag. Two separate patterns. 1o for'cach pattern. 2275-A new dress and bat for Misa Dolly. Cut in 6 sizeg: For dolla 16, 18, 20, 22, 24 and 26 inches in lengtb. Size 24 wiIl require IV2 yard of,27-inch ma. tonial for the dress, and V/i yard for the bat. Priee, 10 cents. 2273-A dainty set for dolly. The pattern includes Al styles illustrated, in cut in 6 sizes for dolîs: 16, 18, 20 22, 24 and 26 inehe.s in length. The drc\"s ne- quires 111/4 yard of 27-inch niaterial, the petticoat 2 yard, and the combinlation -Y yard for an 18-inch doîl. I\u003eiee, 10) cen ts. 227S A set of pretty bags. The pat- tern supplies each of the three styles illiîst ratefi and( is cut îft onie size. Each one requires 1 yard of 27-inch inaterial. Prire, 10 cents. HO1RLCKIS Malt.d Milk, for Infants A safe milk diet, better than cow's milk alone. Contains rich milk and maltedgr\"n cztraL. Whlen writing amdvertiboeu, pleaee mentimf The Wewtern Home Montlidy o IISiifflI a a Cap, a Muslln, Winl do tawn or edgi, Ak wcl nelette, silk or ress of [ of 36- f plain )f nain- require ire 2 2 'he cap, he sac, rial. A0 Sto any 5ilver or or busi- aist and lesigu here st Patters tern 2673. îtiste, nain- 1, pique, Or ight choe ge, plaid or elveteen Or Sis eut in 7 d 46 inche 3 yards o 1 ie.Th 3, 2, 30,32 nd reqUJ f or a 24-inheb r edge is la ;tratiori caliS eceipt Of 10 *r or stain'PB 2652-RPPI iatea, cbJIl' rood for thil in 'w115t 0' is eut lIn 4 Size 10 te- material. k ailed to any",
         "HIEA AUES Smo. Un Tdehi 'mURTA.TWES' 'Il. Pu bie FdMdm ficen the vue of your mediolas, 4PhfI-a4i.lwu' a agreatouff«re formauy ye.azfromn XrvousH.-ad- -é M .n oesidom 1 trled avirudàw eomêilted dootonu; but ,motmhg so.a'.4te \"oP me until Im tilli'P'Ut-4-t1v05'. Aller I bad taken oeveral boxes,!1 wus - ompletely relieved of these troubles and have been umisuaiy *eR ever sinc.\" 113n ANNIE WÂRD. \u003chFult-a-tîves' in fresh fruit Juices, eoneentrated and lIreaed In strength, comblnedwlth finesttonie, and la a positive and reliable remedy for Headaches and Constipation. Mo. a box, 6 for $2.50, triai aise 25c. Atal dealensorFrult-a-tlvesLimlted, Ottawa. GIRLS, PAINS AND WEAKNESS Yuh1J f» Lya L Plnlims .Veotablo CompoundL Thousaa4s of Girls B.u.fited St.. Louis, M.-\" WIi.R 1 wasouiy, Iftoen y«ol 14other had to put, me r e vry month I urtdybrag 1 also suf.éred from a weaknoss and mother tock me to 'a doctor but ho did sot belp me. FinAllY mother madile me taeLydia E. Pink- ham'a Vegetable bas made me strong a nd healtby. Bo when mother or 1 lhear any woman complalning we tell tbe»à about Lydia E. Pinkham's Vege- table Compound and wbat It did for M*.\"-Mra JOHN FUAME, 1121 N. l8th St. St. Louis, Mo. diie wbo sufer as Mr.. Frarne did abould flot hesitate to give tuis famonai root and herb remedy, Lydia E. Pink- hsn's Vegetable Compound, a trial, as the. evidence that ie constafrtly being published proves beyond question that this grand old remedy bas relieved more suf.ning axnong women than any other medicine. *For confidential advice write LYdia E. Pinkham Medicine Co., Lynn, Mass. The resuit of their forty ycaxs experi- ence is et your service. Ba aYsiiiuisnIfU'[ounfg By Hendersn Daingerfield Norman They bnought lm their birthday presents- The incense and gold and myrrh; The emptuous Christmas roses, The cedar and box and fir; They made al Hie temple splendid With tapersofpurest ray, And tliey aid,\" Tis a li.avy burden- Tuei keepmng of Christmas Day.\" The Child's sweet eyes looked graveiy At gltter of wax and gold. The gilta that were liard ta brmng Hilm .Were bard for His hands, W hold. Gleaming and bard and splendid Tliey ail on the altar lay, But the Child's dear banda wene empty As sadfly He went His way- He went where a single candie Burned clear on a wmndow-elil A cake at the door ývas neady Tbat the Christ Cbild miglit bave Hie fin. O)uteide was the sheaf for Cbristmas, The. barley and wheat and rye- Tbat the b hd mgi en*oy the Birtbday Tliough snowdrf awer ht and liigli. Withis at a g*n-child, inging A do lieldaeant lier breast With queer littie crooked stitolies The cheished gif t waa dreaaed. For a child lhad prpred theresent, Her lieart witli dealiglt Uglow Tbat a poorer tban slie elould have it- Tlie thig she had treasured so. The Lord Christ stood on the thresliold,. And, watébing, Bis dean eyes smiled On the. liglit the cake, the Christmas sheaf And tlie chiild's gift Wo a child The weary feet were reated, The heant from its sadness freed, With gifts were the pierced hands laden, Hie Birtliday was kept mndeed. pAULmtNZS POYERTY CNRISTUM By Mary L. Stetson \"Tbree dollars! Why, tliat isn't enough to get wliat 'd planned for father'him- self.\" Sorrowfully Pauline frngened the. cipbils, for Chiristmas money, whicli faIter liad just given lier and two big teara rolled down lier cheekcs. \"Oli, dean me,\" slie siglied1 \"if we'd ever got to b. pon, I wisli w. d alwaya been pon. It wouldn't seem n b ard then.\" A knock sounded at tiie library door, a secret knock known only to, Pauline and lier most intimate frîend. \"'Come.\"p The door flew open, and Tiieda Maraton danoed into the. room, but stopped short asE she noticed the expression of déjection on0 Pauline's face. \"Whatever la tlie matter, Pollykin s?\"( she asked. \"Draw your chair up hene by the. fine, and l'Il tell you.\" Theda obeyed and listened attentively ta ber cbum'a tale of woe. When it was flnished, liowever, the least little twinkle lurked in ber brawn eyes as ah. ex-E claimed, -\"0 Pollykins, aren't you the luck rhick!\" \"Yes. Wliy, I neyer liad thre. dollars9 given me ta spend for Christmas, neyer in1 my wbole life. Last year 1 did manage ta save twa fromn my strawbenry maney, and 1 feit rich. I can tell you.\" \"Why, Theda Marston, how do you give sa, many presents, then?\" \"Makce 'emn mostly,\" was the brief reply. \"But I can't aew.\" \"There isn't any such word as 'can't,' or if there is, there ouglit nat ta bc. 0f course yau an sew if you try. Say, have yau anyhing an the docket for this morning?'' Pauline shaak hcr head. \"Neit lier have 1, as goad luck wauld bave it. LPHl un over home and get my sewvîng, and you--O Pollykins, wherc are those lavcly pîcces of silk you were show- ing me the other dav? If. vou don't need thein for pitching, licv'd make the dandiest seîvîag-bagý.s,' anîd like a flash, Theda vas gafle. W'hen, ini a remarkaidY short tinie, she was hack in the V:rîinmIliavsic ias pleasC(l ta tind that Paffe had already P.eople niiii:s:î collected, not only the. piecesOf silk, but also ecraps of linen laces, and tlie like. \"Sakes, wbat a lot of Chr istinas pres- ente you cean get out of ail tliis!\" cried Thed\".\"That linen wiil make the dinkieet little jabots, and her.'s a tbmn piecezt igl* it for a handkercbief.\" Btigirls were moon bard at work. By luncheon-time pauline's plans for Christ- mas were nearly completed, and several of the gifts were weli under way. \"Ar.n't those bajXs gong W o j uat too dean!\" exclaimed Tiieda. \"We'll bave cail i at Woolwortlis tlie next timle we're down-town for the, brasa rings and the. ribbons. lhen you can finiali them i a 1ify 1 tink maines the loveligt of al, 82d I'm glad I knoW beforeband tbat Santa la going W bring me one thig 1 need rîost awfully.\" Durn g the weekstbat followed, Pauie Varnum l.arned the. happineas tbat comes Wo those who make «some real effort for their friende, a happiness tbat had never been liersenn e coUld haves»U the spending money e wished merely for tlie asking. Several days'befor-e Cbistmas the littie gifts were wrapped in white tiuepalr tied witli red ribbons, and carefully laid away in Pauline'e top bureau drawer. 'fhere Woo was a pack of Cbristas postais, every on. of wliich liad been selected espe- cially for the. persan tW wlom it wae-ad- dreeeed. Every card was stamPed ready Wo go in the. mail wlien the. proPer tune sliould come. And a dollar aud fortY.'two cete StOIl e- maied. 111 hardly know what Wo do with the. rest of thie mnoney,\" Pauline rexnarked Wo Tiieda. \"t seems silly Wo give two pres- His favorite tit-bît enta to one pereon, even if the presenta aren't veny big.\" 'I thought you were tlie girl wlio couldn't begin ta buy your Christmas presents with aid y tliree dollars,\" smiled Tiieda. \"But P'i tell you what, Polly- kins. You know tiiose Peteraons that live down on Frencli Ailey, don't you?\" \"'Neyer heard of tbem.'\" \"lWeII, anyhow, tliey go to, our Sunday- school, and tliey're awftil pon. Let'a get Yem up a Christmas box. l'il cook- some- thing, and tint money of youra la enough Wo buy mittena for Mary and Jamie and Georgie; their handa wene just purpie last Sunday, pon kiddies. I shouldn't won- der if we could save enough for a doli and a baok and a dnum, besides.\" '«That's a grand idea, Theda. We'fl do it. I'd 1k. ta know, thougli how you corne ta caîl those children Zl by naine, whle I've been to the samne Sunday- achool and neyer even beard of tbem.\" The box for the Petersons waa filled ta overflawýing, sa that wben the time bad corne fan the. delivering of the Christmas presents two of Theda's young brothera had ta be pressed inta service. Christmas Ev. father'a and mot.ber's gifts alan. rcmained in tic top bureau drawer. Pauline lacked lier chamber door, taak aut the two beribbaned packages, and apened thern. Tii. callan- box, cavered with same af lier own needle- wark was lardly as fine a gift as the sectional hookcase slie had pîaned ta buy for father, or 'vas the soft liinen handlker- chief with its narrow edging of lace alf as nice as th~ ag Nv rit ing-dcsk, that had long since bI col ected for mnother. Ail of a sudlu, iii slite, of te work- sle LADIES C.Is lm t han tyms ON=us. Anl kinde cf Switchee k. t in tock. Write m for prices DR. KLEIN ELITE HAI RPARLORS 207 Endorton Block Winnipeg - Manitoba How (0 Cure Diliousess -otswau faaint emedis cOuha\"lg powerfuld ruge anti alcohoL \"nei Extract of Rootar long kmown »a estmer Selgd!s CnratIne syruphaî,no dope or atron igrédiets 8 t Car. indigestion,, bilioutnesa andi cons8tpton. Cma ho Lad et a»Y drug store.'5 et the. genfaine. soc. end $.OODottles. DON'T WEAR AFTRUSS BRLIAKS' A. modern scientifiu in- vention, the wonder- \u003c ~ ful new discoverY will be sent on trial. No obnoxious springs 4 '~ or pads. Has auto- fatc Air Cushions. B'nds and drawa the broken parts toiether as FOU would a roken 11mb. NO saves. NO Sent on trat toPrOve it. Protected by U. patents. catalogue a\"d mnesurs blsaks matIe tree. SenS name as addrM today. C L. BROOKS\u0026 1618 Stalo St.. M«r86% \"160 -BOOK ON DOG DISEASES' IuorIu'athe Author Mionher FL CLAY GLOVERCOI,la. Dog Modii.. 18 West 31àt Sbree, Nv ew IMPORTED COLLIE PMP \u003cGolden Sables) trom reiS- tered stock. MaleSsi15-0; . ~ Fmals 8100.At stld, ELov elandeS 1ot-yO. regîlste red tn U.K..236978. Fee 0 10.00. Book on 'IcreanS Training ait theCoule,\" 5M. PostPald. 0. DE:TE39RNE Watroua -SULk the largest trade is usu- ally the man whô advcrtises regularly and judi- ciously. The Western .Uoitc .?êothly is a first-class adver- tisiing imcd uin. 's I j had put in t mean. Fat. much more. Then a lio she smiled t] When ne: ceived the( ever Made, f each founc Father's rea, \"'I'd like to 1 A splendid 1 On a littie ci A picture of But since I I'y. worked deai.\" And moti: \"This isn't t MWbich 1 me mine! In Palmer'a You may la will. This gif t la made ft Brings love that is t Other Ch nad smiled when they but this yea; mucli as a coughed an( mother put It wasn't thougli. TI even for tea By \"INo! N cake,\" asaid tliree-year-\u003cc table on N layera of fin, .\"IYour cà !rmarked t( ing. '9\"I rarely she answerl rected liens fail to hai looked aurr \"Ohi no! lau ghled, an and musica fact that ai: cliildren.' Freddie 1 moved awa ' tlie otiier xc out on the byacinths v ,lit 18 jus to the subi( \"I am try 'bad luck' to obey ma help lirnsE The lust fo nice onea; 1 tatian ta m out a largo posely leav must learn meeting th thern. Wl into the. b guard lie w 1 want s80i because it COUffe I C( sometime 1 choice witl wser ta t earlier a cl, ing the. bc w. canefuil babyliood, strang dia \"But lie miglit yiel, \"4Yes, hi must obey not believi the natur When thei if they d\u0026 take the p I thougi and what entered. he could c of the flic by baby 1 fulfrorn cake. 1 watcli flot look 4' THE WESTERN HOME MONTHLY",
         "THE WESTERN HOME MONTHLY had put in to thèse gifts, they seemed so mean. Fathier and mother deserved so much more.% Then a happy thought came to her, and she sriled tbrough her tears. When next day, Pauline's parents re- ceived the only gifts their daughter had ever made, for them with her own hands, eaeh found tattached, a littie note. Father's rend:- \"I'd like to have got you, if I could, A splendid present of glass and wood. On a littie card in the box you'll see A picture of what my gif t would be. But since I couldn't buy that this year, I've worked lots of love into this, daddy deai.\" And mother's rend: \"This isn't the dcsk of mahogany fine MWbich I meant to give you, dear mother mine! In Palmer's window, that's waiting still; You may look for yourself whenever you Will. This gif t la a smali one, but each stitch made for you Brings love and best wishes from a heart that is true.\" Other Christmases, father and mother nad smiled and said, \"Tbank you, dear,\" when they had received Pauline'a gifts but this year they said nothing at ail for as much as a minute. Meanwhile, father coughed and blew bis nose very hard and mother put her handkerchief to her eyes. It wasn't the Christmas handkerchief, though. That was too precious Wo be used even for tears of joy. for the littie child because be had dis- obeyed. Fred did not run or appear Wo be at ail alarmed when caught in bis old sins; he didn't even stop eating the warm cake he still held in bis fat littie flst. \"Mamma la so sorry you did not obey what she told you,\" said she kneeling as she put ber arms around the littie body. \"Does Freddie remember what littie boys must do when tbey disobey manima, and eat the cake when mamina said they must not?\" Ca;ÏYes aidythe chld thuhfly, \"I \"Anýd la that ail?\" asked bis mamma. \"And I can't bave any cake tomorrow for dinner!\" replied the boy. \"And then wbat?\" insisted bis mother. \"Well,\"-he said very deliberatfly, \"I can' t have any more cake at al!\" \"Very well. Mamma la so sorry for her littie boy,\" she said tenderly; \"he can't have any more cake at ail, and it's such good cake, top. It's too bad! Poor littie Fred! Can't have any cake because he ate ail of bis share now. When mammna pute nice sweet frosting on the cake, and cuts, the slices, -then Mary niay have a slice., and Albert may have a nice plece-a.nd what about Fred?\"' \"Fred can't have any 'teensty-weensty' piece at al ! he said bravely, \"'cause I had al.my share now.\" Mrs. Ross iced the cake and put it Wo- ?;ether as best she could. No one noticed At at supper and when it was cut she said flrmly, \"Mary may have a piece of mam- ma's'nice cake; Albert may have a piece of mamma's cake, and papa and mamma and our guest may each have a piece also. Fred-has--already---eaten-his- cake-so- there-is -no-more- for- him! He -hm -alead-hbad- iis - share!\"y Mr. Ross gianeed at bie wife pleadng for forgiveness, but she ignored the re- quest and remained firm. Hie knew also that there was a principle at stalie, and trusted to the mother's wisdom. My beart ached for the ittie boy, but 1 waa beginning to sece and understand hy my friend's children were so obedient1 have neyer seen children anywhere that obeyed so well. I learned afterwards that this lesson had neyer needed to bc re- peated. At last Fred had learned that disobedienoe surely has its penalty-anîd doesn't pay. «Crotn Prince in friendly Ho Me,' a headline announes. Yet the owuLer of the housqliold ini question has mot Bo far made 'publie pratest against the insut of the qualifying word I I PEEDDII'S LAST LESSON By Mms. Charles A. Shul \"No! Nol, Fred mustn't touch the cake,\" said his mother as the fine, sturdy three-year-old pushà Iup against the table on wbich she had placed three layers of fine light cake juat from the pans. .\"Your cake certainly looks lovely,\" I remarked to my friend whom I was visit- ing. 1\" rarely have bad luck with cakes,\" she answered, then smiiling quickly cor- rected herself. \"I should say 1 rarely fail to have bad luck witb them.\" I looked surprised. \"Oh no! you do not understand,\" she laughed, and bier laugh rang out as clear and musical as any girl's, in apite of the fact that she was the mother of tbree fine children. \"I will explain later.\" Freddie badn't said a word, and flnally moved away from the table and went mnto the otber ,room. Mrs. Ross and 1 stepped out on the porch to admire the fine early byaeintbs which were just in their glory. \"It la just this way,\" she said, returning to the subject and speaking in a low voice, obedience. Sometimes Fred forgets. The 'bad luck' 1 referred to la tbat he forgets to obey mamma when she says bie mustn't help himself to cake before mealtime. The lut four cakes I have made were al nîce ones; but every one was such a temp- tation to my liýtte boy that be bas broken out a large piece and eaten it. I pur. posely leave themn witbin bis reacb. He must learn to overcome temptations by meeting them squarely, pot by avoing them. When bie la older Jn goes out into the big wide world the only safe- guard he wifl have wil1 be bis self-control. 1 want 80 rnuch to teach hîm to do rigbt because it neyer pa ys to do wrong. 0f course 1 could choose for hlm now, but sometime bie must learu Wo make his own choice without any aid. To me it seems wiser to try to teach him to make a right decision for imself. I think the earlier a cbild begins to do bis own think- ing the better mnd lbe will develop. If we carefuily train our children from their babyhood, we ouýbt tW reap the reward in strong character.' \"But hie la so littie. Many older ones might vield to such temptations.\" \"4Yes, but I must be finm; my cbildren must obey me. I neyer whip, for I do not believe in it; but I do let them reap the natural resuits of wbat they do. When they are good, they earn a reward; if they disobey, tbey deserve and must take the penalty.\" I thought I heard a noise in the kitchen and what a sight met our cyes as we entered. Fred was eating cake as fast as he could cram it into his mouth, and two of the nice layers ivere baclly mutilated by baby hands. He had elutelhed hands futllt from the edge and center of the cake. 1 watched Mn. Ross's face. She did flot look surprised or angry, only sorry BEAUT and health usually go to- gether. There may be classic fea- tures, but lackifig the clear skin and healthful glow of the complexion, they fail to attract. Pure, red blood is essential to beauty. For, in addition to giving color to the skin, it fils the body with vitality and energy. There is a sparkle to the eye and grace and elasticity of every movement of the body. Ilealth and beauty abound.- Now just because Dr. Chase's Nerve Food actually forms new, rich blood, it is conducive of health and beauty. It sup- plies exactly what is lacking when you become pale, weak, languid, and lose the vivacity of health. Even beauty of disposition and char- acter are marred when the blood gets thin and watery and the nerves are weak and exhausted. You bose sleep, sufer from headclâhes, digestion fails, and you Set to booking on the dark aide of things until you become downhearted and discouraged. But as your system la restored by this food cure you find cheerfulness anai con- fidence returning. The form is rounded out to graceful proportions, the glow of health is shown in the complexion, and you feel the vigor and energy which enables you to accomplish things. With restored strength you experlence the desire to serve and help others, and so beauty of complexion, of forin and of character unite to make you happy and contented. It is only necessary to look for the por- trait and signature of A. W. Chase, M.D., the famous Receipt Book author, on the box you buy so as to be guaranteed against imitations. Dr. Chase's Nerve Food, 50 cents a box, ail dealers, or Edmnanson, B1ates \u0026 Co., Ltd., Toronto. -e-- I 2 The Picture of Health",
         "THE WESTERN HOME MONTHLY BILOUSSPRLLSa When your liver becomes uugs i ia tve he bowels becoine Connu~.ed he. longue becomes ooated th. ea b.d h.SO mac\u0026 \" foui anduicI andbilious poluaocecur cmiacmut of th.ever holding, \" tkhe be whlh i moe *tial té promole th. movement of th. e i aid thb il gels imb the blood, ned ,cf m through the umuai channel. p nlr way to kep1h. hver the g ropeW m tb kep Mid pMtly and do not prilpe, eno m ki goznzyla\"alVe pâlledo. wèU-«I have uaed Mlburn'a Laxa- IÀ, Pâlea for onstpatim and livet com- p4l.Atcas Uime 1unedto have a bl o pel eV\"ry lttie while and once w *bid forfour monbi. ine talcing pila, 1h.biiouu mhave left me. îï O leoome,ý-pýfmedl liverPilba b aile eolhers, hure, and lhey larungroWing direct on reoeipt of price by T~e T. Mil.. butai Co., Limaited. Toronto. Ont. FIfts.m te tiltdrt. Eztuact of sh eo l lthlM\u0026ansd s a uit mfo the cue ob~ldIgeUm .esai 'Pais.sMd Lad bed vlt - thltratiat iiiofs a cme in Marly Oumenmsec ce he gulas aetdnmbglea. W 1~r o u 1 CANCER P.Da vana diacverer of th amoue EVans'can- cer Cure, de- s\"resailuWho ouffe etith Cancer or writto hlm. The Ire at- ment cures external or interai Cancer. R. D.erd WE BUY OLD FALSE TEETH * tu'a ilh CrfbowD1- ,oI n 1r. 1 t epy l S3pr soT'ùl1, AND DENTAL GOLD. W. a.od euh by reum mail mahIoldIg\"for là dayu for andr'a appreval of Our Dq.120 2007 %go. et , ý'phiIsiiphia, Pa., U.S.A. Cured His RUPTURE 1 waa badly rupturcd while lifting a trunkr several years ago. Doctors said my only hope of cure was an operatbon. Triasseâ did mue no good. Finally 1 got hold of something that quiecly and completely cured mue. Years have pasdand th~e rupture lias aever retiariaed, al- thnhI amn doing bard work as a carpenter. There was no operation. no lost time, no trouble. 1 have nothing 10 seli. but will give fuit information about how you nay find a complete cure without operation, if you write 10 me, Eugene M. Pullen. Carpenter, 750E Marcellus Avenue, Manasquan, N.J. Bettcr cut eut this notice and show it to any others *wvho arc ruptured-you anay save a life or at least stop the mîsery of rupture andthie worry and danger of an operation. FIE ls WmI0e \u003e~~ 4 ~ Setwh roebd Rxutie.Yor onE 3 EIBTMU WBV peeped out now, and then w. cOuld go By Ale TiwinMorrsasd pick it lup for mother,\" auggeted By Alce Tawin MrrisNancy. .\"tCbristmas la the proper time \"Now Mis Nan, ~ ~ ~ for surprises, ou kuow.\" \"Nbis Mi matautmomen, et goodgrisd S'prises uOn't corne wheu you are lel .m intck-momepn at, ie fgod.grad b lokn frtem,\"replied Maurice wiselY. wate anyoe l.Im witba big pile oBut noue tht les h.ecrambled out Of ironing waitmng tob b.don., and Nurse bd t hatee d uo. Nncy baroed footacvrs too busy t10 help me with so much as aacl. oteo Nafoiguewe hm, nd eryg handicerchief, aeeiug that your mats not soon the wtw o w- fgrse n el Wh wel n suah. in wsnled up s Ad pn htwdawnow tthdeerigW Jemma'Av sverl ecsiv pllsb h.dowu mb othe gardonnt OW fooded in It Jeittiegave seveadsiv pl t paieemoonlight. net litle irlà ishdr ssP.se tndin ug 1h. as erstil The bare branches ofth invtinl ead toreceive te breeze. The bail evergreens upon the e opposite ide of 1h.e room. iawn s..med le be looking up exetantiy Oil \"But I mueI asic for a Christmas present and th. twlsted thorn-tree---so k. a bout M'I for mother because ae is ill ag Can't oîd man-besido the summer-house had M asic hora.,\" declared Nancy stoutiY, sureiy crooked one witbered arm boblnd cIl clifiglthe bigh fonder wth al ber ita ear. Be ond the ri teatagh i'gi.Thon regardieua of scorched fir, atrip pedy long ince by the rude deS eekansd Ifi houaemaid's impatience, winds of ai but one of its branches, was T3 abe ieaned as far over th. rail as possible, pomnting thal one leirards the pond, acrossumm snd ahouted abrily Mbt the chimuoy: which rau a sbinlng pathway of moon- T \"Please2 Santa Ch1us, bring a present for ligbî. or1 mother wth the othor thigs I asked for. \",Why are thev anl watcbing sud - Her room isthe big oewib two ifdoir, listoning?\" asked Maurice in a hushed - sud I think ah. wrould like a noir baby voioe. botter than suything, bocause she 8AYS \"Th.y muet h. waiting for mothor's nomeone muaetiroar out the lilIle clotheBsta r,\"wisporeci Nancy, looking up le the which are toc, mll for Maurice sud me. \u003cfa k And .etit h. a baby-sistor, pleae,' But aithough- ah. stared untI1 ber eyos added ah. as an after-thought. aehed et tb. quietly sbining stars, nol one But aI lb.eIsat iorda there iras a ery of moved froil is owu place le flash with disaproval from a secnd littie iwhite bed lightning siriftness 10 the earlh. in *e a m» bo wa at .s up very I\"I'm afraid Jomima iras only pro- utraight, sud looling veY àwaiakO tenilg,\" saad eh. dolefully. ind.tet And then Maurice, wbo bad been 'Maurice.had already ordered 1.gfaloigdown uhile ah. ooodup, re wbicbh. wiahed le receive ou the morrow,aerytwnlgluh.pd jà,àÈ,.thexeafer, beon decoyed imb Ilmesomoîbjîri'te on Jm a.He noir sprang over thoere on the farthrad.Lo! out~~ , mpubn bs ister aside And truly, when Nancy looked, Ihore took e place beore th. feuder sud in the dark mater, juat wire the path of thrust bis leusled cunly ead mibe th moonligbt end.d, mas a brigbt spot mhich g.infrelig\u003eît. P sparkrled sud glistened. \"Hi! 'nta 111us\" aoutod be. 'J'\u003c 1'\"Oo-o-hi\" gasped ah., aeizing Maurioe'a bring a girl-a boy will h. ovex 90 muc aud raid aqueozmng it very bard. \"Ta it more fun. Besidea it's the turu for a eall star? Can it bemoth.r'spres- brother, because Nanc came? But at Ibis pint1h.patience of the Mann. dagedaia isbad u long-suffering Jemia rau out, sud both ailbin down upon the bgrtbug egan amal aupplicanta w.re aeized asuam-. euilon bis stockinos manly bustled into bed. (N'0 course!\" repLd le èecisiveiy. \"'Il bhave no more of Ibis nonsonO, \"lin else could il be? Be quick sud declared ah. firi. C\"As if Sata Clau s s would bring a little baby down the But ho was not allowod le finish bisI nasty black cbimney, irben everonefl lecture, for both children sat. boit Up- knows they corne nice sud COMfortable righit in b.d Iwo sînail bands seized bis, in faling strs.\" wile Imo Ijîte voices mere raised a \"nflig stars?\" cried lh. cildren ilu inCImuiIy. surprise.. Is il a baby ister?\" cied Nancy. \"Butldon't the stars break whoii IheY \"Or a baby brother?\" shouled Maurie.. fait?\"Ygtoto The doctor iaughed as he rose from bis ,,And hou do the babies gloIo chair and walked toirards the door. tbem?\" \"If you go to sieep aI once and do nol \"And wre are the als t bic e lrytsuy more 10, meddle with Santa came in?\" Claus's business,\" said he mysteriousiy, \"And why-\" 'I should not ironder if you find ln 1h. \"I'm nol a-going to answei' one more morning that mother bas two Christ- quession. So thon.!\" replied Jemima, nmas presents-a baby son and a baby* Iucking up the smaal beds wilh rough daughter.I but kindly hands. \"You j ust shut your The children looked aI each other with LI eyes and go to sleep direclly-niinute, and shinlng eyes as the door ciosed and they wben you irak. up you'fl sec irbat YOlI snuggied down once more. will sec.\" \"Mother must have had tbe biggest sud \"lWill it b. a cannon and a ruotor-car brightest star of ail,\" remarked Maurice. and a cricket bat and a guinca pig?\" asked \"And those littie UflUs in the water musIt Maurice, raisîng himself upon bis l)lllow have brought new babies to the frogs and to sec if a long stocky-borrowed from the fishes,\" replied Nancy. \"Wliaî a Nurse-mas stii hanging f rom 1h. b.d- good tbing me did not lake them away!\"P post where he had suspended il. A few minutes later a sleepy voice \"And a baby-doit, and a tea-set, sud a murmured: white rabbiî with pink eyes, sud a ieal \"They can. play with the cannon, sud f un mut'!?\" inquired Nancy. th. guinea-pig, and 1he tea-set andhle 'I shoulda t monder,' said Jemima, whbite rab-' as she blew out the candie and piaced il But here il trailed away mbt silence, with the matches upon the high manlel- sud there mas no answer but a suore sheif. \"And a baby sister?\" continued Nancy. \"oa baby brother?\" shouted Mauraoe. But 1he firrn closing of bhe door was lhe TRULY TR\u0026NIOULt' only answer. Jemiîna had at tast escaped le her ironing. By Clara Manabalil' For a few moments after sh. bad gone cc Ihere was no sound in. the room, save the \"'Make us lruty Ihankfui\"'1 That is B sptarting of a little bita. flame in the fire, irbat I have to say irben il ha my day P and the fait of a coal tapon the hearth. le say grace, and I suppose I ought Then Maurice, irbo had been staring at th, to be trulier thankful on Thanksgiving fiickering light upon the ceiling, spoke Day than at any other time, but when I musingly: can't have anything that I reaiiy irait \"I1 saw a star fait one night wben 1 very much I can't bc anything but . peeped-out of the windlow after Nurse unt'hankfut, no matter bow bard I mav had gone downstairs. It feU mbnt Cario's try.\" e kevnne1, 1but it wasn't. theav aext morning, So said Kate Durham bo herseif andi1 anud there wasn't no b-11w ither. There then she ment on: wasn't even a puppy,\" added he after a ''Il mas horrid in Tom to sas- I oughit few mioments' thought. to want freekies and chilis ani fever, ani \"Perhaps me should see another if we a gingham frock that caime off the sarne Mne, »tg*\"Maetive. aveinu Internai arumi 'aprmad Crusoeue relle, te Paro'Ma0\u0026 ooplng 0gh aMd apaMmoie CroUPtupaonces; It nIa acommun od belote Itbau a chance Of develoPlng ta momeuhlnsworse. ndexpeience ahawms hat a rec d lua adangeul od lrm. BaiInglon BoothR ma: Ne fally. wbere e ame Zoo. childsu. lsould b. witisout tibia The a\u0026r o carletbs antmspt vapon, lnbaled wlth wy breatI4 mkesbrethngessy mmd relieve tie mton. assurig restia ta. St la caiied a boom by Asthmna suif eVer. For the bronchial OMPlicatIonfS onai, etFVer and aube, and as aunaid inthe treatment of D]Phtherla. moisine la valuami on accomRS01 ste powefl germi- Mlqualitlus. t la a Pr.eto to toeesed cruoene s ecu mdain laisls 38 yeare of afooul u». Id by Dulau Send for acrlptivebooklet. Try' Cresolene Antj\u003etIO Throat Tablets for Uic Iated Uiroat.coom (ofilipperyedm bark. Ilorice gar anSCruolene. ThcymcaWSharm yu. O! YOur ugglet or fram aun. 100. luaap. HEVAPO-CRESOLENU CO..62 Cortiand St..N.Y. Lneua-MUea Building Montreal, Cmanda PRINTING ÇWedding Invitations, An- nouncements, At Home Cards, Visiting Cards.. ÇPrinted from type; also engraved and printed from copperpiate. -~Society Stationeiýr printed '1and embossed f romn steel die. ÇSamples, suggestions and prices on request. -STOVEL COMPANY LimiTrED A COMPLETE SERVICE Putanw., ElbsmAviwo, Linaocmaul BANNATYNE AVENUE WINNIPEG. MANITOBA TeSecret DI TCAnd Forn BUSTJSent Fe Madame Thora'a French Cor- ame Systern of Bust Develop- mentis ajimpIe home treatment aand in guaranteed to enlarge the Shut six juches; also filla hoilow Ipaeain neek and ehest. 15 ana benue by leading actrueie and soeiety ladies for twenty r cars. Book giving f ull particu- ara ent f ree. Letters 'iaedly econidontia. Write to-dalr. Mh urThn WW Ca, D.p M, TamisOut N(alted Milk for the Home A. nourishing food-drink for Al1 Ages. Anywhere at anytime. Delicious,sustaining. No cookh4g Men\u0026 GHantea h.I M1USIC T FREE laYour BHomMe BY the Oldest and Most Rellable SOhool or Music plae, luAmerlea-Establshed 1895 Refginncrs or advaned plny, r. One 1 esfon Weely Ilustratlon banake cveryualr.g plaIra. Only expense bout 2eer day to eover eost of postage and mlugie j5ed \u0026rIte for FRE Bookiet. whieh expinIuu verytlalng Ina fui!. Ameriean School of Music. 2Lekesîde 1Bide.. Cbicý.. - ~U m cureS nt bhune:, ce e\" Sa9wua x-M-s'c- Goitre 569 y4 2- HE F pal] auddei lions \u003c evor t port«a ened, bonI. Mil juast Ii Mr. Heart I iras' would dizzy i dowm illnaa monde 50e. a on rect Limite qr: by atisr hav, trie( aftei ceav four pever havq terr Rhe I of r lous havd be i £rdl are that Bld Mr truc Mr!",
         "THE WESTERN. HOME MONTHLY HUIT PALpTitam FANT AND DIZZY SPELLS. WOULD FALL DOWN IN FAINT. Palpitation of the hesrt is very often accmpanied by weak, faint and dizzy upelsa, and is generally cauaed by smre uudden fright, or associated with condi- tions of a nervous breakdown, but what- ever the cause, it in of coniderable im- portanethat theheart should bestrength- ened, and brought back to its regular beat. Milburn's Heart and Nerve Pils are jut the remedy to do this for you. Mr. Henry Fawcett, Killam's Mifle N.B., writes:-\"I1 have used Milburn'a Heart and Nerve Pilla for heart trouble. 1 was very weak and run down, my heart would palpitate, 1 would take faint and dizzy spels and sometimes 1 would fal down n a int. 1 star ted to take yur pille and 1 must say they have done wonders for me. 1 wil always speak a z~ood;rd for your Heart and Nerve Milburn'u Heart and Nerve Pilla are 50c. a box at ail dealers or mailed direct on reoeipt of prioe by The T. Milburn Co., Limited, Toronto, Ot. RHEUMATISM à HOME CURE GIVEN Dy ONE WHO NAD ET In the spring of 1893 1 was attacked by Muscular and Inflammatory Rheum- atism. 1 suffered as anly those who have it know, for over three years. I tried remedy after remedy, and doctor after doctor. but such relief as 1 re- ceived was only temporary. Finally, I found a remedy that cured me com- havte y. and it bas neyer returned.I haegven it ta a number who wcre terribly afflicted and even bedridden Rheumatismn, and it efected a cure in every case. I want every suferer from aay form of rheumatic trouble ta try this marvel- Ions healing power. Don't send a cent; simply mail yaur name and address and I will send it free ta try. After you have used it and it bas proven itself ta be that long-loaked-for means of cxming yaur rheumatism, yau May se4 the pvice of it, ane dallar, but understand. Idoa fot want yaur maney unless yau are perfectly satisfied ta send it. Isn't that fair? Why sufer any longe; whcn rositive relief is thus ofered you free? Dan't delay. Write to-day. Mark H. Jackson, No. 316E Gurney Bldg., Syracuse, N.Y. Mr. Jackson is responsible. Abave statement truc. Mr JackSon la refonslble. Abov e statem fnt true. FIBRE EGS 4-POU» Mm U LEG-ON E a\"TTEM oImpff mmBiur auDaoWUIUL 50-dtrBoo\u0026hB ELO Tmimi D 61 aMMDida.. MnaaeobîMma piCS with Bily Bratton's handkerchief, sd then 1 could ha ths.nkfl vwithout half trying., Oh, 1 vish I vas dead and buried!\" It vas that gingham frock that brought on Kate's fit of% hor. Slip had asked te wear a silk one in honor of the Thanks- living festival, but her mother had said it would be foolish to wear a slkin the woods, where the chances vere she vould have it ruined hafore the day vus over, and that a gingham vould ha much more suitable, even though ber only clean one, according te ber brother Tom, bore a striking rcsemblanoe ini pattern te the Madras handkerchief sometimes sprted by the balf-breed vho supplied the Durhama fainily vith venison and wild ,Jvei LtheItop. turk ý during their residence on the FlrV coast, vhere they . hi gone te spend the winter on account of Mis. Durhar's weak lungs. Kate's freckles vere an olc-time grievance and the chilIs and fever she did not so mucb mmnd as naturally she vas let off from lessops on her chili day, but te have te vear \"«Billy Bratton's hsndkerchief\" on sucli an occa- sion us this wben there bung in the closet a blue slk she had vorn te church on the preceding Thanksgiving (vben the family vers at their home in the city) and had not yet quite outgrovn, this vas an rndigmity not te ha ligbtly borne and us Kate sat rocking herseif hm a aifi that vas net very securely fastened te the rickety old wharf near the palmette leaf thatched santy, vbere the family vere marooning, and, us Tom expressed it, wearing out hï old clothes, she begaix te, wonder how ber mether woulci feel if ber onlydaughter vers te ha found drowned i that dark swift-floving tide. \"lShe smiiled,\" said Kate, \"when Tom called this old thing 1 arn veaxing 'Bill7 Bratton's handkerchief,' but she vouldn t smile wben she vus tryig te take it off of me, ail vet and me\u0026sy. The freckles would show verse than ever un my white dead face, but I sbouldn't care then, ne matter if people did say Tom had bis mother'a complexion insteaci of me. No 1 haven't anything te ha thankful for and 1 miglit us vel ha dead us alive. Ùgh! wbat vas that?\" That was the spiashof the rope's ondin the vater, for the careless fastening bnci hacome loosened and the skiff vus nov floating down with the tide. The cmr had haen removed, and as there vus ne one vithin bail, Kate vas heliess. To be found drowned did not present the comnforting prospect nov that it bnci donc a short time ago, and Kate vas quite wiling to spare ber mother andi brother the pangs of remorse site knew tbey woulci feel at tbe sight of ber lifeless form, arrayed in that hcdraggled old ginghain. The inlet was scarcely two miles away, outside of wbicb vere great, fierce breakers and sbe vas approaehing it as rapidly as tbe rushing ide could take ber. \"I1 won't go out to sea to ha drovncd anyvway,\". sbe exclaimeci after thers vus sucb a wide vaste of water between ber boat andi the wharf that ail hope of rescue bad deserteci her. 11 know a little about swtmming and if I can't swirn VII drown bere in tbe river, closer home.\" Kate vas not the girl. to deliharate long, and an instant sfter she took this resolve there vas a splasb into the vater and the little girl began te move her arma. about like maci. The methoci didn't seem te, work, but just then a log camne floating by vbich Kate grasped vith ail ber usli strength, thus keepîng ber bead ahove vater. A moment lnter Biily Bratton's canoe bove in sight from bohind a smail island, denaely wooded vith mangroves. \"Save me, Billyratten. I amn drovu- ing!\" spluttered Kate. \"CNo, you ain't\" wa the encouraging rely \" wade ashore while 1 catch your boat, Shallow sait vater good for cbil'un. Cure the, chili and mek 'em grow. Then, to Kate's surprise, she foumd that though she vas a considerable dis- tance from shore, the vater vas only up to her vaiat. It vas weary wading, but as she vent forward the vater vas waist deep-, knee deep, ankle deep,.and at asat, vith a gasp of relief she stelped out on a sheil bank the moot doleful picture imaginà- able, but no longer in fear of death7by drovning. Tom, who met ber in the îil orange grove betveen thei river and the house, called ber a drowned rat, but ho vas too eager to get down tothevwharf to meet Billy, Bratton (they vere going fisin toeter) to say anythmng more. At dinner, bowever, vhen s e e r apperace in that blue silk frock (thanks toer ginghamn being nov non-presentable) he usked if she vere returnin thanka because shevwasn't ea ilylratt 's handkerehief and she replied: \"No, but I amrn rly thankful that I didn't have a chiltis morni n~d that theriver in TE SOUTHR-WIND By Hmriet Preseott Spofford. Made of a miat of jevels, The moth on a vondrous ving Sang te the South.vind, \"ýOh, lift me In yonr sakley vandering!\" And the beautiful vagrant at dew.fall Fluttered a broken thing. And the live.coal vhispered the, South- wind, «Fa me te lUfe, I pray; Blow me te large and splendid flanie Brigbt as the plumes of day! \" And white and dead, when the vind had passed, Te aah of the live-coal lay. And the red rose breatbed te tthe South- vind, \"Bo sweet the. gardena are, Fa\"n ould I .end my fragrance Into aome fartber star.\" And the vind, for the burden atooping, Tore her, and scattered ber far. And the lady ighed te ber lover, \"Love me, love, vhile you mayl Though the cup of loua hoe bitter Wben the trembling lip is grey, 1 shall have drunk deep of gladuess; 1 shah have hsd my day!\" Ride a c« o erm. They Cleans. Whil. They Cue.-Tbe vege- table compounds of whîch Parnlees Vee tble Pille are composed, ,nainl adlon and mandrake, clear the stomach and intei- tines of deleterious matter and restore the deranged organe ta healthful action. IHence they are the best remedy for indigestion avaîlable to-day. A trial of them will estab- isb the truth of this assertion and do more ta convince the ailinq tItuan aytbting thaS cm bc. written of these palle. ,winiqffltg, Brenhili OD'S E SYRUP. \u0026wMu% MA. w - w nW3 w-a- f v 1 bad used It» bote I Seud rwhieh Ioud MotdoA tri e d v r y h a L»\"f i the omly hgag tbt gavego od My huobmd Sfi *~~i ýy fro broncitas mand did m neiehe mmnd ihighly e.moMOb.» Many seople oa -the baut Sileh col or cough neglet il,,_ikiS gets ut u t iles on ithe bufflmm séiaous resuta ensue. On the Brt agof a eough or eald, rtritofit befor.i~tot.uid. Take a et dm fDr. ood'à Norway Plne Syup Md mes boy quiodklit vin Ii i appear. Ttàsterliffl rmd bu.boom on the market for tb. put auyesru Md stam\u0026 hmai Md should er OU smlior oough Put up in a yel rappr iii h . lrien th. truie ma-'pao. 5W.Md 300. Manufaelurd obly 6; Tii. T. Mllbum Co., lamited, Toroatob Ont. J. H. M, CARSON amotarot et LIWW\" uJ.EDE 338 C.Iony st, Wimlpeg Wben writinq aivertisý, erljaoementloa The WeoternHome Voui",
         "THE WESTERN HOME MONTHLY A WOMAN WHO HELPS WOMEN 1 know yow nu.d fctSymfpathy sud £ÂCd the tretment that glves me bmlth ud atFe gth, uew luteret in 10%f WnIt to Pmuon to you, ùat yS Io m\" e5j0 the pridee boam ci Wtbave si '%leseoSuU V~mi eo 'a 11,1118 7 t\u0026dvidua ilà ood, ther wXth u o b omen lu cana\"a wo Jý yatrag our Irouibies sud !ptfl- a\"s y ua xteurvuedepls- MP moi , hoy, duqrs 10M'7yfear of tg wfl a\u0026bou t 1 apCreep'ngfui-, mp.wapltsufa erie.bot mmesrageel\"ing IhatMe1. l uDt ootb lhing,Ii nebmodt-a fr My oonlet ton da treatut entley t»s \u0026sud peplop'roo oullatticms Roud M y FREIE Ofbrw aulimoucn M e yand mrely overcomoat To Notiie of Daughterm 1 will orplias jour wu bone, wtho the expenos f hIl.simple home lreatmeut which apedl m ila tntetor tho edangez ofsunoper\u0026tlou ý.»effctelly diapelabeadaches and=lmtude la Wbearuosbave been beOltd, 1 âI .alI oniy on oe n etue hmt lmnn ethoeuffrer. M ony a r .614 daughter. Renmeritcoetayounothafl\u003c yowigroic vei nethod of borne treatmet a eom- MRSe M. SUIN ERS, fu Box 86 UfttDSOft.ONT. mn*m' ueueg\"' If It'sMmd. or RUBBER 4 111.. W. HaEflI t aiemdo.p l cu. Yo Om.ra. Suply CO. p * . e 2704 Mmmal .b1 t oa lia, , w ct utarBajo \"xm\u003cuna.?Coe, .Tromboue, Mrute, CI lue.coolo. Bkht hwi nn. No ouliper ee, the abltY t PU\u0026Y b. ahut ou 01 your coupon -or postalt to-day Wo our nov Fr00 Book. Lt oes teil you how Yeu CM a .al. quiokLy. thorUly lests to Pla own home. without a5 bachet, byOur Newyorfvrt ilaihtueib oeI 7 Dont B a Wal Fowe\" ved Homo 5td Meihod eITHOtIT PAY timD private teachoe eeorclaoe-no inconvenlence. no trick musir. Do \"numbers.\"Myet ipe ondorful amazlDhl eaBy foru S oves a mer hld~Schooi FRRE LSSONSPlease send me We want to bavONE PUIIN BACH LOCAL-- yorfe book. I!lustc Leffsons by ]YTY AT ONCE to help advertils our wondetul, easy a.-epangho1 uystem 0f teaching music. FOR A LIIITFD TINIE vo thereforeoffer our marvll\u003cu asFREE. O nly ran lparfl ta play. 1 would ___-- . nsaeand het .., 1. wheh la aMsi. like to learn how to play the Beginners or advanced ppl.Cet ailthefMroof. facis, jettera from upn . Z INO FREE O0FFER and fasclnatlng Nv ý.bBook jluit lssued. ALL FREEN Write postal to-day. V. S. SCHOOL OF MUSIC 1212 Brunswick Bldg. - NEW YORK .............. Eus Learned to Drive \"Tin Lizuls\" Dear Editor:-Having been a reader of The Western Home Monthly though only for a fcw months, I thought I would drop afewiUnes. I think the magazifie le splendid sud I enjoy the correspondence column. I live three and a haif? miles from the citv. I have been doing al kinde of outZloon, work tins summer. 1 have also learned te drive IL \"Tin Lizzie.\" I cnjoved the letter from \"Restiess\" and w4uld like te, correspond with hins. If any one ceres te, write, my addrese le with the Editor. \"ueieJu. A Book Worm Dear Editr-I amrn su nterestcd reader of your p\u0026per,ý espccialy the correspondenoe page. I love ail out- door sports, such as skating, driving, sleighing sud others which I won't bother narning, as it would take up too, much- of vour paper. I amn juet a country girl .wit'h derk hain sud dark brown eyes. I ams five feet three inches high. Ilove to read books. I could ait aIl day and read, a thing I sornetines do. I arn also knitbing now, but would rather ncad. As thie les my first letter to your paper I wiil close, sud if some of your redre wifl please write me I will be OIadte answer ail lettens. My address is wth the Editor.1 \"A Lover of Books.\" With the popular magazine of the West. Bo« Soc\"alsRaJaSeMoney Dea Editor :-Is there room for another letter i your intenestig page? I have been a reader of your paper for some time sud look forward to the correspond- enoe page monthly. I certainly agree with Cutie Curie about girls asking boys te bake them to dances. I thik it le the boys' place te ask the girls. I don't think there is any harm in havig dances for patriotic purposes, but 1 think more rnoney le naised with box socials. 1 amn a lover of letter wniting and would be glad if any of te boys or girls of my own age, 8,wouId wie Wishig The Western Hme MJonthiy every success. \"Dimples.\" Envies \"Happy Anda\" Dean Editor:-I arn not a subecriber te yeur papen but it ,cornes to our home sud I take great pleasure in readmng it. I think tbe conrespondence column iterests me most. I live i the East but have read much about Western Csuada sud envy \"Happy Anda\" and bier fara pets. 1 would only be too î,leased te hear from the boys and girls, if they would be kind enough to w-rite to me. \"Wbirlwind.\" Selped Stook Grain Dear Editor:-I have been an in- tcrested neadler of The W cstern Home Mont hly and amn very fond of the correspondence page, so decided to w-rite iny first lutter. Like a lot of othèr girls, 1 helped to st aae grain this summier, and, believe mie, it i. no easy job. 1 read the lutter froim lRestless.'' and think lieîs very fortunate indeed ta receive ail the copies of the mnagazinie except one. 1 amn a ('anadian lass of seventeen So if any one ceres to write my address le with the Editor. Now I must close. \"Brunette.\" Busy Young IFarmer Dear Editor-I havebnr .digThe Western Home Monthly 1 avmn-iiseo correspondenoe page 0 huht I would sec wht 1coud0do at helping thc page along. I arn a young f armner and h ave been ver busy ail asummer ase help was so scarce. I se that a number of the girls have been help*mg with the harvest. They are plucky. I wonder if the girls in the East arc working on thc ferme? The fanra ie rather a lonesome place for on people, but till find itnot so idl there arc a few dances now and again. I sec some arc kicking at dancing m war turnes. Wdi,Ithink if theywere inthe same p.aoe as some of us boys they would think dfret, for of ten we are ail alone for a week a a time, and I tbink they would be glad to go bo a dance if for nothing cisc but to talk to eomcs one. Some may tbink it f un to go homestcading and baching, but 1 would sooner go to war than start ail over again, though 1 don't feel like giving it up now after working so hard to get a start. Many of the boys around hee, çr tired of farming alone and enlited,'ut 1 have stayed with it, and wiil do so until after the war for whcat le badly necded. Now I think I wiil close. If any one ceres to wnitc, I wiil answer ail lebtere. My add essàwith thc Editor. \"4A LouelyBY.70 Nover 1db on the Farm Dear Editor-I have been a reader of The Western Home Monthly for some time, though only a subacriben for four montbs, sud amn very interested in it. I like the correspondence column the best as there are some very interesting letters. .1 live on a farm and like it very much. You are your own boss, sud if auytbing goes wrong it is your own fault in most cases. We owu 17 head of cattle 10 head of horses, and find pleuty te doO in the winter time doing chones sud drawing wood sud straw. In the winter we go te skate onoe a week, sud enjoy the drive goig and corning as we have five miles te, go. Wc generaily go in sleigh loads. I arn very fond of othen sports such as horseback riding, hunting and fisbing when there le nothing cisc te do. I would like to correspond wfith any pi betweeu fourteen sud eighteeu. Wshing The Western Home Monthly every suc- ces, I sigri mysef, \"Fermer J.\"1 Loves to Help Our Boys 11Ove Ther\" Dear Edito.-I arn a subscriber to The Western Home Montlythe best magazine I bave ever read. I arn much intcrestcd in the stonies sud poetry, but more sei bbc correspoudeuoe page. I have wanted te wrte for ever se long b ut have Just now picked up enough courage. 1Ilive out mi the country but not on a fana. I sec that \"Sweet Sixteen\" sud \"Cutie Curie\" are discussig ovenalis for girls. As I arn \"Sweet Sixteen\" myscif I wil oin in bbc discussion. I have two pairs Of ovenails sud have worn thern al summer, I tbink they are \"the best out.\" \"Baebful Kid\" sure much be baehful if he thinks a girl should go sud ask a boy to g o te a dance. There anc a number of bashfu boys anound here but not nearly as bad as \"Bashful Kid.\" A piece by a \"Western Bach.\" le much diseussed, but as I arn oniy ixteen I arn unabletodiscusswithhiîh. I lietheletters frorn \"Hubby's Darlig\" and \"Lonely.\" 1, too, agree with \"A Sport\" i thinking there le ne harai i dsucing. We have dances here quite frequently i order to raise Red Cross funds. I love dong thing to help \"Our boys over there.' elas t is leMy first letter I muet not take up too much precious spaoe aithough I have very much more te write. Should any one like te write te me, my address is with the Editer. Iwill aser aIl letters promptly. May good luck be with your paper. I sigu as \"Red Cross Reoee\" ................aaeu m mlhhIIiIIIIIiIII ___=SUPERFLUOUS HAIR Can be permanently removed by the proer use of the Elec- tric Needie. A skilled operator wilI not ail in giving sa tis factory resuits. ,I have made this work a specialty, and after over twenty years' steady practice in the city of Winnipeg, 1 amn in'a. position to assure my patrons that they will make no mistake in giving my safe and sure mrethod a trial. Send for bookket \"'Hmklh and Beou*y- for Jlrther particu\u0026zrs. 'CONSULTATION FREE Mrs-.'COATES COLEMAN PHONE MAIN qq6 224 SMITH STREET = 3 LLLLLLLLLLLLLL-3 ?r foîtowln'z liri 0 Name ..... S Address...... Côrrespondence cw 0 Dea column. teretig to get aoe privilege, ily if I n and have On finish to, take i wards se( had a f my work but it is ou the fait mathinerj father of spend mni; SuIflmer i I arrived, time. I especis.lly with drivi Scarcel, streets o] 1 noticed recent coi writer st district se Controilei Sunday n extent th practice Coei t. toaidin wening- for Christ Althoug enoe, I m expressed of Love-i has beei follow thi my addri wfelcome readers. with this 1 Home M\u003c cation, ai With gree sigu myse] Dear terested r vers I h mnes. Th your page good forti Love set top c, in written by exact Iy. mens*who attention sinaiport that even* aeparatios Do sot th I speak fé dear frieni With\" overail.\" and lest raked and and almoi whih in n team. I1 t in bachxul needs hell For a few rame I W'i in and stai small kidd dinner to keepe you In rega do not daî nor harm îny teens' every cha to do so. Editor to crusbed a running t) quite hea] you al. An Oiit dier, the f door labore and the el Ecctric C ease pain,i lumbago ar eqnal. The home rncdi\u003c 10",
         "THE WESTERN HOME MONTHLY Dear Edior:-Can you spare a few ,~oqisto another hitherto gilent, but Zotzeslesa interested, reader of your column. You seem to have auch in- teresting discussions that 1 would like to get acquamnted wth you and have the privilege of saying a few words occasion- àlly if I may. 1 arn a farmers daughter, and have spent my life s0 far in Ontario. On finishing school I came to this city to take a course ini atenography, after- wardhs ecuring a position. 1 have now had a few years' experienoe and like my work very much. 1 enjoy city life but it is somewhat strenuous. While on the farm, 1 learned to run ail the farmi matinery, and usually relieved my father of much of this work. 1 always spend iy. vacatiïons at home, and this sumnmer hretmg was just begun when I arrived, s0 I ran the binder Part Of the time. I greatly enjoy outdoor work, especially when it has anything to do with driving horses. Scarcely a car is to be seen on Toronto streets on 'Sunday Iately,- as We are trying to do our bit i saving gasoline ugualy wasted on Sunday .oy-ridhig. 1 noticed a letter fromn Ekfrd ýZk i recent eopy of the \"Globe\" i which the writer states that motorists ini that d srceem to be djsregarding the Fuel Controlier's order on the subjeet of Sunday motoring. I wondered to what extent that was true and whether the practice was general throughout the \"o0ntry- I'm sure Canadian people in geneal would sacrifice more than that to aid i winning the war. And we are wnnin-isn't the last news good? It looks as though we would have \"Turkey\" for Christmas-perhaps Germany, too. ,Although 1 cannot speak -from e'cpenl- enoe, I must say that \"'Observer\" bas expressed my sentiments on the subjeet of Love-and-Marriage, which the club bas been discussing lately. 1 shall follow the common practice i leaving my address with the Editor and shali welcome any correspondence from the readers. 1 hope I have not bored you with this long letter. I think the Western Home Monthly the finest kind of publi- cation, and wish it continued auccess. With greetigs to ail the readers 1 will sign myself \"Grace Daring.\"1 \"SoldUer of tri. BOÎ19 Dear Editor-Having been anin terested reader of your page for several vears I have decided Wo pen vou a few lines. This wiil bc my second letter to your page, MY first letter havmng had the good fortune W appear In print. Love seems tW bc a very much discussed topie in your page recently, and the letter written by ILonely\" expresses my opinion exact Iy. In my opinion if some of the men who are seemngly ail love and attention before marriage would keep a inail portion of it for the years following that event there would not be so many separation papers filled out these dayi. Do not think that 1 do not know whereof I speak for I have personaily seen a very dear friend go \"through the miii.\" With \"Undine\" I say \"Hurrah for overà%l.\" 1 arn a soldier of the soil this and Iast year. 1 have plowed disced, raked and bunched and gathered ini hay, and almost always attended my homses which i most cases was a four or five horse teamn. 1, too, have had a littie exTrience in bcig snblieve me, if any one ned epand smathy it iii a \"bac.\"y FrafwdYs i was plowing, when noon caeIwtered and fed my horsesl, came in and started dinner for myself and three smail kiddies, and then proceeded to feed dinner Wo 19 pigs. As the boys saY' \"it keeps you humping.\" In regard Wo dancingwl a that 1 do not dance although see neither sense nor harmnnit. I am ayoung girl still in îny teens and have had and stiil have every chance to lcarn, but do not cane to do so. I will close now, asking the Editor to pardon my uneven writing as I cnushed a finger on my right hand while running the disc last week and it is not quite healed yet. With hest %vishes to you al. \"Cheerio.\" An Oil for Ail Men.-The sailor, the sol- dier, the f sherman. the lumbernian, the out- door laborer and ail who are exposed to injury and the elements wjili fnd in, Dr. Thomnas' Ecdectric Oil a true anîd faithful friend. To ease pain, relicve colds, dress wounds, subdue lumbago and overcome rheumatism, it bas no eqnal. Therefore. it should have a place in ail home medicinea and those taken on a journcy. Which of these Wôrld-Famous Proverbs fits1 Hamypduls aisado is lu \" i iv. m érsm Poefeshmm a musuS a F«»mcsmat la teAbthe rlat. U14 \"sda bave big a m Whs tales c thes a »boné Po\" éby the vrd. ?a de«mimmthe T\" ivdrm.mairuseos FT e 0 smd«e iy lm EaU -sde s @romsetmi mry. M \u0026@\u0026 lss upmtby amui. . 'W SECOND PRIZE Word-ameus Ceclian Player Piano. Value s$8000 THIRDPRIZE Beautiful Brunswick Phonograpit Value $241.00 FOURT PRIZE Locy ~ Shet!and Pony Value S100.00 TWVaVE proverbe Pmohey the dowufail or Gor- T many' in this Great Wear. Saine of thens were 'YOU C.WOS\u0026 writtea centuries ago. othere are cf more rocent rwc- \u003e%'oRo orWgn. but they ail point thescane wy-to the destruc- Dyo tion ci arrogance. tyranny. viuainy.ice. We bave ^N O repregented these twelve proverbe Ï;tweive pictures t^t vithout lte liths. $2,310.08 In \u0026»md pris«eauonb. NxaV won by' thome Who oa lt the comiet proverb te mach picture How to Enter thie Great Contest Only the first of tibla eries of proverb pictures wiU be pnbiishedila Iis paper. Il isshown on he rltand a dlue to it may be found In a lst of a few of the Hua Doating Proverbe opposte. Write out your anawer te thisproverb pictureN. Ion aseeof paper withyour naine and address and muail It to us to-day. If it s correct ye viliiwrite and teil yoen s. and yen vii receive by net mail FREE Jýe n te»r«et1 po The publisbers of Canada'e Greateet MotIMaga- sine are conductd thie great contest. There ore con- testants ame assurei o its abeolute fairm nesud square.. nou. la order te gve an oqual chance te every corn- petitor they have publisbed a fine bock cf Hua Beating P1roverbe. and ail the proverbe repremeted by the serten cf tweive picture, bave beon chomen fron thIis bock. Anaver proverb No. 1lcorrectly and Ibis fine book fli be mnfled te youa free. Witlu t yo-u viii receive thet complte eriesecf tweive proverb picturos vhlch cin- plete lte contest. Thun. there wli be ne waitlng or delay. Ail the pictures vil be presented te you at once and yen cas set to work te mid the asvers tlitIcans vin yen your ohare of these vonderful rzs PROVRI FIRSToPRIZE Magnificent Chevrolet Touring Car Vam. = 00O, and Over $l,50OO in OlLerGrand Prime t itin g e v e r cff e r e d in C a n a d a b e r oto f o r e T h e y i n c uE ; i World Famous Ceclian Playea. Piano, vau.e*800.00 g Deautiful Brunswick Phonoiwapb (play\u0026 ail records), value $241.00; Singer Sewlng Machin., Frantz-Prenlse Vacuum Sweepes., Waltbamx Watches, Levely Shetland Pbany, Furniture, Kitchen Cabinet, StoveDocs, C.C.M. Bicycles, Electrie Cooker, and Many Othors I*.sà/.ffm Prise ais ÀBe NDSent T. en Fie M4M u\"d ^,\u0026»es jat SM B e A =er 'IS AUSLUTELY FMEZ0F EXPENSE suaI~ ~ Ï à =t dulih b onus nhlha ou i..d osl-ievo ublislng buuui a t \u003c . a = -nossam 0abcu mt.filtssis arosA haaAnetIsrs SIXTH PRIZE lamns - oerH mî kOw he nov. Improri Eorywounana Werld. ma bd eMIF Condition attachei gonstimi 700 behusArm*. fremit advertiming campehsin ao igFOU? ce\" leU~V rof roue, friad@ or noigl v v wo iii \u0026pM5 %bisg th-- . lissICaadlaa imoasas. mUand »$lk \u0026 nste Ibesa overy month. This agupls laver IPm vwu eOMpete for pour sbars of ibes e ido estant, W. a wSF H PRZ isviiea 55nh 70Ucopie@ fot 550h o e in if We ami ic. Ie Dam lma. Uga v OTHERS HAVE WON 9BIG PRIZES IR-nue Valua8171U0 S0 CAN YOU Hoèrs sam 4\".nais eorouy \u0026feouet bsbi Pims viassela P 0ions osuIsis.tevb v eladlyrelier. MorsIbm. Sifio.OOS la etbor grand pimas aievards» are esupist s- -1-z m Toquneaisr. tans icha. Oslrislia. Ont lrdTout Car Bor C. NoOrmab. OUata. Ont.; Cbevroisi To-ring car. j. H. Mo RidWiamus Mma.*. Ford Tourine« Csr. W. E. Geddem. Klnhurn. Ont.: Ford Touriag Ca. M . fr;iiii. t. i;Ford touriag car. suis, A. Remss. UmAibs Farilà. 0U64 .@m0 lns ais PlorenoCark. Montrei: 9450 Pianos. Srs. Chas. Staford, Caury; SWCaa Prise. A. de i*lt1vor.U. oiet . Que. NOTE THIES AND SEND YOUR ENTRY IN TO-DAY. THIS ES THE OPPORTUNITY 0F A LIFETME Doo't hetatb. De. t deiar. Ss0\" pourasr te Piturs Ne. ito-day Md dot ail the plousrbPiotmrssOOMOItisj Absheettsud the Hu m stiaipovmrhBesa ven cams Win the auto ou pour skatece tbs bAigold.if ion t,,. ACCoSiASUtk thes ses. etmftastMemend maic am w ta mu tk mchpktuis iftMg desAr WAR PROVER EDITOR, CONTINENTAL PUDLISHIN CO, LTD. 33 CONTIENAL BUIDIG.TORONT O w N. Vhn ii'riting odvertWerg, plcaae e ntion The Wegten, Home Noshly -' ~. - r :7 a",
         "T1HE WESTERN HOME MONTHLY What the WqrId is Sayi ngf kethe Doad Letter Offioe- Soeaet1b IV U l Nev11n\" And now o ny~vrfn ut which one cf bis somsWiliam IibsoIe as saving te ho Emper (À North Amoea,-VmeouvOr Province. ~$~$D* cImnal flure If Gorxany I lon oe away with Hohonsofloru- mtm snYomu bOMM hewarl--Tqpnto Evening News. Why should it Be? InUennrany tbey are quite sure that bis namne isn't sple ie4 CI.e.-Sszi Francisco Bulletin. Armuie'S Long Mtyrdom Alter fifteen hundred years under the harrow of o)ppiesio Armenia as at ladt free -Dundee Courier. led Flanmd White Plu When rovolutionary Germany flew red i fags, the Gemaii military autecracy- flew the white flag.- Toronto Globe. 1 %ofCourse Germen titanmen foared chac-in Germany. Chaos in Bussia, cf course, wua al right.-London Nation. One Advantage They Bad Noneocf the inmates of the penitentir have been attacked by the influenza; but it is a si price they pay for immunily.-Kiiipton Whig. Ring For a Month The epitaph of Bulais King fer a menth Winl doubtlesa ho 'Me Boris ubens briefly but with hoior.\" -Halifax Heraiti. Diabolio Horticulture Henry Morgenýithau says that the Ilun philosophy is \"1roototi in bell. Well, the plan t has always berne flowera of sulphure-VictriaColonist. 14 Ezactly go The last general rearrangement of the map cf «Europe won madie at Vienna, but it will be made seme- where ese the nert time.-EMaonton Journal. Two Vastly Different Thinga Firet the extinct Kaiser declared loudly fer 1\"a Gorman peace.\" Then lbe asked for \"a just peace.\"p Note the differeoek--St. John Telegraph. HRuman Nature Thero are many Calgary people who neyer knew hew much they really wanted te go te church until the order was issueti closing the churches tenMporarily during tha influenza epidemic.-Calgary Aibertan. The Thing That Counrts In the end merale wins wars. The hig battalions ceunt, but the spirit that anionates them counts stil inore.-Neepawa Press. Without Dcubt We've neyer heard Wilhelm Hohenzollerns views on daylight saving, but we're sure nowv be'd be in favor cf moving the dlocks b)ack--say te .Iily, 1914.-Napane Express. Ornitholegical Note Turkey is lef t xithouit a tail feather. and the once baugbty and powerful double-headed cagle of Austria is new as extinet a fowl as tire dodo.-Hainilton Herald. A Vory Anciont Custom, Indeod An eastern clergyman sayq kissing is a relic of the dark ages. We're Ïniglîty glad soînebody liad the good sense te take care of thai relic.-Lethibr'idge Herald. There Io Still Wastefulness-, While waste in Canada rnîy net 1)0 as great as ini pre-war tinys, that it is stili far f ron tire desiredi irreducible minimum there oaho e odoubt..-Monetary Times. One of the Oddities of the War Jerusalem was surrendered te a couple cf British regiental cooks foraging for tire raw% material for a sala. Thîus are listory anti comedy entwined.- London Spectator. An Extra Dose cf Culture Liberated Belgians say' German officers are muoh worse than Germait privat vs. This ta probably true. The officers had an extra doze of Kultur.-Brooklyn Eagle. -r Clumsy Treachery1 One of the verdicts upon Germany that will stand forever in bistory la that German diplomnacy wvas as stupid and clumey as it was treacherous. The diplo- matie trickery cf Germany has been ail thumbs.-New York Sun. Au Old Tezt Proved True -t \"We are a proud people, accustemedti t victr, aiti one of the German peace notes in October. -But p ride goeth bof ore destruction and a haughty spirit before a fall.-Pèterboro Examiner. DisasIter wau Colng Fipt \"We Kings must stick together,\" wrote Emperor Charles cf Austria te King Ferdinand (be styled bim- self Emperor, too) of Bulgaria. But the people who bad been holding up their thrones refused te stick te them.-Duluth Tribune. Promnise and FulIMment Herr Harden recalsa that KCaiser Wilhelm on bis accession remarked: \"I will lead you inte glorinus days,\" andi then adds: \"We know the glorious daYs now.\"-Pordlad Oregonian. AMIBaha Gives Wilhelm the Sa-Es The British have rounded up Abdul Baba, the prophet, at 'Haifa and are treating bim with good natured respect. In fact, old Baba is able te give ex- Kaiser Wiihelm the ha-ha.-Minneapolis Journal. The New Cent Nioce The new one-cent piece is te be sllghtly larger and somewbat thinner than the ten-cent piece. One tbing in its favor is that the possessor cf t he single corn M.l ne longer mistake it for a quarter, when lie feels in his pocket -Montreal Gazette. Caeuar Know the aernmn It is now 1900 ycars since Caesar defcated the Germans in France. When they came asking ternis, hie said te them: \"Go back wbence you came, repair the damage you have done, give bostages, keep the peace for the future.\"-Montreal Heralti. Somethlng Thoy Know Now Hfindenburg the Arrogant after the terrific Hun ativance of last March said, \"The first act is over.\" But he and the other German militarists now know that the play is not finished until the curtain falîs on the last act.-Regina Leader. A Moderato Thief The Saskatoon Star states that a thief \"stole $30 worth cf ham\" from a local meat shop the other nigbt, wbich causes The Vancouver Province to wonder why hie took the trouble te slice it when bie might have taken the whole ham.-Toronte Telegram. Their O'wn Medicine For two generations the rulers of Germany and al the German professors have proclaimed that the test cf war is infallible, and that a nation that bas heen defeated is by that fact proved unanswerably to bc inferior, and deserves no consideratien. How do the German intellectuals like their own mediine?- Philadeiphia Record. Sonatorial Ingratitude!1 If Queen Isabella had not pawvned ber jewels to finance Columbus' voyage of discovery there would have been ne United States of America. If there were ne United States there wvould ho no Senate. Ergo, those tbirty-one Senators who refiîsed womcn the right te vote owve their jobs to the generosity of a vornan. What an ungraitefuil lot tlîcy arc!-Clîiicago Evening Post. Why Insut Charlie Chaplin Max Harden has referred to W. Hlohenzollern as \"da film hero.\" We might add that W. Ilenzollern's eldest son when he attempted to fIll the role of a great. general, sihowed himself to ho a Charlie Chaffliîî-we înight say that, if it wvere not se grossly unjiust and insulting te Charlie Chapln.-Saskatoon Star. Schools Gmcd sehools are the best. investment in ail the world for publie nîoney. The coînnion schools are the bcst. hope of humanity. When the tinte is reached when every cbild shall ho going to school, wh'bn every child shall1)0 kept at school or training of some kind until 16 or 18 years of cage, the imillenium wilI hegin te ho possible. And hy nothing else will it ever begin te be possible.-Ottawa Journal-Press. Lew Coat of Living One cf the employes of the Canadian commîssionor's office in Yokohaina bas written in for an increase cf salary from $9.75 te $12 a month, as ho bias a wife and five children, and the cost cf living is going up. Wbat is the stelm-hîp f:îrc te Yokohama? Or bcw's swinîninf' -Mlontrcal Journal cf Conmmierce. Di)vores Applied For The dear old Senators will have plenty of entertajx ment at Ottawa next session. So far there are applications for divorce to be considered. Sympathi and sentiment wilJ, as. usual, exert a greater mnfluen\u003c than justice can command. Canada's divorce Iaws ai- \"ady in need of revison.-Brantford Expoeitor.î An Erroneous Description Lieut. Jack Munroe, the Cobalt miner and ex- pugifiat, has written a book on the war, ini which ho describes the famous Cloth Hall at Ypres as being \"made entirely of cloth.\" This suggests that John muet have been i the vicinity when the French wero riein. up somne extensive camoufage.-Ottawa Citien.5 Germany's Fundamental Vice The fundamental vice of Germany which brougbt this tragedy upon the world is the fact that she recog- nized no divine laws, nothing superior to her own self- will, no sovereignty to which she should be loyal. The only law she knew was the law which Germany enacted. She did net recognize laws wbich the different states united to enact, altbough she was united with tbem i the enactmnent.-Bostofl Transcript. In Regard to the Bolshovi Scientists are telling us that restriction in the use of many articles of ordinary use may have untoward\u003e 'resuits. This is confirmed by the actions of the Boisheviki whose pictures convince us that these gen- tlemen have probably been inspired to their deeds by their very evident divorce from ordinary or household *soap.-Vancouver SUn' Education Dr. Shipley of the British Educational Mission said a great thing when he gave voice to this utterance: \"lIt is flot what you are educated in that is important. It is whether or not you bave a traitied brain. Educa- tion gives a man power to take the initiative, te be resolute and te hang on when others fail.\"-New York Tribune. Piper James Richuamo The case of Piper James Ricbardson of a Mantoba regiment, who played his companions over the top andi bas secured the V. C. for se doing, recalis another historic incident of like nature in the Afridi war. Piper Findiater did a similar thmng on that occasion andi continued the skirling of the pipes after he was struck down. He aiso obtained the highest decoration in the gift of his Sovereign for the brave deed. The niem- ories of both will bc honored for ail time te come.- Toronto Mail and Empire. Wilho:m sud the Mohm oal The British are flrmly established in Damascus. The incident must recaîl to the Turks the occasion of William Hohenzollern's visit te the same city in 1898, and the address delivered by hiin in wbich he made some characteristic statements. Perhaps the most arnusing of these now was that in which he declared: \"The three hundred million Mobammedans scattered over the globe may be assured of this, tLiat the German Emperor will b)e their friend at aIl times!\"-Manchester Guardian. Age Limit for Ministers The Methodist Church has fixed the age limit at 70 years for oficers to the conference. It was Cicero who said that lie îas very t hankful to old age because it bad increased bis cager desire for conversation, but the likes or opinions of the ancients are no longer accepted. But isn't there a passage ini Ecclesiastus to the effert that carefîîlness bringueth age before the time? Are wc to no longer take counsel of the elders?--Guelph Herald. The ('anadian war pension office wilho in existence for the ncxt haîf century. During the next few years its dut ies and its clerical 'staff an4....ther mnachinery iiiiit increase. O)ne can sec ne more reason why Chair- mari Rioss or Cliairman MeLean should insist on nîaking appointitients te titis staff by their ewn personal choirc» than ilhat any 'Minister should bave gene on making appointmcents te the staff cf bis own departmnîft, withomitrcgard te the Civil Service Commission. If the abolition cf patronage is a goed tbing in other departinents cf the public service, it is good for the pension administration .-Canadian Finance. The Expioded Gerimn Myth The German ambassader te Constantinople toki Ambassador Morgenthau, cf the United States, during the flrst days cf the war, that the Gernian military machine could nover be defeated. \"It tak\u003ces tbîrty years te produce the sert cf generals now leading the Gerînan army,\" said ho. This opens a field of speculat ion: Were tflie Teuton generals overdene or underdone wben the war breke eut? We know- non~ that they would bave been done brewn by Foch, Haie and the rest but would they bave improved with a9ce like other cheese? Here is a question for post hellUl) controversy for years te come.-Calgary Herald.",
         "Um; §MI- MMM1 W mluIlien timna ai- \u003e1 a wre 2jve A ja foN Iaprsf El 11a rogh jeog nd self- uheh )ttwa\u003e 3Te ied. Oy srtatsEATI ,Ltobe Ltoa kother in thed tnt. BAUTFU KJN GORE h ar. on man chee tnaem- ýorne.- 1 - i.hdTi sa nieynwpter n evl ivrpae npr nas tes. ealstr ol ot o eymchmr np ceter. ? Are TEASPOONS TABLESPOONS TABLE FORKS TABLE KNIVES Guelph Large or small. Haif- Ilaif-dozen free for Haif-dozen free for Also Dessert Knil dozen free for 400 wrap- 750 wrappers, or 100 750 wrappers, or 100 I1lf-dozen free for 1, pers, or 100 wrappers and wrappers and $2..10 wrappers and $2.15 wrappers, or 30D wl âistence $1 .00 cash. cash. cash. pers and $5.00 cash. y Wer W. pay Postage on above Premiuma rhinery , Chair- nliaking oI WiefrBGFE ito e rmusMninti [ eIioire rt o BGFE itofNwPeimsMninti rnaking f THE ROYAL CROWN SOAPS LUM Jle toki States,~ 0 leading field \u003c1f donc or b, Haie ith age.",
         "I N Western Canada Flour Mills Company Limited"
      ],
